Introduction to All Elite Wrestling (AEW)  

---

       Promotion Name    
  All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

       Founding Year    
  2019    

       Founder(s)    
-   Tony Khan  : The driving force behind AEW, Khan serves as the promotion’s founder and President. His deep passion for professional wrestling and background in sports analytics were pivotal in the creation of AEW.  
-   The Elite  : Key wrestlers including Cody Rhodes, Kenny Omega, Matt Jackson, and Nick Jackson (The Young Bucks) played integral roles as Executive Vice Presidents and creative architects.  
-   Shahid Khan  : Tony Khan's father and a prominent billionaire entrepreneur, Shahid Khan provided financial backing, ensuring AEW’s ability to compete on a global scale.  

       Initial Vision    
AEW was established with a clear mission to   reinvent professional wrestling   by combining high-quality athletic competition with innovative storytelling. Its goals included:  
-   Fostering Competition  : Offering an alternative to WWE by embracing creative freedom and emphasizing a diverse in-ring product.  
-   Highlighting Wrestler Creativity  : Empowering talent with creative control over their storylines and characters.  
-   Showcasing Inclusivity  : Prioritizing representation in its roster, spotlighting wrestlers of different backgrounds, styles, and identities.  
-   Fan-Centric Approach  : Catering to wrestling purists and casual fans alike by blending traditional wrestling elements with modern entertainment.  

AEW debuted with the   Double or Nothing   pay-per-view in May 2019, which established its legitimacy by delivering a mix of star power, critically acclaimed matches, and fan-driven content. From its inception, AEW aimed to position itself as a bold, progressive force within the wrestling industry.  

-----------------

      Founding and Early Years of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)  

---

       Historical Context    
When AEW was founded in   2019  , the professional wrestling landscape was dominated by   WWE  , a global juggernaut that held a near-monopoly on the mainstream wrestling market. However, a growing dissatisfaction among hardcore fans and wrestlers had begun to surface due to perceived creative stagnation, limited opportunities for talent to thrive, and a lack of competition to push innovation.  

At the same time,   independent wrestling promotions   like Ring of Honor (ROH), New Japan Pro Wrestling (NJPW), and Pro Wrestling Guerrilla (PWG) were gaining prominence among niche audiences. Wrestlers like Kenny Omega, The Young Bucks, and Cody Rhodes were redefining wrestling on the global stage through highly acclaimed matches and creative freedom in promotions outside WWE. Social media platforms like YouTube, bolstered by The Elite's   "Being the Elite" series  , connected fans directly to wrestlers, creating demand for an alternative wrestling product that combined athleticism with storytelling that resonated with modern sensibilities.

This confluence of events created the perfect environment for   AEW   to emerge as a revolutionary force in the wrestling world.

---

       Key Figures    
AEW’s founding was driven by a mix of visionary leadership and top-tier wrestling talent, each bringing unique skills to the table:  

-   Tony Khan (President)  : A lifelong wrestling fan with a strong background in sports analytics and management (as part of the Jacksonville Jaguars and Fulham F.C.), Khan envisioned AEW as a competitor to WWE with a focus on wrestling artistry and fan-centric programming.  
-   The Elite  :  
  -   Cody Rhodes  : Having left WWE in 2016, Rhodes became a key figure in independent wrestling, advocating for creative freedom and proving that talent could thrive outside WWE.  
  -   Kenny Omega  : Widely regarded as one of the best wrestlers in the world, Omega brought unmatched star power from NJPW, where he had revolutionized the industry with his epic matches, including his feud with Kazuchika Okada.  
  -   The Young Bucks (Matt and Nick Jackson)  : Innovators in tag team wrestling and masters of self-promotion, the Bucks used their social media influence and fan engagement to rally support for AEW.  
-   Shahid Khan  : The billionaire businessman provided the financial backing that allowed AEW to launch with top-tier production quality and secure major television deals.  

These figures combined entrepreneurial vision with a commitment to artistic integrity, laying a foundation for AEW’s identity as a   wrestler-driven promotion  .

---

       Early Successes    
AEW’s early years were marked by rapid achievements that demonstrated its potential to become a global wrestling powerhouse:  

1.   Debut Event – Double or Nothing (May 25, 2019)  : AEW’s inaugural pay-per-view featured groundbreaking matches, including Cody Rhodes vs. Dustin Rhodes and Kenny Omega vs. Chris Jericho. It also introduced   Jon Moxley   (formerly Dean Ambrose in WWE), whose surprise debut electrified fans and signaled AEW’s intent to challenge WWE.  
2.   Television Deal with TNT  : AEW secured a weekly prime-time slot on TNT, launching   AEW Dynamite   in October 2019. This deal, reminiscent of wrestling’s Monday Night Wars era, established AEW as a major player.  
3.   Championship Establishment  : AEW introduced titles that became central to its programming, such as the AEW World Championship (won first by Chris Jericho) and the AEW Women’s Championship (inaugural champion: Riho).  
4.   Diverse and Inclusive Roster  : AEW quickly gained praise for its representation of women, LGBTQ+ talent, and international wrestlers. The rise of stars like Hikaru Shida, Nyla Rose, and Darby Allin showcased AEW’s commitment to inclusivity and innovation.  

These successes cemented AEW’s reputation as a fresh, credible alternative to WWE and resonated with fans yearning for new experiences in wrestling.

---

       Challenges    
Despite its meteoric rise, AEW faced significant obstacles during its formative years:  

1.   The COVID-19 Pandemic   (2020–2021): Just as AEW was gaining momentum, the pandemic forced wrestling promotions worldwide to adapt to empty arena shows and limited live audience interactions. AEW countered this challenge by creating the   "Dynamite Zone"   in Daily’s Place, using innovative crowd simulations and maintaining storylines to keep fans engaged.  
2.   Competition from WWE  : WWE responded to AEW’s emergence by placing   NXT   in direct competition with AEW Dynamite, leading to the   "Wednesday Night Wars"  . Though AEW consistently outperformed NXT in ratings, the battle strained resources and pushed AEW to continuously innovate to maintain its edge.  
3.   Balancing New Talent and Homegrown Stars  : As AEW signed big names like CM Punk, Bryan Danielson, and Adam Cole, it faced the challenge of balancing their star power with the growth of homegrown talent like Hangman Page, Sammy Guevara, and Jade Cargill. This occasionally led to criticism about overcrowding the roster and diluting focus on rising stars.  
4.   Creative Growing Pains  : As a young promotion, AEW navigated criticism over inconsistent storytelling, overbooked matches, and difficulties in managing large factions and stables.  

Despite these challenges, AEW demonstrated resilience by prioritizing fan engagement, embracing feedback, and adapting its strategies to remain competitive.

---

      Key Takeaways    
1. AEW emerged as a response to the wrestling industry’s stagnation, filling a void for fans seeking a fresh, dynamic alternative.  
2. The promotion’s early years were shaped by a blend of visionary leadership and exceptional talent, including industry-changing figures like Kenny Omega and Cody Rhodes.  
3. AEW’s successes, such as its television deal and inclusive roster, solidified its place as a major force in wrestling within its first few years.  
4. While challenges like the pandemic and roster balancing tested its resilience, AEW’s ability to adapt and innovate underscored its commitment to long-term growth.



AEW Historic Roster

A Boy And His Dinosaur
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (regular appearances as a tag team).
Position on the card: Mid-card tag team.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based combination.
Signature moves: Extinction Event (combination finisher), Tail Whip, Snare Trap.
Brief description: Comprising Jungle Boy and Luchasaurus, "A Boy and His Dinosaur" was a beloved duo known for their unique chemistry. They regularly competed in AEW’s tag division, gaining fan support for their blend of athleticism and comedic charm. The team disbanded after storylines led to Jungle Boy's singles push.

Aaron Solo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on counters and agility.
Signature moves: Pedigree, Standing Double Stomp, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A consistent figure in AEW's roster, Aaron Solo is part of The Factory faction, often appearing in multi-man matches or tag team settings. While primarily used to elevate other talent, Solo has carved out a niche through his technical skills and association with QT Marshall.

Abadon
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card with occasional pushes.
Wrestling style: Power and brawling, with a supernatural and unorthodox approach.
Signature moves: Cemetery Drive (swinging neckbreaker), Leg Lariat, Gourdbuster.
Brief description: Known for their eerie persona and horror-inspired gimmick, Abadon has made sporadic but impactful appearances in AEW’s women’s division. Their feuds, notably against Hikaru Shida, showcased their unique character work and in-ring power.

The Acclaimed (Anthony Bowens & Max Caster)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Entertaining, brawling, and technical blend with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Mic Drop (diving elbow drop), Arrival (fireman’s carry to facebuster), combination moves like double suplex.
Brief description: The Acclaimed have become one of AEW’s most popular tag teams, known for their unique freestyle raps during entrances and infectious charisma. Their reign as AEW World Tag Team Champions (2022–2023) elevated them to one of the top teams in the company. Feuds with teams like Swerve in Our Glory and FTR solidified their status in AEW's competitive tag division.

Action Andretti
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances, currently rising).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card, breakout performer.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced with technical elements.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Springboard Cutter, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Action Andretti gained widespread attention with his shocking upset victory over Chris Jericho in December 2022. This breakout moment catapulted him into the spotlight, leading to more opportunities on AEW programming. Known for his agility and dynamic offense, Andretti is viewed as a future star in AEW.

Adam Cole
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical, with heelish tactics.
Signature moves: Last Shot (running knee strike), Panama Sunrise (Canadian Destroyer), Superkick, Brainbuster onto the knee.
Brief description: Adam Cole debuted in AEW at All Out 2021 and quickly aligned with The Elite. Known for his charisma and storytelling, Cole has been involved in major feuds with top stars like "Hangman" Adam Page and Orange Cassidy. In 2023, his storyline with MJF as reluctant tag partners turned friends became one of the most popular angles in AEW history.

Adam Copeland
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Veteran brawler with storytelling-heavy matches.
Signature moves: Spear, Edgecution (lifting DDT), Edge-O-Matic, Edgecator (kneeling sharpshooter).
Brief description: Adam Copeland, formerly known as Edge in WWE, made his AEW debut at WrestleDream 2023. His arrival immediately sparked a feud with Christian Cage, rekindling their storied rivalry. Copeland’s veteran experience and fan recognition make him a key figure in AEW’s main event scene.

Adam Page
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: High-flying, agile, and technical with a strong striking base.
Signature moves: Buckshot Lariat, Dead Eye, Rite of Passage, Moonsault (to the outside or from the top rope).
Brief description: "Hangman" Adam Page has been a central figure in AEW since its inception. Known for his emotional storytelling and high-impact style, Page became the AEW World Champion in 2021, defeating Kenny Omega in a long-term storyline. His matches with Bryan Danielson, CM Punk, and Jon Moxley are highlights of his career, cementing his position as a top star in AEW.

AFO (Andrade Family Office, formerly H.F.O.)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances as a faction).
Position on the card: Mid-card faction.
Wrestling style: Mixed styles (technical, brawling, and high-flying).
Signature moves: Various based on members, often emphasizing interference and faction-based tactics.
Brief description: Originally led by Andrade El Idolo, the AFO faction included wrestlers like Private Party and The Blade, focusing on group dominance and mid-card storylines. The faction was involved in feuds with The Dark Order and other AEW factions, often highlighting Andrade's technical expertise and the group's chaotic interference style.

AHFO (Andrade-Hardy Family Office)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances as a faction).
Position on the card: Mid-card faction.
Wrestling style: Mixed styles (technical, brawling, and high-flying).
Signature moves: Various moves emphasizing faction-based interference and teamwork.
Brief description: AHFO was a short-lived faction combining Andrade El Idolo, Matt Hardy, Private Party, and other members of the Hardy Family Office. The group focused on Andrade's leadership and Hardy's influence but eventually dissolved after Hardy was ousted, leading to the reunion of The Hardys and Andrade pursuing solo ventures.

Aja Kong
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with strong striking and hard-hitting offense.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Uraken (spinning backfist), Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A legend in Japanese wrestling, Aja Kong made a rare AEW appearance at Double or Nothing 2019 in a six-woman tag match. While her involvement was limited, her presence lent prestige to the early AEW women's division, showcasing her dominance and hard-hitting style.

Alan Angels
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card to enhancement talent (as part of The Dark Order).
Wrestling style: Agile and high-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Wing Snapper (modified backstabber), Moonsault.
Brief description: Alan Angels was a member of The Dark Order, contributing to the faction's comedic and dramatic storylines. Despite being primarily used in a supporting role, Angels gained recognition for his competitive matches against top talents like Kenny Omega. He left AEW in 2022 to pursue opportunities on the independent circuit.

Alex Reynolds
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Technical and agile, with a focus on teamwork.
Signature moves: Small Package Driver, Double Stomp (off the turnbuckle), Assisted Cutter (with tag team partner).
Brief description: Alex Reynolds is a key member of The Dark Order, often teaming with John Silver. Known for his versatility and comedic timing, Reynolds has played an integral role in AEW's tag team division. His matches alongside Silver against teams like FTR and The Young Bucks have demonstrated his in-ring skills and ability to connect with the audience.

Alex Jebailey
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Guest participant.
Wrestling style: Non-wrestler; comedic.
Signature moves: None.
Brief description: Alex Jebailey, a prominent figure in the gaming community, made a one-time comedic appearance at Fyter Fest 2019 in a Hardcore Match against Michael Nakazawa. While not a professional wrestler, his involvement added a lighthearted and entertaining element to the event.

Allie (The Bunny)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (women's division and faction member).
Wrestling style: Aggressive and brawling, with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Rabbit Hole (Reverse DDT), Running Dropkick, Superkick.
Brief description: Allie, known as The Bunny, has been a staple of AEW’s women’s division and a prominent member of The Butcher and The Blade's faction. Often involved in tag matches or faction-based feuds, The Bunny has worked with notable wrestlers like Hikaru Shida, Anna Jay, and Penelope Ford. Her character work as a chaotic, unhinged heel has added depth to her in-ring performances and storylines.

American Top Team
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Faction involved in high-profile feuds.
Wrestling style: MMA-based offense, brawling, and power moves.
Signature moves: Various, often influenced by MMA techniques and brawling styles.
Brief description: American Top Team, led by Dan Lambert, brought a unique crossover of MMA and professional wrestling to AEW. Members like Junior dos Santos, Paige VanZant, and Jorge Masvidal joined Lambert in feuds with top stars, including Chris Jericho and The Inner Circle. Their high-profile matches, such as the 10-man tag at Full Gear 2021, showcased their physicality and blended fighting styles.

Andrade El Idolo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and lucha libre with striking elements.
Signature moves: Hammerlock DDT, El Idolo (spinning back elbow), Moonsault to Standing Moonsault combo.
Brief description: Andrade El Idolo debuted in AEW in mid-2021 and quickly established himself as a dominant force. Aligning with factions like the Andrade-Hardy Family Office and later The LFI (La Facción Ingobernable), Andrade has been involved in key feuds with PAC, Cody Rhodes, and Darby Allin. Known for his technical mastery and charisma, Andrade remains a significant player in AEW's upper mid-card and main event scenes.

Andrei Arlovski
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction (part of American Top Team).
Wrestling style: MMA-based grappling and striking.
Signature moves: Strikes, clinch takedowns, and submission holds.
Brief description: Former UFC Heavyweight Champion Andrei Arlovski made a limited appearance in AEW as part of Dan Lambert's American Top Team faction. His role included supporting members of the group during their feud with The Inner Circle, participating in the high-profile 10-man tag match at Full Gear 2021.

Angelico
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, focusing on submissions and aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Navarro Death Roll, Crucifix Armbar, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Angelico is best known as one-half of the tag team The Hybrid 2 alongside Jack Evans. A standout for his unique submission-based offense and lucha libre-inspired style, Angelico has contributed to AEW’s tag team division, facing teams like The Young Bucks and Best Friends.

Angelo Parker
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and opportunistic, with a focus on character work.
Signature moves: Sharpshooter, Diving Back Elbow, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Angelo Parker, formerly of Ever-Rise in WWE, joined AEW as part of the Jericho Appreciation Society. His tag team work with Matt Menard and involvement in faction-based feuds with teams like Blackpool Combat Club highlight his role as an integral member of the group, blending character-driven promos with in-ring skill.

Anna Jay
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission and striking elements.
Signature moves: Queenslayer (Rear Naked Choke), Jay Kick, Modified DDT.
Brief description: Anna Jay debuted as a member of The Dark Order and quickly became a fan favorite. Later aligning with Tay Melo, Jay evolved into a more confident heel persona as part of the Jericho Appreciation Society. Her feuds with women like Ruby Soho and Willow Nightingale have solidified her place in AEW’s growing women’s division.

Anthony Bowens
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Power and technical, with high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Arrival (Fireman’s Carry Cutter), Caster Combo (with Max Caster), Back Suplex Variations.
Brief description: One-half of The Acclaimed with Max Caster, Anthony Bowens has become a cornerstone of AEW’s tag team division. Known for his explosive power and charisma, Bowens and Caster won the AEW World Tag Team Championships in 2022, engaging in standout feuds with teams like Swerve in Our Glory and FTR.

Anthony Greene
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying with showmanship.
Signature moves: So Much Prettier (Twisting Unprettier), 450 Splash, Superkick.
Brief description: Anthony Greene, a charismatic performer, made appearances on AEW programming, primarily as enhancement talent. Though he was not heavily featured, his performances showcased his agility and technical skills, particularly during matches on AEW Dark.

Anthony Henry
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical, blending striking and submission.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Diving Double Stomp, Brainbuster.
Brief description: Anthony Henry, known for his intense in-ring style, has appeared in AEW’s singles and tag divisions. Often working alongside JD Drake in The WorkHorsemen, he has competed on AEW Dark and Rampage, showcasing his grit and versatility in matches against established stars and rising talent.

Anthony Ogogo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card to enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking-heavy with boxing influences.
Signature moves: Pop-Up Punch, Frog Splash, Gutwrench Suplex.
Brief description: Former Olympic boxer Anthony Ogogo transitioned to professional wrestling and became part of AEW’s roster in 2021. Ogogo’s high-profile feud with Cody Rhodes at Double or Nothing 2021 introduced him as a dominant heel. Since then, he has made sporadic appearances, often on AEW Dark, while continuing to refine his wrestling skills.

AQA
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Sling Blade, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: AQA debuted in AEW in 2022, making an impression with her Shooting Star Press during her match against Jade Cargill. Though her appearances were limited, her athleticism and potential were evident during her brief tenure in AEW’s women’s division.

AR Fox
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative with technical elements.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Lo Mein Pain (springboard imploding DDT), Senton Atomico.
Brief description: AR Fox joined AEW in 2022 and quickly showcased his versatility and athleticism. Competing in both singles and tag matches, Fox has delivered high-octane performances against top stars and on AEW events like Dynamite and Rampage. His creative offense and ability to connect with the audience have made him a standout performer.

Ari Daivari
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Magic Carpet Ride (top rope splash), Hammerlock Lariat, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Ari Daivari leads The Trustbusters, a faction focused on heel antics and opportunistic victories. Known for his promo skills and in-ring technique, Daivari has been a regular competitor on AEW programming, including Dynamite and Rampage. His faction-based feuds and clever storytelling have made him a notable presence in the mid-card.

Ariane Andrew
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Basic and strike-heavy.
Signature moves: Split Leg Drop, Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Best known as a former WWE star, Ariane Andrew made a brief AEW appearance in the Women’s Tag Team Cup Tournament: The Deadly Draw in 2020, teaming with Nyla Rose. While her time in AEW was limited, her inclusion added star power to the event.

Ashley D'Amboise
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, focusing on counters and striking.
Signature moves: Snapmare Driver, Diving Crossbody, Neckbreaker Variations.
Brief description: Ashley D’Amboise has competed primarily on AEW Dark, showcasing her athleticism and potential against established talent. While primarily used in an enhancement role, her performances hint at a promising future in wrestling.

Athena
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event (women's division).
Wrestling style: Power-based striking and high-flying.
Signature moves: Eclipse (Diving Cutter), Crossface, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Athena, formerly known as Ember Moon in WWE, debuted in AEW at Double or Nothing 2022. She quickly established herself as a dominant force in the women’s division, capturing the ROH Women’s World Championship. Her aggressive style and character evolution have added depth to AEW's roster, making her a standout performer in singles competition.

Aubrey Edwards
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Senior referee.
Wrestling style: Not applicable (non-wrestling role).
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: Aubrey Edwards is AEW's most recognizable referee, officiating high-profile matches on Dynamite, Rampage, and pay-per-views. Known for her authoritative demeanor and expressive officiating style, she has become a fan favorite. Edwards is also involved in AEW’s gaming and community outreach initiatives.

Aussie Open (Mark Davis & Kyle Fletcher)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and fast-paced with strong teamwork.
Signature moves: Coriolis (double-team spinning slam), Aussie Arrow (assisted cutter), Double Lariat.
Brief description: Aussie Open, part of the United Empire faction led by Will Ospreay, debuted in AEW during the Forbidden Door 2022 event. Their tag team chemistry and brutal offense have made them standout competitors, including their participation in AEW's World Tag Team scene and cross-promotional events with NJPW.

Austin Gunn
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Agile and strike-heavy with a comedic edge.
Signature moves: Quick Draw (Flatliner), Fameasser, Dropkick Variations.
Brief description: Austin Gunn, one-half of The Gunns alongside his brother Colten Gunn, has emerged as a strong player in AEW's tag team division. The Gunns have transitioned from comedic roles to serious contenders, capturing the AEW World Tag Team Championships in early 2023. Their brash personas and heated feuds with teams like FTR and The Acclaimed highlight their growth in AEW.

Awesome Kong
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on strength and domination.
Signature moves: Implant Buster, Awesome Bomb, Running Splash.
Brief description: A trailblazer in women's wrestling, Awesome Kong was part of AEW's initial women's roster and a member of Brandi Rhodes’ Nightmare Collective faction. Her imposing presence and storied career lent credibility to AEW's burgeoning women’s division. Despite a limited run, her role helped establish early rivalries and storylines.

Baddies (Faction with Jade Cargill)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Support faction for Jade Cargill in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Primarily character-based with sporadic in-ring involvement.
Signature moves: Various, often limited to interference tactics in support of Jade Cargill.
Brief description: The Baddies, consisting of wrestlers like Kiera Hogan, Red Velvet, and Leila Grey, served as Jade Cargill’s entourage during her TBS Championship reign. Their role emphasized Cargill's dominance, often assisting her in matches and adding layers to her heel persona. The faction dissolved as its members pursued individual paths in AEW.

Bandido
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: 21-Plex (springboard German suplex), Frog Splash, Tope Con Hilo.
Brief description: Bandido debuted in AEW during 2022 in a match against Chris Jericho for the ROH World Championship, showcasing his extraordinary agility and resilience. Since then, he has made sporadic appearances, consistently delivering thrilling performances and earning fan admiration for his dynamic lucha libre style.

Bang Bang Gang (Bullet Club Gold)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event (faction).
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting, brawling, and technical with a focus on heel tactics.
Signature moves: Blade Runner (Jay White), 3:10 to Yuma (Juice Robinson and Austin Gunn double team), Gunn Stun (Colten Gunn).
Brief description: Bullet Club Gold, often referred to as the "Bang Bang Gang," features members like Jay White, Juice Robinson, and The Gunns. The faction made waves in AEW with their brash personas and highly entertaining feuds, including clashes with CM Punk, FTR, and The Elite. Their mix of charisma and in-ring skill has cemented them as a dominant force in AEW programming.

Baron Black
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Belly-to-Back Suplex, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Baron Black has appeared primarily on AEW Dark, competing against rising and established stars. While often used as enhancement talent, his technical skills and resilience have been evident in his performances.

Bea Priestley
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (women’s division).
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical.
Signature moves: Queen’s Landing (bridging back suplex), Kamigoye, Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Bea Priestley competed in AEW’s early women’s division, taking part in matches against top competitors like Hikaru Shida and Nyla Rose. Known for her hard-hitting style, she added a technical edge to the roster before her departure in 2020 to focus on NJPW and Stardom.

Bear Boulder
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on brute strength.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb (with Bear Bronson), Pop-Up Slam, Running Senton.
Brief description: Bear Boulder, one-half of the tag team Bear Country (later renamed The Iron Savages), has been a staple of AEW's tag division. Known for his incredible power and size, he and Bear Bronson have competed against teams like FTR and Jurassic Express, bringing a unique dynamic to AEW’s roster.

Bear Bronson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with high-impact maneuvers.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb (with Bear Boulder), Pop-Up Slam, Running Senton.
Brief description: Bear Bronson, one-half of Bear Country (later renamed The Iron Savages), has made notable appearances in AEW’s tag team division. His powerful and rugged style, combined with partner Bear Boulder, has led to hard-hitting matches against teams like Jurassic Express and The Acclaimed.

Bear Country (Bear Bronson & Bear Boulder)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse tag team focused on brute strength and tandem offense.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Bear Hug Splash Combination, Pop-Up Powerslam.
Brief description: Bear Country is a powerhouse duo that has competed in AEW’s deep tag team division. Known for their imposing size and strength, the team has provided stiff competition to top teams like FTR and The Young Bucks. They later rebranded as The Iron Savages, showcasing a more aggressive and dynamic edge in their performances.

Ben Carter (now Nathan Frazer in WWE)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent with breakout potential.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with explosive speed.
Signature moves: Phoenix Splash, Springboard Cutter, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Ben Carter made an impression in AEW during 2020 with his dazzling athleticism in matches against Lee Johnson and Scorpio Sky on AEW Dark. Despite limited appearances, his performances left a strong impression, leading to his eventual signing with WWE.

Best Friends (Trent Beretta & Chuck Taylor)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: High-energy and comedic, with a mix of technical and high-flying offense.
Signature moves: Strong Zero (cradle piledriver and stomp combo), Soul Food into Half-and-Half Suplex, Assisted DDT.
Brief description: Best Friends, one of AEW’s most beloved tag teams, have been a consistent presence since the promotion's inception. Known for their comedic antics and feel-good moments, they’ve engaged in memorable feuds, including their cinematic Parking Lot Fight against Santana & Ortiz. Often accompanied by Orange Cassidy, the duo has built a loyal fan base and remains a staple of AEW's tag team division.

Better Than You Bay Bay (MJF & Adam Cole)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division).
Wrestling style: A blend of technical precision (Adam Cole) and psychological, heel tactics (MJF).
Signature moves: Double Clothesline, Double Suplex, Panama Sunrise (Adam Cole), Salt of the Earth (MJF).
Brief description: Better Than You Bay Bay emerged as an unlikely tag team when AEW World Champion MJF and Adam Cole were paired in the AEW Blind Eliminator Tag Team Tournament. Their chemistry as both reluctant partners and eventual friends captivated fans, leading them to win the tournament and challenge FTR for the AEW World Tag Team Championships. Their mix of comedy, storytelling, and in-ring excellence has made them a unique and beloved duo.

Big Bill
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse, with a focus on brawling and brute strength.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Chokeslam, Snake Eyes.
Brief description: Formerly known as Big Cass in WWE, Big Bill debuted in AEW as a dominant heel enforcer. He has aligned with factions like The Firm, featuring prominently in feuds alongside Stokely Hathaway’s group. His imposing size and strength have been showcased in matches against top stars like Jon Moxley and Orange Cassidy, solidifying him as a reliable powerhouse in AEW’s roster.


Big Swole
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2021 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card (women’s division).
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based, with a mix of athleticism.
Signature moves: Dirty Dancing (spinning forearm strike), Tiger Driver, Cloverleaf Submission.
Brief description: Big Swole was a prominent figure in AEW’s women’s division during her tenure. Known for her charisma and hard-hitting style, she engaged in notable feuds with Britt Baker, including their cinematic Tooth and Nail Match at All Out 2020. Swole's presence and performances were key in developing AEW's women's division in its early stages.

Billie Starkz
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent with breakout potential.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing agility.
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, German Suplex, Fisherman Driver.
Brief description: Billie Starkz, a young and rising star, has appeared in AEW’s women’s division, primarily on AEW Dark and Rampage. Her athleticism and potential have caught the attention of fans, and she is seen as a promising talent for the future.

Billy Gunn
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to manager (as part of The Acclaimed and The Gunn Club).
Wrestling style: Power-based with classic brawling techniques.
Signature moves: Fameasser, One and Only (Cobra Clutch Slam), Gorilla Press Slam.
Brief description: Billy Gunn has been a cornerstone of AEW’s tag team and managerial scenes, first as a mentor to his sons (The Gunn Club) and later as part of The Acclaimed. His comedic timing, charisma, and in-ring experience have made him a fan favorite. Gunn’s involvement with The Acclaimed, including their tag title win, has solidified his place as a beloved figure in AEW.

Bishop Kaun
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (as part of The Embassy).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Spinning Powerbomb, Clothesline from Hell, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Bishop Kaun is a member of The Embassy, a faction that appears across AEW and ROH programming. Known for his physicality and power, Kaun has participated in multi-man tag matches, showcasing his dominance as part of Prince Nana’s faction.

Blackpool Combat Club (BCC)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (faction).
Wrestling style: Technical, brawling, and submission-focused.
Signature moves:

Bryan Danielson: Busaiku Knee, Cattle Mutilation.
Jon Moxley: Paradigm Shift, Bulldog Choke.
Claudio Castagnoli: Neutralizer, Ricola Bomb.
Wheeler Yuta: Seatbelt Pin, German Suplex.
Brief description: The Blackpool Combat Club was formed under the mentorship of William Regal, uniting Jon Moxley, Bryan Danielson, Claudio Castagnoli, and Wheeler Yuta. Known for their hard-hitting, no-nonsense style, the BCC has been involved in numerous high-profile feuds, including against The Elite in Blood and Guts matches and other faction-based rivalries.
Blade
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and faction member).
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical, with a brawling focus.
Signature moves: Stunner, Powerbomb, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Blade, one-half of The Butcher and The Blade, has been a staple of AEW’s tag team division since their debut. The team’s rugged style and alliances with The Bunny and factions like Andrade’s Family Office have led to intense feuds against top teams like The Young Bucks and FTR.

Blake Christian
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent with breakout potential.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with innovative offense.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Spanish Fly, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Blake Christian has appeared on AEW Dark and Rampage, showcasing his athleticism and creativity in the ring. While primarily used in enhancement roles, his dynamic performances highlight his potential for future growth in AEW’s roster.

Blonds (Varsity Blonds: Brian Pillman Jr. & Griff Garrison)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: High-energy with a mix of striking and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Air Pillman (springboard clothesline), Assisted Powerbomb, Superkick Combos.
Brief description: The Varsity Blonds were a fan-favorite tag team known for their cohesive teamwork and underdog spirit. Managed briefly by Julia Hart, they competed against top-tier teams like The Young Bucks and Jurassic Express. The team eventually dissolved in 2023 as both members pursued individual directions.

Bobby Fish
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (singles and faction member).
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with submission elements.
Signature moves: Fish Hook Deluxe Edition (heel hook), Exploder Suplex, Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Bobby Fish debuted in AEW in 2021 and aligned with Adam Cole and Kyle O’Reilly as part of The Undisputed Elite. Known for his hard-hitting style and martial arts background, Fish was involved in tag matches and rivalries with The Young Bucks, Jurassic Express, and The Dark Order. He departed AEW in 2022.

Boulder (of Bear Country/The Iron Savages)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse, with an emphasis on brute strength and tandem offense.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Pop-Up Slam, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Boulder, one-half of Bear Country (later rebranded as The Iron Savages), has showcased his incredible size and power in AEW’s tag team division. Competing alongside Bear Bronson, he has faced top teams like FTR and The Acclaimed, providing a unique powerhouse dynamic in AEW’s tag team roster.

Boys (Brandon Tate & Brent Tate, of Dalton Castle’s entourage)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction members.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic flair.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Assisted Splash, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: The Boys, part of Dalton Castle’s act, serve as comedic and athletic complements to Castle’s flamboyant persona. They have appeared in AEW and ROH programming, providing entertaining and dynamic performances, particularly in multi-man matches.

Brandi Rhodes
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Manager, occasional wrestler.
Wrestling style: Basic and strike-focused with a managerial emphasis.
Signature moves: Shot of Brandi (spear), Dropkick, Snapmare Variations.
Brief description: Brandi Rhodes was a key part of AEW’s early branding, serving as Chief Brand Officer while managing Cody Rhodes. She occasionally competed in AEW's women's division and was involved in storylines such as the Nightmare Collective. While her in-ring appearances were limited, her contributions behind the scenes and on-screen as a manager added depth to AEW programming.

Brandon Cutler
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card and comedic talent (manager and wrestler).
Wrestling style: Agile and high-flying with a comedic edge.
Signature moves: TPK (Tilt-a-Whirl Backbreaker), Springboard Elbow Drop, Cutler Driver (Reverse DDT).
Brief description: Brandon Cutler is a loyal ally of The Elite, often serving as their manager or participating in comedic segments. Known for his outrageous antics and the "Cold Spray," Cutler has contributed to faction feuds involving The Elite, The Dark Order, and The Blackpool Combat Club. His in-ring performances, while rare, showcase his athleticism and sense of humor.

Brent Tate (of The Boys)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with a comedic edge.
Signature moves: Assisted Tornado DDT, Double Dropkick, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Brent Tate, one-half of The Boys alongside Brandon Tate, is part of Dalton Castle’s entourage. Their comedic and acrobatic performances, often seen in multi-man matches on AEW and ROH programming, complement Castle’s flamboyant persona. The Boys are integral to Castle’s dynamic as a larger-than-life character.

Brandon Tate (of The Boys)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic flair.
Signature moves: Double Dropkick, Assisted Splash, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Brandon Tate, alongside Brent Tate, performs as part of Dalton Castle’s Boys. Their entertaining presence and athletic contributions provide balance to Dalton Castle’s flamboyant persona. The Boys have become fan favorites for their comedic and high-energy performances in AEW and ROH.

Brian Cage
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card (singles and faction member).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility, incorporating high-impact moves and aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Drill Claw, Weapon X, F5, Buckle Bomb.
Brief description: Brian Cage debuted in AEW as the surprise entrant in the Double or Nothing 2020 Casino Ladder Match. Managed by Taz as part of Team Taz, Cage quickly established himself as a dominant competitor. He later joined The Embassy, blending his powerhouse style with faction-based feuds. Cage remains a key player in both AEW and ROH programming, showcasing his strength and versatility.

Brian Pillman Jr.
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and singles).
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Air Pillman (springboard clothesline), Superkick, DDT.
Brief description: Brian Pillman Jr., son of the legendary Brian Pillman, was one-half of the Varsity Blonds with Griff Garrison. The team became fan favorites, competing against top-tier opponents like The Young Bucks and Jurassic Express. Pillman also pursued singles opportunities and participated in emotional storylines, such as his feud with MJF, drawing on his family legacy.

Brock Anderson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on old-school fundamentals.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Snap Suplex, Arm Drag.
Brief description: The son of wrestling legend Arn Anderson, Brock Anderson debuted in AEW in 2021. His performances, often alongside his father or in tag team settings, emphasize a traditional wrestling style. Anderson has competed in matches on AEW Dark, Rampage, and Dynamite, where he continues to develop as a promising young talent.

Brodie Lee
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a mix of agility and striking.
Signature moves: Discus Lariat, Sit-out Powerbomb, Big Boot.
Brief description: Brodie Lee debuted in AEW in March 2020 as "The Exalted One," the leader of The Dark Order. His intense character work and dominant performances quickly elevated the faction. Brodie’s AEW World Championship match with Jon Moxley and his reign as TNT Champion, where he defeated Cody Rhodes in a squash match, were highlights of his career. Tragically, Brodie Lee passed away in December 2020, but his legacy remains integral to AEW's history, celebrated with the Brodie Lee Memorial Show.

Brody King
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card (faction member).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with striking and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Gonzo Bomb, Cannonball Senton, All-Seeing Eye (tag finisher with Malakai Black).
Brief description: Brody King is a member of the House of Black, a dominant faction led by Malakai Black. Known for his brutal offense and imposing presence, King has competed in tag matches and trios bouts, often alongside House of Black members. His feud with Darby Allin showcased his physicality and storytelling abilities, solidifying him as a major force in AEW.

Bronson (of Bear Country/The Iron Savages)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with an emphasis on tandem offense.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Bear Hug Splash Combination, Pop-Up Powerslam.
Brief description: Bronson, one-half of Bear Country (later The Iron Savages), has showcased his strength and agility in AEW’s tag team division. Known for his powerful moves and chemistry with partner Boulder, Bronson has competed against top teams, bringing a unique powerhouse dynamic to AEW.

Brooke Havok
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Crossbody, Dropkick, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A student of Cody Rhodes’ Nightmare Factory, Brooke Havok made a few appearances on AEW Dark. Her performances, while limited due to injury, demonstrated potential and a fearless approach to competition in the women’s division.

Brother Zay (formerly Isiah Kassidy)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and faction member).
Wrestling style: High-flying and athletic, with innovative tandem moves.
Signature moves: Silly String (tag finisher with Marq Quen), Springboard Stunner, Swanton Bomb.
Brief description: Brother Zay, formerly known as Isiah Kassidy, is a member of Private Party and part of the Hardy Party faction with Matt Hardy. Known for his charisma and aerial maneuvers, Zay has competed in AEW’s tag division and faction-based feuds, delivering memorable performances against teams like The Young Bucks and FTR.

Bryan Danielson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, with striking and storytelling elements.
Signature moves: Busaiku Knee, Cattle Mutilation, Triangle Choke, Elbow Strikes.
Brief description: Bryan Danielson debuted in AEW at All Out 2021, immediately becoming a central figure in the company. A founding member of the Blackpool Combat Club, Danielson has delivered critically acclaimed matches against stars like Kenny Omega, Hangman Page, and MJF. Known for his in-ring psychology and technical mastery, Danielson remains a pillar of AEW's roster, blending high-profile rivalries with mentorship roles.

Buddy Matthews
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (faction member).
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Murphy’s Law, Meteorite Knee, Brainbuster.
Brief description: Buddy Matthews joined AEW as a member of the House of Black, aligning with Malakai Black and Brody King. His matches often highlight his explosive offense and technical prowess, making him a standout performer in multi-man bouts and singles action. Matthews has been involved in high-profile feuds, including clashes with Death Triangle and The Elite.

Bulk Bronson (of Bear Country/The Iron Savages)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on brute strength.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Pop-Up Slam, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Bulk Bronson, formerly known as Bronson in Bear Country, is one-half of The Iron Savages alongside Boulder. Competing in AEW’s tag team division, they bring a unique mix of size and power, frequently facing top teams and showcasing their dominant tandem offense.

Bullet Club Gold
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event (faction).
Wrestling style: Brawling, striking, and technical offense with a focus on faction-based tactics.
Signature moves:

Jay White: Blade Runner.
Juice Robinson: Left Hand of God (punch), Pulp Friction (spinning Unprettier).
Gunns: 3:10 to Yuma (tag finisher).
Brief description: Bullet Club Gold is the AEW iteration of the legendary Bullet Club faction, featuring Jay White, Juice Robinson, and The Gunns (Austin and Colten Gunn). Their brash personas and in-ring excellence have made them a top faction in AEW. They have been involved in high-profile feuds, including rivalries with CM Punk and FTR.
The Bunny
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (women’s division and faction member).
Wrestling style: Aggressive and brawling, with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Rabbit Hole (reverse DDT), Superkick, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: The Bunny, also known as Allie, is a key part of The Butcher and The Blade's act. She has competed in AEW’s women’s division and frequently participates in faction-based storylines. Her character work as a chaotic heel adds depth to her performances, both as a competitor and a manager.

The Butcher
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and faction member).
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Crossbody, Lariat.
Brief description: The Butcher, one-half of The Butcher and The Blade, is known for his menacing presence and hard-hitting style. Together with The Blade and The Bunny, he has been involved in notable feuds with teams like FTR, The Young Bucks, and Jurassic Express. His striking offense and powerhouse moves make him a standout in AEW’s tag team division.

The Butcher and The Blade
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and faction members).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawling with tandem offense.
Signature moves: Drag the Lake (double-team powerbomb and neckbreaker combo), Assisted Back Suplex, Elevated Crossbody.
Brief description: The Butcher and The Blade debuted in AEW as a mysterious and menacing tag team, quickly becoming a staple of the division. They have aligned with various factions, including Andrade El Idolo’s Family Office and Matt Hardy’s HFO. Their rugged style and chemistry have made them formidable opponents in AEW’s competitive tag team scene.

Caleb Konley
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Double Jump Moonsault, Tornado DDT, Springboard Senton.
Brief description: Caleb Konley appeared on AEW Dark, competing in enhancement matches against rising AEW talent. While his tenure in AEW was brief, his performances highlighted his agility and technical skills honed in the independent wrestling scene.

Carlie Bravo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical with a focus on striking.
Signature moves: Swinging Neckbreaker, Enzuigiri, Springboard Elbow Drop.
Brief description: A graduate of Cody Rhodes’ Nightmare Factory, Carlie Bravo has made several appearances on AEW Dark. Known for his energy and potential, Bravo has competed against established AEW stars, gaining valuable experience and showcasing his in-ring skills.
Cash Wheeler
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Technical and traditional with a focus on tag team psychology.
Signature moves: Big Rig (formerly Shatter Machine, with Dax Harwood), Gory Bomb, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: Cash Wheeler is one-half of FTR, one of the most celebrated tag teams in professional wrestling. FTR debuted in AEW in 2020, capturing the AEW World Tag Team Championships and engaging in high-profile feuds with The Young Bucks, The Acclaimed, and Bullet Club Gold. Known for their classic wrestling style and storytelling ability, Wheeler and his partner, Dax Harwood, have solidified their legacy as one of AEW's premier tag teams.

Cassandra Golden
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerslam, Running Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Cassandra Golden made multiple appearances on AEW Dark, competing against established stars like Nyla Rose and Big Swole. Her performances demonstrated strength and potential, though her AEW tenure was primarily focused on developing her skills in enhancement roles.

Cezar Bononi
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on brawling.
Signature moves: Pumphandle Slam, Spinebuster, Powerslam.
Brief description: Cezar Bononi, a towering Brazilian wrestler, has appeared on AEW Dark and Dynamite. As part of The Wingmen faction alongside Peter Avalon, Ryan Nemeth, and JD Drake, Bononi has provided comedic moments and strong performances in multi-man matches.

Chaos Project (Luther & Serpentico)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and high-flying with chaotic tactics.
Signature moves: Creeping Death (double-team spike DDT), Assisted Cannonball, Diving Double Stomp.
Brief description: Chaos Project is an eccentric and entertaining tag team known for their over-the-top antics and unique in-ring style. Often featured on AEW Dark, the duo has also competed on Dynamite in faction-based matches and tag team bouts, bringing a mix of humor and unpredictability to AEW’s roster.

Charlette Renegade (Renegade Twins)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent (women’s tag division).
Wrestling style: Power and striking, with tag team synergy.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Corner Splash, Assisted Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Charlette Renegade, one-half of the Renegade Twins with her sister Robyn, has appeared in AEW’s women’s tag matches, primarily on AEW Dark. The twins are known for their teamwork and developing chemistry, often competing against AEW’s more established talent.

Cheeseburger
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction (enhancement talent).
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Shotei Palm Strike, Bridging German Suplex, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Cheeseburger, a fan-favorite known for his comedic yet resilient persona, made a notable appearance on AEW Dark in 2022. Though primarily featured in ROH programming, his brief stint in AEW highlighted his unique charisma and crowd-pleasing style.

Chris Jericho
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Versatile with a mix of brawling, technical, and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Judas Effect (spinning elbow), Codebreaker, Walls of Jericho, Lionsault.
Brief description: Chris Jericho, AEW’s inaugural World Champion, has been a cornerstone of the promotion since its inception. As the leader of factions like The Inner Circle and the Jericho Appreciation Society, Jericho has continuously reinvented his character while engaging in major feuds with stars like Jon Moxley, Orange Cassidy, and Bryan Danielson. His ability to blend storytelling, promo work, and in-ring performance has solidified his role as one of AEW’s top stars.

Chris Sabin
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction (as part of Impact Wrestling crossover).
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Cradle Shock, Hesitation Dropkick, Cross-Legged Fisherman’s Buster.
Brief description: Chris Sabin, a renowned wrestler and one-half of the Motor City Machine Guns, appeared in AEW during the 2021 crossover between AEW and Impact Wrestling. Sabin showcased his dynamic and high-paced style, contributing to multi-man matches that highlighted inter-promotional rivalries.

Christian Cage
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical, with an emphasis on storytelling.
Signature moves: Killswitch (Unprettier), Spear, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Christian Cage debuted in AEW at Revolution 2021 and quickly made his presence felt. Known for his veteran experience and in-ring psychology, he won the IMPACT World Championship during a crossover event and later feuded with top AEW stars, including Jungle Boy, Wardlow, and Adam Copeland. Cage’s promo skills and ability to elevate younger talent have cemented him as a top-tier competitor and character in AEW.

Christopher Daniels
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (tag team and singles).
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, with a focus on psychology.
Signature moves: Best Moonsault Ever (BME), Angel’s Wings (double underhook facebuster), STO.
Brief description: A wrestling veteran and one of AEW’s foundational figures, Daniels served as both an in-ring performer and the company’s Head of Talent Relations. As part of SCU (SoCal Uncensored) with Frankie Kazarian and Scorpio Sky, Daniels competed in AEW’s first-ever match on Dynamite and became one-half of the inaugural AEW World Tag Team Champions. While his appearances have become sporadic, Daniels continues to contribute behind the scenes and in ROH.

Chuck Taylor
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and trios division).
Wrestling style: High-energy and comedic with technical elements.
Signature moves: Sole Food (inverted stomp facebreaker), Awful Waffle (piledriver), Assisted Powerbomb (with Trent Beretta).
Brief description: Chuck Taylor is one-half of Best Friends alongside Trent Beretta. Known for his comedic timing and cohesive teamwork, Taylor has been a staple of AEW’s tag team division. Highlights include the Parking Lot Brawl against Santana & Ortiz and trios matches featuring their partner Orange Cassidy. Taylor’s performances blend humor and skill, making him a fan favorite in AEW.

CIMA
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Meteora, Iconoclasm (corner slam), Schwein (modified driver).
Brief description: A veteran of Japanese wrestling, CIMA appeared during AEW’s early events, including Fyter Fest 2019 and Fight for the Fallen 2019. His matches highlighted his dynamic style, including a memorable bout against Kenny Omega. CIMA's brief involvement added international credibility to AEW’s growing roster.

Claudio Castagnoli
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer (singles and faction member).
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical precision and striking.
Signature moves: Neutralizer, Ricola Bomb, Giant Swing, European Uppercut.
Brief description: Claudio Castagnoli debuted at Forbidden Door 2022 as the newest member of the Blackpool Combat Club. His debut match, a victory against Zack Sabre Jr., showcased his technical mastery and power. Claudio has since become a key figure in both AEW and ROH, where he holds the ROH World Championship, competing in high-profile feuds and faction-based battles, including Blood and Guts.

CM Punk
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: GTS (Go to Sleep), Anaconda Vise, Pepsi Twist (arm-trap lariat).
Brief description: CM Punk’s return to wrestling at Rampage: The First Dance in 2021 marked one of the biggest moments in AEW history. Punk became a two-time AEW World Champion and headlined major events, including feuds with MJF and Jon Moxley. His storyline with The Elite culminated in controversy following All Out 2022. Punk’s in-ring psychology and promo work left a lasting impact on AEW before his departure in 2023.

CMFTR (CM Punk, Dax Harwood, and Cash Wheeler)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances as a trio).
Position on the card: Main event (trios division).
Wrestling style: Traditional technical wrestling, striking, and storytelling.
Signature moves: Big Rig (FTR), GTS (CM Punk), Spike Piledriver (trios finisher).
Brief description: CMFTR formed during Punk’s return to AEW in 2023 and quickly became a dominant force in the trios division. Their matches emphasized cohesive teamwork and a blend of old-school wrestling with modern storytelling. The trio competed in high-profile feuds on Collision, including clashes with Bullet Club Gold, before CM Punk’s departure later in the year.

Cody Rhodes
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical, with a flair for dramatic storytelling.
Signature moves: Cross Rhodes, Disaster Kick, Cody Cutter, Figure-Four Leglock.
Brief description: A founding EVP of AEW, Cody Rhodes played a pivotal role in establishing the company’s identity. As a three-time TNT Champion, Cody elevated the title with stellar matches and feuds against Darby Allin, MJF, and Brodie Lee. His emotional promos and matches, including the legendary Dog Collar Match with Brodie Lee, showcased his ability to connect with fans. Cody left AEW in early 2022 to rejoin WWE.

Cole Karter
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card (singles and faction member).
Wrestling style: Agile and technical.
Signature moves: 450 Splash, Springboard Cutter, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Cole Karter debuted in AEW in 2022 and briefly joined The Factory faction led by QT Marshall. While his role was primarily as a supporting player, Karter’s athleticism and potential were evident in his matches on AEW Dark and Rampage.

Colt Cabana
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (singles and faction member).
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Superman Pin, Chicago Skyline (top rope slingshot splash), Billy Goat’s Curse (reverse Boston Crab).
Brief description: Colt Cabana became a member of The Dark Order in 2020, adding a comedic yet earnest dimension to the faction. His sporadic appearances on Dynamite and AEW Dark showcased his versatility, blending humor and technical skill. Cabana has also been featured in ROH programming, where his history as a champion and veteran is well-recognized.

Colten Gunn
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Agile and strike-heavy with a mix of technical elements.
Signature moves: 3:10 to Yuma (tag finisher with Austin Gunn), Fameasser, Tilt-a-Whirl Slam.
Brief description: Colten Gunn, one-half of The Gunns alongside his brother Austin Gunn, has risen in prominence within AEW’s tag team division. Initially part of The Gunn Club under their father, Billy Gunn, the brothers transitioned into a brash heel duo, capturing the AEW World Tag Team Championships in 2023. The Gunns are also notable members of Bullet Club Gold, aligning with Jay White and Juice Robinson.

Crowbar
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore with a mix of technical elements.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Suplex, Spinebuster, Moonsault.
Brief description: Wrestling veteran Crowbar appeared on AEW Dark: Elevation in 2021 in a featured match against Joey Janela. Known for his hardcore wrestling legacy from WCW and ECW, Crowbar brought his unique style to AEW in a nostalgic and gritty performance.

Dalton Castle
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to special attraction (singles and trios).
Wrestling style: Technical and flamboyant with a mix of power-based offense.
Signature moves: Bang-A-Rang (spinning facebuster), Deadlift German Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Dalton Castle, a former ROH World Champion, has made multiple appearances in AEW, often accompanied by his signature entourage, The Boys. Castle’s unique blend of charisma, humor, and wrestling skill has been showcased in both singles competition and multi-man matches, including his participation in AEW and ROH events. His ability to captivate audiences with his flamboyant character and technical prowess has solidified him as a standout performer in crossover events.

Dan Lambert
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Manager and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Non-wrestling role; known for promo skills.
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: Dan Lambert, the founder of American Top Team, brought his MMA expertise and mic skills to AEW, managing fighters like Ethan Page, Scorpio Sky, and Paige VanZant. Lambert was central to high-profile feuds with The Inner Circle and later with wrestlers such as Cody Rhodes and Sammy Guevara. His over-the-top persona and verbal battles made him a memorable manager during his AEW tenure.

Danhausen
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card to comedic attraction.
Wrestling style: Comedic with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Very Nice, Very Evil (split-legged cradle pin), GTS (Go To Sleep), Tequila Curse (cursed distraction).
Brief description: Danhausen debuted in AEW in early 2022 and quickly became a fan favorite for his quirky, "very nice, very evil" persona. Known for his comedic antics and interactions with stars like Orange Cassidy and The Best Friends, Danhausen also competes in tag team and multi-man matches. Despite being primarily comedic, his in-ring ability and charisma have earned him a strong following.

Dani Jordyn
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with a focus on character work.
Signature moves: Mean Girl Slam (scoop powerslam), Dropkick, Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Dani Jordyn, known as "The Real Mean Girl," appeared on AEW Dark in 2020 and 2021. Her performances, while brief, showcased her charisma and potential, often portraying an entertaining heel character during her matches.

Daniel Garcia
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (singles and faction member).
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Dragon Tamer (Sharpshooter), Rear Naked Choke, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: Daniel Garcia has become a standout talent in AEW as part of the Jericho Appreciation Society. Known for his "sports entertainer" persona and technical prowess, Garcia has feuded with top stars like Bryan Danielson and Wheeler Yuta. His matches blend old-school grappling with modern storytelling, making him one of AEW's most promising young stars.

Danielle Kamela
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with character-driven elements.
Signature moves: Bulldog, Swinging Neckbreaker, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Danielle Kamela, a former WWE NXT performer, appeared on AEW Dark in 2022. Her matches showcased her solid in-ring fundamentals and character work, though her AEW tenure was brief.

Danny Limelight
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with a lucha libre influence.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Diving Crossbody, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Danny Limelight made a strong impression during his appearances on AEW Dark and AEW Dynamite. Known for his athleticism and dynamic offense, Limelight competed against rising stars and established talent, gaining recognition as a promising performer during his AEW stint.

Dante Martin
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (singles and tag team).
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Nose Dive (springboard moonsault), Double Springboard Cutter, 450 Splash.
Brief description: Dante Martin, one-half of Top Flight with his brother Darius Martin, has emerged as one of AEW’s premier high-flyers. Known for his breathtaking agility and creative offense, Martin has competed in high-profile matches against stars like Kenny Omega and FTR. His singles run during Darius's injury further highlighted his potential as a future star in AEW.

Darby Allin
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-risk, unorthodox, and resilient.
Signature moves: Coffin Drop, Last Supper (leg trap pin), Stundog Millionaire.
Brief description: Darby Allin, one of AEW’s most unique and popular stars, is known for his daredevil style and underdog persona. A former TNT Champion, Allin has been involved in memorable feuds with MJF, Samoa Joe, and Chris Jericho. His partnership with Sting has added a legendary dimension to his career, with standout moments in cinematic and in-ring matches.

Darius Martin
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances due to injuries).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team).
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with a focus on teamwork.
Signature moves: Assisted Moonsault, Spanish Fly, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Darius Martin, one-half of Top Flight alongside his brother Dante Martin, has showcased his athleticism and teamwork skills in AEW’s tag team division. Despite facing multiple injuries, Darius has consistently impressed in his returns, competing in exciting matches against teams like The Young Bucks and The Lucha Bros.

Darian Bengston
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Snapmare Driver, Dropkick.
Brief description: Darian Bengston has appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing his in-ring fundamentals against established AEW talent. Though primarily used in enhancement roles, his performances highlight his potential as a developing talent.

Dark Order
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (singles and faction-based competition).
Wrestling style: A mix of power, technical wrestling, and high-flying, depending on individual members.
Signature moves: Fatality (tag finisher by Evil Uno and Stu Grayson), Pendulum Bomb (John Silver), Discus Lariat (Brodie Lee).
Brief description: The Dark Order debuted as a mysterious faction in AEW but gained prominence under the leadership of Brodie Lee in 2020. Featuring members like Evil Uno, Stu Grayson, John Silver, Alex Reynolds, and others, the faction evolved into a fan-favorite group known for its comedic segments and underdog spirit. The Dark Order has been involved in notable feuds with The Elite, The Blackpool Combat Club, and The House of Black.

Dasha (Dasha Gonzalez)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Interviewer and announcer.
Wrestling style: Not applicable (non-wrestling role).
Signature moves: Not applicable.
Brief description: Dasha Gonzalez serves as one of AEW's backstage interviewers and announcers. Her professionalism and charisma have made her a key figure in AEW's broadcast team, providing insight and conducting in-ring interviews during AEW programming.

David Finlay
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances as part of NJPW crossover).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical with a mix of brawling.
Signature moves: Trash Panda (kneeling neckbreaker), Prima Nocta (elevated stunner), Flying European Uppercut.
Brief description: David Finlay, a star in NJPW, appeared in AEW during the NJPW crossover events in 2021. Competing in tag matches alongside Juice Robinson (as FinJuice), Finlay showcased his well-rounded style and strong connection to international wrestling audiences.

Dax Harwood
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based, with a focus on old-school tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Big Rig (tag finisher with Cash Wheeler), Slingshot Powerbomb, Sharpshooter.
Brief description: Dax Harwood is one-half of FTR, one of the most celebrated tag teams in professional wrestling. Since debuting in AEW in 2020, Harwood and Cash Wheeler have won the AEW World Tag Team Championships and participated in high-profile feuds with The Young Bucks, The Acclaimed, and Bullet Club Gold. Harwood’s in-ring storytelling and technical prowess have earned him accolades as one of the best tag team wrestlers in the world.

Dean Alexander
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical with power elements.
Signature moves: Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Powerslam, Lariat.
Brief description: Dean Alexander has appeared on AEW Dark, competing against both rising and established stars. Though primarily used in enhancement roles, his performances demonstrate a solid foundation of in-ring skills and a developing presence.

Death Triangle (PAC, Penta El Zero Miedo, and Rey Fenix)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (trios and singles competition).
Wrestling style: High-flying, technical, and lucha libre.
Signature moves:
PAC: Black Arrow (corkscrew shooting star press), Brutalizer (submission).
Penta El Zero Miedo: Fear Factor (package piledriver), Slingblade.
Rey Fenix: Phoenix Splash, Rolling Cutter, Tornado Kick.
Team finisher: Assisted Fear Factor.
Brief description: Death Triangle is one of AEW’s most dynamic factions, combining the striking and technical prowess of PAC with the lucha libre expertise of Penta El Zero Miedo and Rey Fenix. They became the inaugural AEW World Trios Champions in 2022, competing in high-profile matches against The Elite and The House of Black. The group represents a perfect fusion of athleticism and intensity in AEW’s trios division.

Deonna Purrazzo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Queen’s Gambit (piledriver), Fujiwara Armbar, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Deonna Purrazzo, one of Impact Wrestling’s top stars, appeared in AEW during the Dynamite main event on May 4, 2022. She faced Mercedes Martinez in a winner-takes-all match for the ROH Women’s World Championship. Despite her brief stint in AEW, Purrazzo’s technical mastery and presence made a significant impact during her appearance.

Diamante
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (women’s division).
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with a brawling edge.
Signature moves: Code Red, Running Dropkick, German Suplex.
Brief description: Diamante has been a regular competitor in AEW’s women’s division, often featured on AEW Dark and Rampage. Known for her fiery offense and toughness, she also participated in the Women’s Tag Team Cup Tournament: The Deadly Draw alongside Ivelisse, where they emerged victorious. Diamante’s matches showcase her resilience and versatility as a competitor.

Diamond Dallas Page (DDP)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based with storytelling emphasis.
Signature moves: Diamond Cutter, Diving Clothesline, Spinning Neckbreaker.
Brief description: WWE Hall of Famer DDP made a special appearance in AEW during a multi-man tag match on Dynamite in early 2020. Aligning with Dustin Rhodes and QT Marshall, DDP’s performance served as a nostalgic highlight for fans, showcasing his timeless charisma and signature Diamond Cutter.

Doc Gallows
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances as part of Impact Wrestling crossover).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division and faction member).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on striking and brawling.
Signature moves: Gallows Pole (spinning side slam), Chokeslam, Big Boot.
Brief description: Doc Gallows, one-half of The Good Brothers with Karl Anderson, appeared in AEW during the crossover between AEW and Impact Wrestling. Aligned with Kenny Omega and The Elite, Gallows participated in multi-man matches and feuds, including battles with Jon Moxley, Eddie Kingston, and The Dark Order. His physicality and heel tactics added depth to The Elite’s dominance during this period.

Don Callis Family
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (faction).
Wrestling style: Mixed (technical, striking, and power-based depending on members).
Signature moves: Various, influenced by faction members such as Konosuke Takeshita (Jumping Knee Strike, Blue Thunder Bomb) and Will Ospreay (Stormbreaker, Oscutter).
Brief description: The Don Callis Family was formed after Callis turned on Kenny Omega at Double or Nothing 2023, aligning with Konosuke Takeshita and later expanding to include Will Ospreay and other talents. This faction is involved in high-profile feuds with The Elite and Chris Jericho, emphasizing Callis’s role as a manipulative strategist guiding his group to dominance.

Dr. Britt Baker, D.M.D.
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer (women’s division).
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on submissions and strikes.
Signature moves: Lockjaw (submission), Curb Stomp, Fisherman Neckbreaker, Pittsburgh Sunrise.
Brief description: Britt Baker is a cornerstone of AEW’s women’s division. As the first major breakout star in the division, she held the AEW Women’s World Championship from 2021 to 2022, elevating the title with matches against Thunder Rosa, Ruby Soho, and Hikaru Shida. Her lights-out match with Thunder Rosa at St. Patrick’s Day Slam 2021 is considered a landmark moment for AEW. Baker’s charisma and ability to combine technical wrestling with character work have solidified her as a top star in AEW.

Dralistico
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and faction member).
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Tornillo Splash, Double Knee Strike.
Brief description: Dralistico, a member of the legendary lucha libre family that includes Dragon Lee and Rush, made his AEW debut in 2022 as part of La Facción Ingobernable (LFI). Competing in tag team and multi-man matches, Dralistico has showcased his dynamic lucha libre style, contributing to high-energy bouts with AEW’s top talents.

Dudes With Attitudes (Sting, Darby Allin, The Young Bucks, and others)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (special appearance at Forbidden Door).
Position on the card: Main event (special team).
Wrestling style: High-energy, brawling, and high-flying, depending on members.
Signature moves:
Sting: Scorpion Deathlock, Stinger Splash.
Darby Allin: Coffin Drop, Stundog Millionaire.
Young Bucks: Meltzer Driver, BTE Trigger.
Brief description: Dudes With Attitudes, an homage to a WCW faction Sting led in the early ’90s, was revived for AEW’s Forbidden Door 2022 event. The team, consisting of Sting, Darby Allin, and The Young Bucks, competed in a high-profile trios match against Bullet Club members and Hikuleo, delivering a nostalgic and crowd-pleasing performance.

Dustin Rhodes
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (singles and tag team).
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based with a focus on storytelling.
Signature moves: Final Reckoning (spinning suplex slam), Cross Rhodes, Bulldog, Code Red.
Brief description: A veteran of the wrestling industry, Dustin Rhodes debuted in AEW at its inaugural event, Double or Nothing 2019, in a critically acclaimed match against his brother Cody Rhodes. Known for his emotional storytelling and resilience, Rhodes has been a key figure in AEW’s mid-card and tag team scenes, mentoring younger talent while delivering standout performances in feuds and multi-man matches.

Eddie Kingston
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event (singles and faction-based competition).
Wrestling style: Brawling with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Spinning Backfist, Stretch Plum (submission), Exploder Suplex.
Brief description: Eddie Kingston debuted in AEW during 2020, quickly becoming one of the promotion's most beloved stars due to his raw charisma and authenticity. Kingston has feuded with major stars like Jon Moxley, Chris Jericho, and CM Punk, delivering intense promos and hard-hitting matches. As a leader in both AEW and ROH, Kingston has built a reputation for his gritty style and emotional storytelling, capturing the hearts of fans worldwide.

EJ Nduka
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent with potential for mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with athletic agility.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerbomb, Lariat.
Brief description: EJ Nduka, a former standout in MLW, appeared on AEW Dark in 2023, showcasing his impressive physique and power-based style. While his AEW appearances have been limited, his performances hinted at his potential to grow as a dominant presence in the company’s mid-card or faction-based storylines.

El Hijo del Vikingo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with innovative, gravity-defying moves.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Imploding Phoenix Splash, Tornillo Dive.
Brief description: El Hijo del Vikingo, one of the most celebrated lucha libre stars, made his AEW debut in 2023, facing Kenny Omega in a highly anticipated dream match on AEW Dynamite. His breathtaking athleticism and unique offense have made him a must-see competitor in AEW and beyond. Vikingo has also appeared in multi-man matches, further showcasing his extraordinary abilities to the AEW audience.

El Phantasmo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances as part of NJPW crossover).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Sudden Death (superkick), CR II (cradle piledriver), Moonsault.
Brief description: El Phantasmo, a member of NJPW’s Bullet Club, has made sporadic appearances in AEW during NJPW crossover events like Forbidden Door. Known for his flashy offense and entertaining antics, Phantasmo has participated in multi-man tag matches, bringing his mix of athleticism and charisma to AEW audiences.

Elite (Kenny Omega, The Young Bucks, and others)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (singles, tag team, and faction).
Wrestling style: High-flying, technical, and storytelling-driven.
Signature moves:

Kenny Omega: One-Winged Angel, V-Trigger.
The Young Bucks: Meltzer Driver, BTE Trigger.
Team finishers: Indytaker (assisted tombstone), Triple Superkick.
Brief description: The Elite, comprising Kenny Omega, The Young Bucks (Matt and Nick Jackson), and occasionally members like Adam Page and Kota Ibushi, are the cornerstone faction of AEW. Founders of the promotion, The Elite has delivered countless classics in singles, tag team, and trios competition. They were instrumental in building AEW’s identity, engaging in feuds with major groups like The Inner Circle, The Blackpool Combat Club, and Death Triangle. Their involvement in creating AEW’s World Trios Championship added another layer to their legacy.

Embassy (Prince Nana, Brian Cage, Kaun, Toa Liona)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances as part of ROH crossover).
Position on the card: Mid-card (faction).
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical, with faction-focused dominance.
Signature moves:
Brian Cage: Drill Claw, Weapon X.
Kaun: Spinning Powerbomb.
Toa Liona: Corner Avalanche, Samoan Drop.
Team finisher: Triple Powerbomb.
Brief description: The Embassy, led by Prince Nana, has made its presence known in AEW and ROH programming. The faction combines Brian Cage's technical power with the raw strength of Kaun and Toa Liona. They have been involved in multi-man tag matches and faction-based rivalries, often appearing as a dominant force in trios competition.
Emi Sakura
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (women’s division).
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting, with character-driven theatrics.
Signature moves: We Will Rock You (corner crossbody), Queen’s Gambit (double underhook backbreaker), Moonsault.
Brief description: Emi Sakura, a Japanese wrestling legend, has been a part of AEW’s women’s division since its inception. Known for her charismatic Queen-inspired persona and technical prowess, Sakura has participated in high-profile matches against stars like Riho and Thunder Rosa. Often featured on AEW Dark and Rampage, her in-ring skills and theatricality continue to resonate with fans.

Erick Redbeard
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020, 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling with a focus on striking.
Signature moves: Iron Claw Slam, Spinning Heel Kick, Big Boot.
Brief description: Erick Redbeard, formerly known as Erick Rowan in WWE, made a surprise appearance at the Brodie Lee Celebration of Life in 2020, honoring his former tag team partner. He later returned in 2022 to team with Death Triangle against the House of Black at Revolution 2022. Redbeard’s imposing presence and connection to Brodie Lee have made his appearances in AEW emotionally significant for fans.

Ethan Page
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based with character-driven elements.
Signature moves: Ego’s Edge (crucifix powerbomb), Roundhouse Kick, Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Ethan Page debuted in AEW in 2021 as a free agent, immediately aligning with Scorpio Sky to form the Men of the Year. Known for his charisma and versatility, Page has competed in high-profile feuds against Darby Allin, Sting, and The Firm. His blend of in-ring skill and promo ability has made him a consistent presence on Dynamite and Rampage.

Evil Uno
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (faction member and occasional singles).
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based with unorthodox offense.
Signature moves: Something Evil (ripcord flatliner), Swanton Bomb, Neckbreaker Variations.
Brief description: Evil Uno is a key member of The Dark Order and has been a prominent figure in AEW since its inception. Known for his unique look and in-ring charisma, Uno has competed in tag team and faction-based matches, often teaming with other Dark Order members like Stu Grayson. His loyalty to the group and his role in key feuds with factions like The Elite and The House of Black make him a vital part of AEW’s storytelling.

Exodus Prime
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical.
Signature moves: Standing Moonsault, Springboard Cutter, Dropkick Variations.
Brief description: Exodus Prime has appeared on AEW Dark and Rampage, showcasing his skills against rising and established stars. While primarily used in enhancement roles, his performances demonstrate athleticism and potential as a developing talent in AEW.

Factory (QT Marshall, Aaron Solo, Nick Comoroto, Cole Karter, Lee Johnson)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card (faction).
Wrestling style: Mixed styles, emphasizing teamwork and heel tactics.
Signature moves:
QT Marshall: Diamond Cutter.
Nick Comoroto: Powerslam.
Aaron Solo: Pedigree.
Brief description: The Factory, led by QT Marshall, was a heel faction featuring a mix of established wrestlers and younger talent. They served as a foil for top stars and rising talents in AEW, often participating in multi-man matches and faction-based feuds. The group disbanded in 2023, with members pursuing individual directions in AEW or elsewhere.

The Firm (Stokely Hathaway, Ethan Page, Lee Moriarty, W. Morrissey, Colten Gunn, Austin Gunn)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (faction).
Wrestling style: Mixed, including technical (Lee Moriarty), power-based (W. Morrissey), and traditional tag team wrestling (The Gunns).
Signature moves:
Ethan Page: Ego’s Edge (crucifix powerbomb).
Lee Moriarty: Border City Stretch (submission).
W. Morrissey: Chokeslam.
Team finisher: Assisted Big Boot.
Brief description: The Firm was introduced as MJF’s "on-demand faction" in 2022, featuring a diverse group of talents led by Stokely Hathaway. The group supported MJF’s rise while also pursuing their own feuds, such as Ethan Page’s singles push and The Gunns capturing the AEW World Tag Team Championships. The faction dissolved in 2023 as members pursued individual paths.
Five (Alan Angels)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card (faction member).
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Wing Snapper (modified backstabber), Moonsault.
Brief description: Alan Angels, known as "Five" in The Dark Order, was a key part of the faction’s comedic and dramatic storylines. While primarily used in tag and multi-man matches, Angels showcased his athleticism in matches against top stars like Kenny Omega. He left AEW in 2022 to explore opportunities on the independent scene.


Frankie Kazarian
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (singles and tag team).
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying.
Signature moves: Flux Capacitor (Spanish Fly), Fade to Black (reverse piledriver), Slingshot Leg Drop.
Brief description: Frankie Kazarian was a foundational member of AEW and one-half of the inaugural AEW World Tag Team Champions with Scorpio Sky as part of SCU (SoCal Uncensored). Known for his versatility and in-ring storytelling, Kazarian also competed in singles competition, taking on top stars like Kenny Omega and Miro. He left AEW in 2023 to focus on his career in Impact Wrestling.

FTR (Dax Harwood & Cash Wheeler)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Old-school technical wrestling with a focus on tag team psychology.
Signature moves: Big Rig (tag finisher), Shatter Machine, Superplex and Splash Combo.
Brief description: FTR, considered one of the best tag teams in professional wrestling, debuted in AEW in 2020 and quickly made an impact by winning the AEW World Tag Team Championships. Known for their dedication to traditional tag team wrestling, they’ve had critically acclaimed feuds with The Young Bucks, The Lucha Bros, and The Gunns. FTR’s versatility and storytelling have earned them numerous accolades, including AEW, ROH, and NJPW tag team titles, solidifying their status as one of the top teams in the world.

Fuego Del Sol
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and underdog.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with an emphasis on resilience.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Moonsault, Tope Con Hilo.
Brief description: Fuego Del Sol became a beloved underdog in AEW due to his high-flying style and endearing personality. Though primarily featured on AEW Dark, Fuego earned a full-time AEW contract after his emotional match against Miro for the TNT Championship in 2021. He left AEW in 2023 but remains a fan favorite for his determination and connection with the audience.

Gates of Agony (Kaun & Toa Liona)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team and faction members).
Wrestling style: Powerhouse tandem with a focus on strength and teamwork.
Signature moves:
Assisted Powerbomb.
Running Powerslam (Toa Liona).
Spinning Side Slam (Kaun).
Brief description: Gates of Agony, managed by Prince Nana as part of The Embassy, have competed in AEW and ROH’s tag team divisions. Known for their imposing physicality and brute force, they’ve participated in faction-based rivalries and multi-man matches, often aligning with Brian Cage. Their presence adds a dominant powerhouse dynamic to AEW and ROH's rosters.

Glacier
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Striking and martial arts-inspired.
Signature moves: Cryonic Kick (spinning superkick), Ice Pick (submission).
Brief description: Glacier, a WCW veteran, made a special appearance in the Over the Budget Battle Royal at AEW Double or Nothing 2019. While primarily a nostalgic nod to his WCW days, his inclusion added a unique flavor to the event, showcasing his martial arts-inspired style.

Golden Elite (Kenny Omega, The Young Bucks, Kota Ibushi, and others)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (sporadic appearances as a team).
Position on the card: Main event (faction).
Wrestling style: High-flying, technical, and storytelling-driven.
Signature moves:
Kenny Omega: One-Winged Angel, V-Trigger.
The Young Bucks: Meltzer Driver, BTE Trigger.
Kota Ibushi: Kamigoye, Golden Star Powerbomb.
Brief description: The Golden Elite, a supergroup composed of Kenny Omega, The Young Bucks, and Kota Ibushi, represents the pinnacle of athleticism and storytelling in AEW. Though primarily functioning as a subset of The Elite, their reunion in AEW events like Dynamite and Forbidden Door reignited the faction’s legacy established in NJPW. Their combination of star power and in-ring mastery makes them a standout faction.

Griff Garrison
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Agile and technical with a focus on striking.
Signature moves: Rolling Elbow, Springboard Elbow Drop, Falcon Arrow.
Brief description: Griff Garrison was one-half of the Varsity Blonds tag team alongside Brian Pillman Jr. The duo became fan favorites for their underdog spirit and cohesive teamwork, competing against top-tier teams like The Young Bucks and Jurassic Express. Garrison has also appeared in singles competition and faction-based matches, showcasing his potential in AEW’s tag team division.

Gunn Club (Austin Gunn & Colten Gunn)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling with a mix of striking and agility.
Signature moves: 3:10 to Yuma (tag finisher), Fameasser (Austin Gunn), Tilt-a-Whirl Slam (Colten Gunn).
Brief description: The Gunn Club, consisting of Billy Gunn’s sons Austin and Colten, rose through AEW’s tag team ranks as brash heels. Initially aligned with their father, they later split from him, forming a key part of the Bullet Club Gold faction. The Gunns captured the AEW World Tag Team Championships in 2023 and have been involved in notable feuds with The Acclaimed and FTR, solidifying their position in AEW’s tag division.

Gunns (Austin Gunn & Colten Gunn)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling with striking and agility.
Signature moves: 3:10 to Yuma (tag finisher), Fameasser (Austin Gunn), Tilt-a-Whirl Slam (Colten Gunn).
Brief description: The Gunns, sons of Billy Gunn, transitioned from comedic roles as part of the Gunn Club to brash and confident heels, aligning with Bullet Club Gold in 2023. The duo captured the AEW World Tag Team Championships and have engaged in significant feuds with teams like The Acclaimed, FTR, and other top-tier competitors. Their mix of charisma and in-ring development has made them key players in AEW’s tag team division.

Hardy Family Office (HFO)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card (faction).
Wrestling style: Mixed, with a focus on faction-based heel tactics.
Signature moves: Various, emphasizing teamwork and interference-based victories.
Brief description: The Hardy Family Office, led by Matt Hardy, included members such as Private Party (Isiah Kassidy & Marq Quen), The Butcher, The Blade, and The Bunny. The faction operated as a heel stable, involved in feuds with The Dark Order, Jurassic Express, and The Inner Circle. The group eventually dissolved when Matt Hardy transitioned into a storyline reunion with Jeff Hardy, reforming The Hardys.

Hardys (Matt & Jeff Hardy)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card (tag team division).
Wrestling style: High-flying, risk-taking, and innovative.
Signature moves: Twist of Fate (Matt), Swanton Bomb (Jeff), Poetry in Motion (team finisher).
Brief description: The legendary Hardys reunited in AEW in 2022, bringing their decades-long legacy to the promotion. Known for their daredevil style and innovative tag team wrestling, The Hardys have competed against teams like The Young Bucks and Private Party. Their nostalgia-driven appeal and veteran experience make them an iconic addition to AEW’s tag division.

Harley Cameron
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Lower mid-card (women’s division and faction member).
Wrestling style: Character-driven with a mix of striking and basic technical skills.
Signature moves: Snap DDT, Running Bulldog, Dropkick Variations.
Brief description: Harley Cameron is a member of QTV, QT Marshall’s faction. Known for her character work and occasional in-ring performances, Cameron provides a comedic and theatrical edge to AEW’s programming. Her musical segments and promos often highlight her creative personality, adding depth to her faction's dynamic.

Hikaru Shida
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main eventer (women’s division).
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with a mix of power moves.
Signature moves: Katana (running knee strike), Falcon Arrow, Tamashii no Three Count (sit-out powerbomb).
Brief description: Hikaru Shida is one of the most prominent figures in AEW’s women’s division, holding the AEW Women’s World Championship for a record-setting 372 days. Known for her versatility and hard-hitting style, Shida has engaged in notable rivalries with Nyla Rose, Britt Baker, and Serena Deeb. Her work as a cornerstone of AEW’s women’s division has helped elevate its profile, and she remains a fan favorite for her in-ring talent and charismatic presence.

Hikuleo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances as part of NJPW crossover).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with striking and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Tongan Driller (sit-out tombstone piledriver), Big Boot, Chokeslam.
Brief description: Hikuleo, a member of the Bullet Club and NJPW standout, has appeared in AEW during crossover events like Dynamite and Forbidden Door. His towering presence and physicality have made him a formidable opponent in multi-man matches, often aligning with Bullet Club members to continue their faction’s dominance.

Hiromu Takahashi
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (special appearance at Forbidden Door).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with an unorthodox, energetic approach.
Signature moves: Time Bomb, D (triangle choke), Sunset Flip Powerbomb to the Outside.
Brief description: Hiromu Takahashi, one of NJPW’s most charismatic and talented junior heavyweights, made his AEW debut at Forbidden Door 2023. He competed in a high-energy multi-man match, showcasing his unique offense and high-flying style to AEW’s audience. Hiromu’s reputation as one of the world’s top junior heavyweights brought significant excitement to the event.

Hiroshi Tanahashi
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances as part of NJPW crossover).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and storytelling-focused, with power and striking elements.
Signature moves: High Fly Flow (frog splash), Dragon Screw Leg Whip, Sling Blade.
Brief description: The Ace of NJPW, Hiroshi Tanahashi, has appeared in AEW for marquee events, including Forbidden Door. Known for his ability to tell compelling stories through his matches, Tanahashi has faced top AEW stars like Jon Moxley, bringing his NJPW legacy and star power to cross-promotional dream matches.

Hook
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Rising mid-card star.
Wrestling style: Technical submission-based with suplex-heavy offense.
Signature moves: Redrum (Tazmission), El Camino (Fisherman Suplex), Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: The son of wrestling legend Taz, Hook has become a breakout star in AEW since his debut in late 2021. Known for his stoic demeanor and sharp technical style, he quickly captivated fans on AEW Rampage and Dynamite. He is also celebrated for his undefeated streak early in his career, showcasing dominance with crisp suplexes and submissions.

House of Black
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event faction.
Wrestling style: Striking, technical, and psychological.
Signature moves: Black Mass (Roundhouse Kick), Dante’s Inferno (Fireman’s Carry Slam), Flying Knee Strike.
Brief description: Led by Malakai Black, the House of Black is a dark and enigmatic faction consisting of Malakai, Brody King, Buddy Matthews, and Julia Hart. Since their AEW debut, they have established themselves as a dominant and sinister force, engaging in feuds with top teams and delivering brutal matches. Their unique aesthetic and cohesion have made them a standout stable in AEW's roster.

Hyan
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on striking.
Signature moves: Michinoku Driver, Spinebuster, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Hyan made a few appearances on AEW Dark, showcasing her technical prowess and hard-hitting style. Although she primarily served as enhancement talent, her performances earned positive attention from fans and commentators.

Infinito
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Gimmick enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Infinito Driver (modified Piledriver), Spinning Toe Hold, Rope Walk Arm Drag.
Brief description: Infinito is a masked wrestler whose mysterious and comedic persona brought intrigue during appearances on AEW Dark. While primarily used as a novelty act, his character added entertainment value to AEW programming with a focus on unorthodox technical wrestling.

Inner Circle
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event faction.
Wrestling style: Diverse styles including brawling, technical, and high-flying.
Signature moves: Judas Effect (Chris Jericho), Swanton Bomb (Sammy Guevara), Spinebuster (Jake Hager).
Brief description: The Inner Circle, led by Chris Jericho, was AEW’s first major faction, formed in October 2019. The group included Jake Hager, Sammy Guevara, Santana, and Ortiz, and was pivotal in AEW's early storylines. Known for their dominance and charisma, the faction headlined major feuds, including Stadium Stampede matches and rivalries with The Elite and Pinnacle, before disbanding in 2022.

Invictus Khash
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based.
Signature moves: Saito Suplex, Running Powerslam, Big Boot.
Brief description: Invictus Khash made appearances on AEW Dark, showcasing his hard-hitting style and technical precision. Though primarily featured in enhancement roles, his performances displayed his in-ring potential and earned him recognition among fans.

Iron Savages
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division.
Wrestling style: Power-based and brawling.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Spinebuster/Clothesline Combination, Big Splash.
Brief description: Formerly known as Bear Country, the Iron Savages have appeared in AEW's tag team division, competing in high-impact matches on AEW Dark and Dynamite. Their powerhouse style and imposing presence have made them notable contenders in AEW’s growing tag team scene.

Isiah Kassidy
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Silly String (Assisted Springboard Cutter), Swanton Bomb, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: As one-half of Private Party, Isiah Kassidy has been a prominent member of AEW's tag team division since its inception. Known for his athleticism and crowd-pleasing style, Kassidy has also competed in notable factions like Matt Hardy's Hardy Family Office and The Firm. He remains a dynamic performer, often stealing the spotlight in high-energy tag matches.

Ivelisse
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Desert Eagle (Spinning Heel Kick), Code Red, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Ivelisse competed in AEW's early women's division, including a prominent role in the AEW Women's Tag Team Cup Tournament, which she won alongside Diamante. Known for her hard-hitting style, Ivelisse made an impact during her appearances on Dynamite and AEW Dark, though her tenure with the company was relatively brief.

Izzy James
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Springboard Clothesline, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Izzy James appeared on AEW Dark, where he showcased his agility and high-flying skills. While primarily utilized in enhancement roles, his performances reflected his potential and provided competitive matches against AEW's rising stars.

J. Spade
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based and brawling.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Lariat, Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: J. Spade competed in AEW Dark matches, displaying a mix of power and brawling techniques. His brief appearances allowed him to stand out as a physical competitor, though he was primarily used to elevate other talent.

Jack Evans
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Standing Phoenix Splash, Springboard Corkscrew Kick.
Brief description: A veteran of high-flying wrestling, Jack Evans was part of the tag team The Hybrid 2 with Angelico in AEW. Known for his acrobatic style and innovative offense, Evans regularly competed on Dynamite, Rampage, and AEW Dark. While The Hybrid 2 didn't achieve championship success, their matches were a staple of AEW's undercard and tag team division until Evans left the promotion in 2022.

Jack Perry
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with an emphasis on storytelling.
Signature moves: Snare Trap (Kneeling STF), Top Rope Elbow Drop, Rebound Lariat.
Brief description: Known as Jungle Boy, Jack Perry has been a cornerstone of AEW’s roster since its inception. As part of Jurassic Express with Luchasaurus and Christian Cage, he captured the AEW World Tag Team Championships. Perry has transitioned into singles competition, earning a reputation as a top-tier performer through his emotional storytelling and in-ring versatility.

Jade Cargill
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with athletic agility.
Signature moves: Jaded (Glam Slam), Big Boot, Spear.
Brief description: Jade Cargill was a dominant force in AEW's women's division and the inaugural AEW TBS Champion, holding the title for an unprecedented 508 days. Known for her charisma, athleticism, and undefeated streak, she quickly became a centerpiece of AEW programming. Cargill’s presence extended beyond the ring, as her star power made her one of AEW’s most marketable wrestlers during her tenure.

Jake Atlas
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: LGB-DDT (Cartwheel DDT), Standing Moonsault, Springboard Clothesline.
Brief description: Jake Atlas debuted in AEW in early 2022, competing in notable matches on Rampage and AEW Dark. His impressive athleticism and technical skill stood out during his short stint with the company, though his tenure was cut short due to injury.

Jake Hager
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with an MMA influence.
Signature moves: Hager Bomb (Running Corner Splash), Gutwrench Powerbomb, Ankle Lock.
Brief description: A founding member of the Inner Circle and later aligned with the Jericho Appreciation Society, Jake Hager has been a consistent presence in AEW. As a former MMA fighter, his power-based offense and submission techniques have been integral in high-profile matches, including faction wars and singles bouts. His stoic demeanor and versatility have made him a reliable enforcer within AEW storylines.

Jake St. Patrick
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Dropkick, Backstabber, DDT.
Brief description: Jake St. Patrick made several appearances on AEW Dark, where he showcased his technical skill and agility. Although primarily utilized as enhancement talent, his matches demonstrated his ability to compete against AEW’s rising stars.

Jamie Hayter
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019, 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical.
Signature moves: Hayterade (Ripcord Lariat), Falcon Arrow, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Jamie Hayter has become one of AEW's top stars in the women’s division. Initially debuting in 2019 and returning in 2021, she aligned with Britt Baker as part of the DMD faction. Her breakout came in 2022 when she won the AEW Women’s World Championship, solidifying her as a powerhouse in AEW. Known for her physicality and crowd connection, Hayter is a fan favorite and a key figure in AEW's women's roster.

Janai Kai
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking-based martial arts.
Signature moves: Roundhouse Kick, Snapmare Driver, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Janai Kai made an appearance on AEW programming in a showcase match against Thunder Rosa. Known for her striking-heavy style influenced by martial arts, Kai brought a unique flair to her AEW performance despite her limited appearances.

Jay Lethal
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements and charisma.
Signature moves: Lethal Injection (Hands-free Cutter), Figure-Four Leglock, Lethal Combination.
Brief description: A veteran of the wrestling industry, Jay Lethal debuted in AEW in late 2021. Since then, he has aligned with talents like Satnam Singh and Jeff Jarrett to create memorable moments on AEW programming. Known for his polished in-ring ability and promo skills, Lethal has been involved in key matches across AEW Dynamite, Rampage, and pay-per-view events.

Jay White
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with strong storytelling.
Signature moves: Blade Runner (Swinging Reverse STO), Sleeper Suplex, Kiwi Crusher.
Brief description: The leader of the Bullet Club, Jay White officially joined AEW in 2023, bringing his reputation as one of the best wrestlers in the world. Known for his ability to craft compelling matches and storylines, White has quickly risen as a top competitor in AEW. His charisma and in-ring psychology make him a standout in high-profile matches and feuds.

Jazmin Allure
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Tilt-a-Whirl Headscissors, Tornado DDT, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Jazmin Allure appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing her high-energy performances and aerial maneuvers. Though used primarily in enhancement roles, she impressed fans with her potential and dynamic style during her AEW tenure.

JD Drake
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Drill Bit (Spinning Sit-Out Side Slam), Cannonball Senton, Lariat.
Brief description: JD Drake is a member of The Wingmen faction, regularly competing on AEW Dark and Elevation. Known for his rugged, old-school wrestling style, Drake has also participated in AEW’s tag team division alongside his faction partners. His hard-hitting matches and physical presence make him a reliable competitor in AEW's mid-card scene.

Jimmy Havoc
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Acid Rainmaker (Ripcord Lariat), Tiger Driver '98, Double Stomp.
Brief description: Jimmy Havoc was one of AEW's early roster members, known for his penchant for hardcore matches and violent storytelling. He participated in notable matches, including multi-man brawls and hardcore stipulations, making his mark during AEW’s formative years. Havoc’s run came to an end in 2020 following off-screen controversies.

Joe Alonzo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Springboard DDT, Corkscrew Plancha.
Brief description: Joe Alonzo appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing his agility and high-energy offense in competitive matches against AEW’s rising stars. Although primarily utilized in enhancement roles, Alonzo left a strong impression with his dynamic performances.

Joey Janela
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and high-flying.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Superkick, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Joey Janela was one of AEW's inaugural roster members, bringing his reputation as a hardcore and unpredictable performer. He competed in high-profile matches, including hardcore brawls and the first "Cracker Barrel Clash." Janela's tenure also included memorable partnerships and rivalries, showcasing his versatility and willingness to take risks.

John Silver
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with agility and comedic timing.
Signature moves: Spin Doctor (Airplane Spin Slam), Enzuigiri, German Suplex.
Brief description: A key member of The Dark Order, John Silver has become a fan favorite in AEW due to his mix of comedic charisma and explosive in-ring ability. Often teaming with Alex Reynolds, Silver has competed in tag team matches, faction wars, and multi-man bouts. His infectious energy and crowd connection make him one of AEW's most beloved talents.

John Skyler
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Flatliner, Swinging Neckbreaker, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: John Skyler competed on AEW Dark, demonstrating his technical ability and experience. Though primarily utilized in enhancement roles, Skyler provided solid performances in his limited appearances.

Johnny Elite
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with an emphasis on showmanship.
Signature moves: Starship Pain (Split-Legged Corkscrew Moonsault), Moonlight Drive (Rolling Cutter), Spanish Fly.
Brief description: Johnny Elite, also known as John Morrison, made his AEW debut as a surprise entrant in the Owen Hart Foundation Tournament in 2022. His appearances showcased his athleticism and unique style, competing against top AEW talents in a series of high-profile matches on Dynamite and Rampage.

Jon Moxley
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Brawler with hardcore and technical elements.
Signature moves: Paradigm Shift (Double Underhook DDT), Bulldog Choke, Death Rider.
Brief description: One of AEW’s foundational stars, Jon Moxley has been a dominant force since his debut at Double or Nothing 2019. A multi-time AEW World Champion, he is known for his intensity, passion, and unpredictable style. As a leader of the Blackpool Combat Club, Moxley has been involved in some of AEW's most memorable matches and feuds, becoming a cornerstone of the promotion.

Jora Johl
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a mix of technical offense.
Signature moves: Pump Kick, Side Slam, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: A member of the Andrade Family Office, Jora Johl has made appearances on AEW Dark and Rampage. Representing Indian talent on a global stage, Johl's performances highlight his potential as a power wrestler. Though primarily used in enhancement roles, his alignment with Andrade El Idolo's faction added depth to his AEW tenure.

Jorel Nelson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, German Suplex, Big Boot.
Brief description: Jorel Nelson, often teaming with Royce Isaacs as part of the West Coast Wrecking Crew, has appeared on AEW Dark. The duo’s physical and aggressive style adds depth to AEW's tag team division. While primarily featured in enhancement roles, their performances demonstrate their potential as a formidable tag team.

Josh Woods
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based with an MMA influence.
Signature moves: Pure Chaos (Wheelbarrow Suplex), Ankle Lock, Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: A standout in Ring of Honor and AEW, Josh Woods is known for his technical and hard-hitting style. Often aligned with Tony Nese as part of "Smart" Mark Sterling's group, Woods has competed in AEW and ROH-branded matches, showcasing his grappling expertise in both singles and tag team competition.

Juice Robinson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling with high-impact offense.
Signature moves: Pulp Friction (Unprettier), Left Hand of God (Punch), Sliding Lariat.
Brief description: Juice Robinson joined AEW as a member of Bullet Club Gold, aligning with Jay White to make an immediate impact. Known for his flamboyant personality and brawling style, Juice has participated in high-profile matches and tag team feuds, establishing himself as a key part of AEW's mid-card and faction warfare.

Julia Hart
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Women's division competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Striking with psychological elements.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Running Bulldog, Superkick.
Brief description: Julia Hart began her AEW journey as part of the Varsity Blonds before transitioning into a darker persona as a member of the House of Black. Her alignment with the faction has added depth to her character, as she transitioned into a more menacing role, showcasing her growing in-ring ability and unique presence in AEW's women's division.

Jun Akiyama
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-based.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Running Knee Strike, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: A legendary figure in Japanese wrestling, Jun Akiyama made a special appearance in AEW in 2022, competing against Eddie Kingston in a highly anticipated match. Known for his technical prowess and storied career, Akiyama's involvement brought prestige and a sense of history to AEW programming.

Jungle Boy (Jack Perry)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with an emphasis on storytelling.
Signature moves: Snare Trap (Kneeling STF), Top Rope Elbow Drop, Rebound Lariat.
Brief description: As a founding member of Jurassic Express, Jungle Boy has been a cornerstone of AEW's roster. Known for his athleticism and crowd connection, he has captured the AEW World Tag Team Championship and transitioned into singles competition, delivering standout matches and establishing himself as one of AEW’s rising stars.

Junior Dos Santos
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and MMA-based offense.
Signature moves: Overhand Punch, Spinebuster, Ground-and-Pound.
Brief description: Former UFC Heavyweight Champion Junior Dos Santos made appearances in AEW as part of American Top Team, led by Dan Lambert. His wrestling debut featured a high-profile tag team match, showcasing his natural athleticism and striking ability. Dos Santos' involvement added crossover appeal to AEW programming during a feud with the Inner Circle.

Jurassic Express (Jungle Boy & Luchasaurus)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division and main event competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and power-based.
Signature moves: Thoracic Express (Powerbomb/Elbow Combination), Double Suplex, Assisted Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: One of AEW's most popular tag teams, Jurassic Express captured the AEW World Tag Team Championship, delivering thrilling matches and entertaining fans with their chemistry. The pairing of Jungle Boy's agility and Luchasaurus' power created a unique dynamic that made them a standout team. Their memorable feuds and matches cemented them as one of AEW's premier tag teams.

ustin Law
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with a mix of striking.
Signature moves: Roll-Up, Snap Suplex, Corner Dropkick.
Brief description: Justin Law appeared on AEW Dark during the promotion's early programming. Although primarily utilized in enhancement roles, he provided competitive performances that highlighted AEW's focus on showcasing a variety of independent wrestling talents.

Juventud Guerrera
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Juvi Driver (Death Valley Driver), 450 Splash, Hurricanrana.
Brief description: A legend of lucha libre, Juventud Guerrera made a one-off appearance in AEW as part of Chris Jericho’s "Labors of Jericho" series. His match with Jericho on Dynamite rekindled their WCW rivalry and showcased Juventud’s enduring athleticism and flair.

Karl Anderson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based.
Signature moves: Gun Stun (Cutter), Spinebuster, Rocket Kick.
Brief description: As part of The Good Brothers alongside Doc Gallows, Karl Anderson made appearances in AEW as part of the working relationship between AEW and IMPACT Wrestling. The duo aligned with Kenny Omega and The Elite during their tenure, competing in high-profile tag team and faction matches that highlighted their experience and chemistry.

Karen Jarrett
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Manager.
Wrestling style: N/A.
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: Karen Jarrett appeared in AEW as a manager alongside her husband Jeff Jarrett, contributing to their storyline with comedic timing and classic managerial antics. Her presence added an extra layer of drama and nostalgia to Jeff Jarrett’s matches and promos.

Katsuyori Shibata
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with technical and striking emphasis.
Signature moves: Penalty Kick, Sleeper Hold, STO.
Brief description: The legendary Katsuyori Shibata made his AEW debut as part of the collaboration with New Japan Pro Wrestling (NJPW). His standout match against Orange Cassidy for the AEW All-Atlantic Championship on Rampage showcased his hard-hitting strong style and reminded fans of his status as one of wrestling's most respected competitors.

Kaun
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Faction member and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Fireman’s Carry Slam, Lariat, Double Underhook Suplex.
Brief description: As a member of the Gates of Agony and Prince Nana's Embassy faction, Kaun has appeared on AEW and ROH programming. His combination of power and intensity has made him a valuable part of faction-based storylines and tag team competition.

Kayla Rossi
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Manager and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based with athletic elements.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Spinebuster, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: Kayla Rossi initially debuted in AEW as a manager for Joey Janela but later transitioned to in-ring competition. Known for her impressive physique and athleticism, Rossi competed on AEW Dark, where she showcased her power-based offense.

Kazuchika Okada
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Rainmaker (Short-Arm Lariat), Tombstone Piledriver, Dropkick.
Brief description: One of the most iconic wrestlers in NJPW history, Kazuchika Okada made his AEW debut at the Forbidden Door pay-per-view in 2022. Competing in a four-way match for the IWGP World Heavyweight Championship, Okada brought his signature charisma and world-class in-ring ability to AEW’s global stage, delivering a memorable performance.

Keith Lee
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility and technical elements.
Signature moves: Spirit Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Big Bang Catastrophe (Fireman’s Carry Powerslam), Pounce.
Brief description: Keith Lee debuted in AEW in 2022, quickly establishing himself as one of the promotion's top powerhouses. His charisma and unique combination of strength and agility helped him secure the AEW World Tag Team Championship alongside Swerve Strickland as part of Swerve in Our Glory. Lee continues to deliver standout performances in both singles and tag team competition.


Kelsey Heather
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a focus on showmanship.
Signature moves: Diving Crossbody, Snap Suplex, Running Bulldog.
Brief description: Kelsey Heather appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing her athleticism and energetic performances. While primarily utilized in enhancement roles, her matches reflected her potential and contributed to AEW’s focus on elevating new talent.

Ken Broadway
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: High Kick, Spinebuster, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Ken Broadway made appearances on AEW Dark, displaying a combination of charisma and solid in-ring skills. While his role was limited to enhancement matches, he left an impression with his athleticism and personality.

Kenny Omega
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor and founding member.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying with storytelling emphasis.
Signature moves: One-Winged Angel, V-Trigger (Running Knee Strike), Snap Dragon Suplex.
Brief description: One of AEW’s founding members and its first-ever AEW World Champion, Kenny Omega has been a cornerstone of the promotion. Known for his in-ring mastery and ability to tell compelling stories, Omega has delivered countless classics, including his feuds with Jon Moxley and Hangman Page. As a member of The Elite, Omega has also been pivotal in faction warfare and multi-man tag team matches, solidifying his status as one of the best wrestlers in the world.

KENTA
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with strong style influences.
Signature moves: Go 2 Sleep (Fireman’s Carry Knee Strike), Game Over (Crossface), Busaiku Knee Kick.
Brief description: Representing NJPW, KENTA made his AEW debut in early 2021, appearing in a tag team match alongside Kenny Omega against Jon Moxley and Lance Archer. His presence in AEW highlighted the collaboration between AEW and NJPW, as well as his reputation as one of the most hard-hitting competitors in professional wrestling.

Kevin Blackwood
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking and submission-based.
Signature moves: Boston Crab, Snap Suplex, Penalty Kick.
Brief description: Kevin Blackwood appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing his striking ability and technical skills. Though primarily utilized in enhancement roles, his matches highlighted his potential as a competitor in AEW’s independent-talent-focused programming.

Kevin Knight
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and athletic.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Springboard Crossbody, Frog Splash.
Brief description: As a rising star in NJPW’s LA Dojo, Kevin Knight made appearances in AEW through the Forbidden Door collaboration. Known for his incredible athleticism, Knight showcased his skills in tag team matches, leaving an impression with his dynamic energy and high-flying offense.

Kidd Bandit
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements and a unique flair.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Tornado DDT, Dragonrana.
Brief description: Kidd Bandit appeared on AEW Dark, captivating audiences with their unique look and creative in-ring style. Though primarily used in enhancement roles, Bandit's charisma and innovative moveset gained attention from fans and commentators alike.

Kiera Hogan
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Sliding Dropkick, Superkick, Hip Attack.
Brief description: Kiera Hogan debuted in AEW in 2021 and has since become a regular competitor in the women’s division. Initially aligning with The Baddies faction led by Jade Cargill, Hogan showcased her athleticism and attitude. She has competed in both singles and tag matches, making steady contributions to AEW’s growing women’s roster.

KiLynn King
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent with occasional featured matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: King’s Crown (Spinning Facebuster), Snap Suplex, Big Boot.
Brief description: KiLynn King was a consistent presence on AEW Dark, where her power-based offense and presence earned her a loyal fan following. While primarily used to enhance other talents, King also scored notable victories, demonstrating her potential as a future star.

Kings of the Black Throne (Malakai Black & Brody King)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and psychological elements.
Signature moves: Dante’s Inferno (Fireman’s Carry Slam/Powerbomb Combo), Double Lariat, Flying Knee Strike.
Brief description: A tag team within the House of Black faction, Malakai Black and Brody King dominate AEW’s tag division with their brutal offense and dark aura. As members of the House of Black, they’ve been involved in high-profile matches, blending their intense in-ring style with a menacing aesthetic.

The Kingdom (Matt Taven & Mike Bennett)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitors.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with teamwork emphasis.
Signature moves: Proton Pack (Assisted Swinging Neckbreaker), Superkick, Powerbomb/Elbow Drop Combo.
Brief description: Representing their history in ROH, The Kingdom joined AEW in 2022 and aligned with the Trustbusters. Known for their polished tag team maneuvers and storytelling, Taven and Bennett bring experience and cohesiveness to AEW’s tag team division.

Kip Sabian
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying with a focus on showmanship.
Signature moves: Deathly Hallows (Swinging Fisherman Neckbreaker), Springboard Dropkick, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: One of AEW's inaugural roster members, Kip Sabian has been a versatile competitor known for his flashy in-ring style and eccentric personality. After a hiatus due to injury, Sabian returned in 2022 with a revamped persona, wearing a mysterious box on his head. His character evolution and creative storytelling have made him a compelling figure in AEW.

Komander
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Tightrope Walk Moonsault, Springboard 450 Splash, Tornillo Dive.
Brief description: Komander, known for his breathtaking high-flying maneuvers, debuted in AEW during the Face of the Revolution ladder match in 2023. His ability to perform tightrope-style moves on the ropes captivated fans, making him a standout attraction in AEW’s growing lucha scene.

Konosuke Takeshita
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with strong style influences.
Signature moves: Jumping Knee Strike, German Suplex, Blue Thunder Bomb.
Brief description: A standout talent from DDT Pro Wrestling, Konosuke Takeshita has made a significant impact in AEW with his blend of power, athleticism, and charisma. Competing in high-profile matches on Dynamite and Rampage, Takeshita has earned widespread acclaim for his performances against top-tier talent, solidifying his status as a future star.

Kota Ibushi
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with technical elements.
Signature moves: Kamigoye (Knee Strike), Golden Star Bomb, Moonsault.
Brief description: As one of the most decorated Japanese wrestlers of his generation, Kota Ibushi debuted in AEW during the Blood & Guts match in 2023. His history with Kenny Omega and reputation as a dynamic performer brought excitement to his AEW appearances, showcasing his explosive offense and unique charisma.

Kris Statlander
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based with agility and technical elements.
Signature moves: Big Bang Theory (Tombstone Piledriver), 450 Splash, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Kris Statlander, known for her extraterrestrial persona, has been a major force in AEW’s women’s division. Overcoming multiple injuries, she captured the TBS Championship in 2023, solidifying her as one of AEW's top stars. Her blend of strength, athleticism, and crowd connection makes her a standout in both singles and tag team competition.

Kyle Fletcher
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with power elements.
Signature moves: Grimstone (Tombstone Piledriver), Assisted Cutter, Superkick.
Brief description: Kyle Fletcher, one-half of Aussie Open, made his AEW debut alongside Mark Davis, bringing their established reputation as one of the best tag teams in the world. Fletcher has competed in both tag team and singles matches, impressing with his athleticism, technical skill, and charisma.

Kyle O’Reilly
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Submission-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Armageddon (Armbar), Brainbuster, Rebound Lariat.
Brief description: A former member of the Undisputed Elite, Kyle O’Reilly debuted in AEW alongside Adam Cole and Bobby Fish. Known for his MMA-inspired style, O’Reilly competed in both singles and tag team matches, showcasing his in-ring intelligence and striking ability. Injury temporarily sidelined him in 2022, but his AEW tenure has been impactful.

La Facción Ingobernable (Rush, Dralístico, and Preston Vance)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Faction and mid-card competitors.
Wrestling style: Striking, lucha libre, and power-based offense.
Signature moves: Bull’s Horns (Rush’s Running Dropkick), Dralístico’s Tornillo Dive, Vance’s Spinebuster.
Brief description: La Facción Ingobernable is a faction led by Rush, featuring Dralístico and Preston Vance. They have established themselves as a dominant force in AEW with their mix of lucha libre flair and brute strength. Their matches on Dynamite and Rampage often showcase their cohesion and aggressive style, creating standout moments in AEW’s tag team and faction-based storylines.

Lance Archer
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling and agility.
Signature moves: Blackout (Inverted Crucifix Slam), EBD Claw, Chokeslam.
Brief description: Lance Archer, known as "The Murderhawk Monster," has been a dominant force in AEW since debuting in 2020. Managed by Jake "The Snake" Roberts, Archer has competed in high-profile matches, including championship bouts and violent stipulation matches. His intimidating presence, surprising agility, and relentless aggression make him one of AEW’s most formidable competitors.

Laredo Kid
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Laredo Fly (Springboard Cutter), Frog Splash, Moonsault.
Brief description: A standout in the lucha libre scene, Laredo Kid has appeared in AEW as part of cross-promotional matches with AAA. His dynamic offense and breathtaking aerial maneuvers have made him a thrilling addition to AEW programming, particularly in tag team and multi-man matches.

Las Super Ranas
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Comedy tag team.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Dropkick, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Las Super Ranas (portrayed by FTR in masks) appeared as part of a comedic storyline during their feud with the Lucha Brothers. The disguised FTR captured the AAA Tag Team Championships under this alias, blending humor with high-quality wrestling in a memorable AEW segment.

Le Sex Gods (Chris Jericho & Sammy Guevara)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction members.
Wrestling style: Striking, high-flying, and technical.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Spanish Fly (Sammy), Codebreaker (Jericho).
Brief description: A prominent tag team within the Inner Circle, Le Sex Gods combined Chris Jericho's experience and charisma with Sammy Guevara’s high-flying athleticism. They were involved in major storylines, including feuds with The Elite and The Pinnacle, delivering entertaining promos and standout matches on AEW programming.

Lee Johnson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and tag team specialist.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Blue Thunder Bomb, Superkick.
Brief description: Known as "Big Shotty," Lee Johnson began as a promising prospect on AEW Dark before joining The Nightmare Family. His athleticism and impressive in-ring growth led to notable performances on Dynamite and Rampage, including his partnership with Brock Anderson and involvement in faction-based storylines.

Lee Moriarty
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission and striking elements.
Signature moves: Border City Stretch (Arm-Trap Crossface), European Uppercut, Springboard Arm Drag.
Brief description: A rising star in AEW, Lee Moriarty has made a name for himself with his technical prowess and creative submissions. Often showcased on Dynamite and Rampage, Moriarty joined Stokely Hathaway’s The Firm, aligning himself with a group of talented heels while maintaining a standout role in singles competition.

Leila Grey
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking.
Signature moves: Running Bulldog, Snap Suplex, Crossbody.
Brief description: Leila Grey initially appeared as enhancement talent on AEW Dark before joining The Baddies faction alongside Jade Cargill. Her alignment with Cargill elevated her status, allowing her to gain more exposure and develop her character while competing in AEW’s women’s division.

Leon Ruffin
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Diving Senton, Dropkick.
Brief description: Formerly an NXT North American Champion, Leon Ruffin appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing his underdog spirit and quick-paced offense. His matches highlighted his agility and ability to connect with audiences, even in limited appearances.

Leva Bates
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and comedic character.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Suplex, Backstabber, Dropkick.
Brief description: Known as "The Librarian," Leva Bates was one of AEW's earliest signings. While often utilized in comedic segments, Bates also competed on AEW Dark and played a behind-the-scenes role in talent development. Her quirky persona and dedication made her a memorable figure in AEW's formative years.

Leyla Hirsch
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission-based offense.
Signature moves: Cross Armbreaker, Moonsault Press, German Suplex.
Brief description: Leyla Hirsch brought a unique mix of amateur wrestling and technical precision to AEW. Known for her legitimate grappling skills, she competed in notable matches on AEW Dynamite and Rampage, including bouts with Thunder Rosa and Kris Statlander. Injuries paused her momentum, but she made a significant impact during her tenure.

Lil Swole
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Spear, Running Powerslam, Backbreaker.
Brief description: Lil Swole, also known as Nicole Savoy, appeared in AEW during the AEW Women's Tag Team Cup Tournament: The Deadly Draw. She teamed with Big Swole as part of the tournament, showcasing her powerful in-ring style and strong chemistry with her partner.

Lio Rush
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Final Hour (Frog Splash), Rush Hour (Springboard Stunner), Come Up (Springboard Cutter).
Brief description: Lio Rush made a memorable debut as the Joker in the 2021 Casino Battle Royale at Double or Nothing. Known for his agility and explosive offense, Rush later aligned with Dante Martin to deliver standout performances in AEW's tag team division. Although his AEW run was brief, he made a strong impression with his dynamic matches.

Lord Crewe
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Brawler with power-based offense.
Signature moves: Pumphandle Slam, Discus Lariat, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Lord Crewe made appearances on AEW Dark, showcasing his hard-hitting style in competitive matches against AEW's rising stars. Though primarily used in enhancement roles, his presence and rugged look left an impression during his time on AEW programming.

Lucha Brothers (Penta El Zero Miedo & Rey Fénix)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Fear Factor (Spike Piledriver), Double Superkick, Assisted Destroyer.
Brief description: The Lucha Brothers have been one of AEW’s most decorated tag teams, winning the AEW World Tag Team Championship and delivering some of the company’s most thrilling matches. Known for their innovative offense and incredible chemistry, they’ve faced top teams like The Young Bucks and FTR, cementing their legacy in AEW and beyond.

Luchasaurus
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Tail Whip (Spinning Heel Kick), Fossilizer (Modified Powerslam), Chokeslam.
Brief description: Luchasaurus, a key member of Jurassic Express, has combined his impressive size and agility to become a fan favorite. Alongside Jungle Boy, he captured the AEW World Tag Team Championship and was a central figure in AEW’s tag division. Since transitioning to a darker persona under Christian Cage’s guidance, Luchasaurus has become a dominant singles competitor.

Luke Gallows
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based brawling.
Signature moves: Magic Killer (with Karl Anderson), Gallows Pole (Choke Bomb), Big Boot.
Brief description: As part of The Good Brothers, Luke Gallows appeared in AEW during their partnership with IMPACT Wrestling and alignment with Kenny Omega and The Elite. His presence in AEW’s tag and faction-based storylines added depth to high-profile matches and rivalries involving The Elite.

Luther
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and enhancement competitor.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling.
Signature moves: Luther Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Diving Knee Drop, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Known as "The Original Death Dealer," Luther has been a consistent figure in AEW, primarily as part of Chaos Project alongside Serpentico. Specializing in hardcore-style matches, Luther has participated in tag team and faction-based bouts on AEW Dark and Dynamite, often providing a unique and chaotic element to AEW programming.

Madi Maxx
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical.
Signature moves: Snap Suplex, Running Bulldog, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Madi Maxx has appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing her energetic personality and in-ring skills. Although primarily utilized in enhancement roles, her performances reflect her potential and add depth to AEW’s women’s division programming.

Madi Wrenkowski
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Reality Check (Cutter), Snap Suplex, Running Elbow Strike.
Brief description: Madi Wrenkowski has appeared on AEW Dark and Elevation, showcasing her growing in-ring skills and charisma. Known for her confident personality, she has become a regular fixture in AEW’s efforts to spotlight emerging talent in the women’s division.

Madison Rayne
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and coach.
Wrestling style: Technical and veteran-based psychology.
Signature moves: Rayne Check (Cross-Rayneck Cutter), Ripcord Cutter, Running Neckbreaker.
Brief description: A decorated veteran, Madison Rayne joined AEW as both an in-ring competitor and a coach for the women’s division. She has competed on Dynamite, Rampage, and AEW Dark, bringing her experience and leadership to elevate the division while mentoring younger talents.

Maki Itoh
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Kokeshi (Diving Headbutt), DDT, Boston Crab.
Brief description: Maki Itoh, the self-proclaimed "Cutest in the World," has appeared in AEW through its partnership with Tokyo Joshi Pro Wrestling (TJPW). Known for her charismatic antics and a mix of comedy and hard-hitting offense, she gained popularity with AEW audiences during tournaments like the AEW Women’s World Title Eliminator.

Malakai Black
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Striking and psychological.
Signature moves: Black Mass (Spinning Heel Kick), Flying Knee Strike, Modified Dragon Sleeper.
Brief description: As the leader of the House of Black, Malakai Black has become one of AEW’s most enigmatic and dominant figures. Debuting in 2021, Black’s unique character and devastating in-ring style have made him a standout, leading faction members like Brody King, Buddy Matthews, and Julia Hart in high-profile storylines and matches across AEW programming.

Mance Warner
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with hardcore elements.
Signature moves: Lariat, DDT, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Mance Warner made a one-off appearance in AEW in 2022, competing against Jon Moxley in a brutal, hard-hitting match on Rampage. Known for his Southern brawling style and rugged charisma, Warner brought his unique energy to AEW, leaving a lasting impression despite his limited tenure.

Marcus Kross
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Springboard Crossbody, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Marcus Kross appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing his agility and dynamic offense. Primarily utilized in enhancement roles, Kross stood out with his colorful personality and unique look, earning attention from fans during his AEW matches.

Marina Shafir
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Submission-based with an MMA influence.
Signature moves: Triangle Choke, Judo Throw, Rear Naked Choke.
Brief description: Marina Shafir debuted in AEW as a force in the women’s division, known for her legitimate MMA background and focus on submission-based wrestling. She has competed on Dynamite, Rampage, and AEW Dark, often aligning with Nyla Rose to deliver dominant tag team performances.

Mark Briscoe
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical and high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Froggy Bow (Diving Elbow Drop), Cutthroat Driver, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Following the tragic passing of his brother Jay Briscoe, Mark Briscoe transitioned into AEW from ROH, delivering heartfelt and powerful performances. A legend in tag team wrestling as one-half of the Briscoe Brothers, Mark has also shown his ability to excel as a singles competitor, quickly earning the respect of AEW fans and peers.

Mark Davis
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Grimstone (Tombstone Piledriver), Assisted Cutter, Lariat.
Brief description: One-half of Aussie Open with Kyle Fletcher, Mark Davis has brought his hard-hitting style to AEW’s tag team division. Competing in high-profile tag matches, Davis and Fletcher have become a force in AEW, showcasing their strength, teamwork, and international acclaim.

"Smart" Mark Sterling
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Manager and comedic character.
Wrestling style: N/A (primarily managerial).
Signature moves: Legal Maneuver (Roll-Up), Sleeper Hold (rare in-ring appearances).
Brief description: "Smart" Mark Sterling has become a prominent manager in AEW, representing talents like Jade Cargill, Tony Nese, and Josh Woods. Known for his legal and managerial antics, Sterling adds humor and storytelling to AEW’s programming, often finding himself at odds with fan-favorite wrestlers.

Marko Stunt
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor and comedic character.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, 450 Splash, Hurricanrana.
Brief description: Marko Stunt was a member of Jurassic Express alongside Jungle Boy and Luchasaurus, where he brought a unique underdog dynamic to AEW's tag team division. Known for his small stature and fearless in-ring style, Stunt became a fan favorite for his energetic performances and willingness to take big risks in the ring.

Marq Quen
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and acrobatic.
Signature moves: Silly String (Assisted Springboard Cutter), 450 Splash, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: As one-half of Private Party, Marq Quen has been a key player in AEW's tag team division. Known for his incredible athleticism and crowd-pleasing style, Quen has delivered standout performances in high-profile matches, including the team's victory over The Young Bucks early in AEW’s history. Private Party has also been featured in notable factions, including Matt Hardy's Hardy Family Office and The Firm.

Mascara Dorada (Gran Metalik)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Dorada Driver (Reverse Michinoku Driver), Springboard Elbow Drop, Rope-Walk Splash.
Brief description: Mascara Dorada made his AEW debut in 2022, showcasing his exceptional lucha libre skills in appearances on AEW Dark and Rampage. Known for his precision and athleticism, Dorada brought his international experience to AEW’s growing roster of world-class talents.

Matt Cardona
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Radio Silence (Leaping Leg Lariat), Rough Ryder (Leg Lariat), Implant DDT.
Brief description: Matt Cardona, formerly Zack Ryder, appeared in AEW during the summer of 2020, aligning with Cody Rhodes in a series of tag matches. Although his tenure was brief, his appearances drew significant attention as he brought his charisma and WWE experience to AEW.

Matt Hardy
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor, tag team wrestler, and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Brawling with high-flying and technical elements.
Signature moves: Twist of Fate, Side Effect, Moonsault.
Brief description: Matt Hardy debuted in AEW in 2020, initially showcasing his "Broken" persona. Over time, he transitioned into various roles, including the leader of factions like The Hardy Family Office. Hardy later teamed with his brother Jeff Hardy in a nostalgic run, delivering memorable moments and matches while helping develop younger talent.

Matt Jackson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver, Indytaker, Superkick.
Brief description: One-half of The Young Bucks alongside his brother Nick Jackson, Matt Jackson is a foundational member of AEW. Known for their show-stealing tag matches, The Young Bucks have been multi-time AEW World Tag Team Champions and are integral to AEW’s tag team division and faction wars, including their leadership role in The Elite.

Matt Lee (Angelo Parker)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical and comedic.
Signature moves: Assisted Suplex, Corner Lariat, Snap DDT.
Brief description: Matt Lee, part of the tag team 2point0 and later the Jericho Appreciation Society, has brought energy and personality to AEW’s tag team division. Known for his humor and in-ring antics, Lee excels in both entertaining promos and competitive matches.

Matt Menard
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Brawling with comedic and technical elements.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Lariat, Double Team Suplex.
Brief description: As Matt Lee’s tag team partner and a key member of the Jericho Appreciation Society, Matt Menard has contributed significantly to AEW’s tag team and faction storylines. His over-the-top personality and promo skills have made him a standout in comedic and intense segments alike.

Matt Sydal
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Lightning Spiral, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Matt Sydal debuted in AEW at All Out 2020, bringing his years of experience and high-flying expertise to the roster. Competing in both singles and tag team matches, Sydal has delivered exciting performances on AEW Dynamite and Dark, often serving as a mentor figure to younger talents like Dante Martin.

Matt Taven
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-based.
Signature moves: Climax (Headlock Driver), Frog Splash, Superkick.
Brief description: Matt Taven, a veteran of ROH, made his AEW debut as part of The Kingdom alongside Mike Bennett and Maria Kanellis. The group brought their established tag team chemistry and storytelling to AEW, competing in high-profile tag team matches and faction-based storylines on AEW and ROH programming.

Max Caster
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Mic Drop (Diving Elbow Drop), Brainbuster, Fisherman Suplex.
Brief description: One-half of The Acclaimed, Max Caster is known for his charismatic freestyle raps and entertaining entrances. Alongside Anthony Bowens, The Acclaimed rose to become one of AEW’s most popular tag teams, winning the AEW World Tag Team Championships in 2022. Caster’s blend of humor and solid in-ring skills makes him a standout performer in AEW’s tag team division.

Mazzerati
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Snapmare Driver, Running Elbow Strike, Modified Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Mazzerati appeared on AEW Dark, competing against established talents in the women’s division. Her performances highlighted her striking ability and potential, contributing to AEW’s efforts to spotlight a diverse roster of talent.

Mei Suruga
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Propeller Clutch, Springboard Crossbody, Rolling Cradle.
Brief description: Mei Suruga, a standout from the Japanese promotion Gatoh Move, participated in AEW’s Women’s World Title Eliminator Tournament. Her unique style and bubbly personality endeared her to AEW audiences, showcasing the depth of international talent in the women’s division.

Mel
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Chokeslam, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Mel was a member of The Nightmare Collective, a short-lived faction led by Brandi Rhodes. Known for her imposing presence and strength, she participated in faction-based storylines before the group’s disbandment in 2020.

Men of the Year (Scorpio Sky & Ethan Page)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with aerial elements.
Signature moves: Ego’s Edge (Ethan Page), TKO (Scorpio Sky), Assisted Cutter.
Brief description: Men of the Year, a tag team comprised of Scorpio Sky and Ethan Page, was a prominent feature on AEW programming. Often aligned with Dan Lambert and American Top Team, they were involved in high-profile feuds and matches, including battles with Chris Jericho and Sammy Guevara. Their combination of charisma and technical skills made them a strong presence in AEW’s tag team scene.

Mercedes Martinez
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and ROH Women’s World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-based.
Signature moves: Brass City Sleeper (Dragon Sleeper), Fisherman Buster, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Mercedes Martinez joined AEW in late 2021 and quickly became a dominant presence in the women’s division. She captured the ROH Women’s World Championship and defended it on both AEW and ROH programming. Known for her veteran experience and hard-hitting style, Martinez remains a cornerstone of AEW’s partnership with ROH.

Metalik (Mascara Dorada)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Dorada Driver (Reverse Michinoku Driver), Springboard Elbow Drop, Rope-Walk Splash.
Brief description: Known internationally for his lucha libre expertise, Metalik (formerly Gran Metalik in WWE) appeared in AEW to bring his dynamic offense and aerial mastery to the ring. Competing on Rampage and AEW Dark, Metalik showcased his ability to captivate audiences with breathtaking maneuvers.

Michael Nakazawa
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and comedic character.
Wrestling style: Comedic with technical elements.
Signature moves: Ultimate Venom Arm, Oil Slip (comedic use of baby oil), Running Elbow Strike.
Brief description: Michael Nakazawa is a comedic character in AEW, often aligned with Kenny Omega and The Elite. Known for his antics involving baby oil and over-the-top comedy, Nakazawa has competed in both singles and tag matches, providing entertainment and humor on AEW programming.

Mike Bennett
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-based.
Signature moves: Hail Mary (Piledriver/Neckbreaker Combo with Matt Taven), Spinebuster, Boston Crab.
Brief description: Mike Bennett debuted in AEW alongside Matt Taven and Maria Kanellis as part of The Kingdom. With years of tag team experience, Bennett’s technical prowess and chemistry with Taven have made them a formidable presence in AEW’s tag division and in ROH-branded matches.

Mike Santana (Santana)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (with Ortiz), Cutter, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Santana, alongside Ortiz as Proud & Powerful, has been a key part of AEW’s tag team division and faction warfare. As members of the Inner Circle, Santana and Ortiz were featured in high-profile feuds and multi-man matches. Their hard-hitting style and intensity have earned them recognition as one of AEW’s most popular tag teams.

Mike Sydal
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and enhancement competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Standing Moonsault, Springboard Arm Drag, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: Mike Sydal, the younger brother of Matt Sydal, appeared on AEW Dark and competed in tag team matches alongside his brother. Known for his athleticism and aerial offense, Mike brought energy to his matches and added depth to AEW’s tag team programming.

Mike Verna
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Running Powerslam, Delayed Vertical Suplex.
Brief description: Mike Verna appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing his strength and presence in competitive matches against established AEW talents. While primarily used in enhancement roles, Verna left a solid impression with his polished in-ring work.

Minoru Suzuki
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on submissions and striking.
Signature moves: Gotch-Style Piledriver, Sleeper Hold, Penalty Kick.
Brief description: A legend of Japanese wrestling, Minoru Suzuki has made sporadic appearances in AEW, most notably in matches against Jon Moxley and Bryan Danielson. His reputation for brutal strikes and submissions made his AEW appearances must-see events, adding prestige and intensity to AEW programming.

Miranda Alize
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Drive-By Kick, Tilt-a-Whirl DDT, Crossface.
Brief description: Miranda Alize competed on AEW Dark, showcasing her dynamic offense and aerial skills. A standout in independent promotions, Alize brought energy and athleticism to her AEW matches, even in limited appearances.

Miro
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (sporadic appearances due to injury).
Position on the card: Main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Game Over (Camel Clutch), Machka Kick, Samoan Drop.
Brief description: Debuting in 2020, Miro established himself as a dominant force in AEW, capturing the TNT Championship and delivering a memorable reign as "The Redeemer." Known for his intensity and charisma, Miro has been involved in high-profile feuds and matches, solidifying himself as one of AEW's top powerhouses.

Misterioso
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Springboard Moonsault, Arm Drag Takedown.
Brief description: Representing lucha libre, Misterioso competed on AEW Dark, showcasing his aerial prowess and lucha style. Though primarily used in enhancement roles, his dynamic in-ring abilities added depth to AEW's matches.

Miyu Yamashita
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking with technical elements.
Signature moves: Skull Kick (Roundhouse Kick), Attitude Adjustment, Springboard Knee Strike.
Brief description: Representing Tokyo Joshi Pro Wrestling (TJPW), Miyu Yamashita made her AEW debut as part of the AEW Women’s World Championship Eliminator. Known as "The Pink Striker," Yamashita brought her hard-hitting offense and international reputation to AEW, showcasing her skills in high-profile matches.

MJF (Maxwell Jacob Friedman)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor and AEW World Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on storytelling and psychology.
Signature moves: Salt of the Earth (Fujiwara Armbar), Heatseeker (Rope-Assisted Piledriver), South Hamptons Plunge.
Brief description: One of AEW’s top stars, MJF has cemented himself as one of wrestling’s most compelling characters and performers. Known for his sharp wit and exceptional promo skills, MJF has been a cornerstone of AEW since its inception. He captured the AEW World Championship in 2022, elevating himself as the face of the promotion and delivering critically acclaimed feuds and matches.

Mogul Affiliates (Swerve Strickland’s Faction)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (rebranded to Mogul Embassy in 2023).
Position on the card: Faction and mid-card competitors.
Wrestling style: Striking, technical, and power-based offense.
Signature moves: House Call (Swerve’s Kick), Double Powerbomb, Flying Knee.
Brief description: Initially led by Swerve Strickland, Mogul Affiliates formed in 2022, focusing on faction-based storytelling. The group evolved into the Mogul Embassy in 2023, aligning with Prince Nana and blending talents from AEW and ROH. Their intimidating presence and coordinated tactics have made them a notable force in AEW’s faction landscape.

Mogul Embassy (Mogul Affiliates & The Embassy)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Faction and tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical and psychological elements.
Signature moves: Tower of Doom, Assisted Lariat, Brainbuster.
Brief description: The Mogul Embassy combined Swerve Strickland’s Mogul Affiliates with Prince Nana’s Embassy to create a dominant faction. Featuring talents like Brian Cage, Toa Liona, and Kaun, the group has competed across AEW and ROH programming, excelling in faction wars and delivering standout tag team performances.

Motor City Machine Guns (Alex Shelley & Chris Sabin)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with innovative tag maneuvers.
Signature moves: Made in Detroit (Neckbreaker/Frog Splash Combo), Skull and Bones (Diving Neckbreaker), Double Superkick.
Brief description: The Motor City Machine Guns appeared at the 2022 All Out pay-per-view as part of a six-man tag match, teaming with Jay Lethal against FTR and Wardlow. Known as one of the most influential tag teams in wrestling, their AEW debut brought prestige and excitement, showcasing their seamless teamwork and innovative offense.

Mr. Brodie Lee
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and agility.
Signature moves: Discus Lariat, Big Boot, Sit-Out Powerbomb.
Brief description: Known as "The Exalted One," Mr. Brodie Lee was the leader of The Dark Order and a dominant force in AEW. He captured the TNT Championship in 2020, delivering an iconic squash victory over Cody Rhodes. Brodie’s charisma and in-ring talent left an indelible mark on AEW before his tragic passing later that year, and he is remembered as one of the company’s most beloved figures.

Musa
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard DDT, Dropkick, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Musa competed on AEW Dark in 2020, showcasing his aerial abilities and quick offense. While primarily utilized in enhancement roles, he provided competitive matches and added variety to AEW's early roster of independent talent.

Natural Nightmares (Dustin Rhodes & QT Marshall)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2021 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Final Reckoning (Dustin’s Lifting Reverse DDT), QT Cutter, Assisted Powerslam.
Brief description: The Natural Nightmares were a tag team formed early in AEW’s history, representing The Nightmare Family. Known for their solid teamwork and veteran experience, they competed in AEW’s tag team division, facing top teams such as The Young Bucks and FTR. Their partnership ended when QT Marshall turned heel and formed The Factory.

Naturally Limitless (Dustin Rhodes & Keith Lee)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based with agility and technical elements.
Signature moves: Limitless Slam (Keith’s Fireman’s Carry Slam), Bulldog (Dustin), Assisted Powerslam.
Brief description: Naturally Limitless is a tag team pairing Dustin Rhodes and Keith Lee. The duo debuted in 2023, bringing a mix of veteran experience and raw power to AEW’s tag division. Their team has been well-received for its unique blend of strength and charisma.

Nick Comoroto
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Spinebuster, Swinging Backbreaker.
Brief description: Nick Comoroto debuted in AEW as part of The Factory, a faction led by QT Marshall. Known for his imposing size and strength, Comoroto has been featured in faction-based matches and as a powerhouse competitor on AEW Dark and Rampage.

Nick Jackson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver, Indytaker, Superkick Party.
Brief description: One-half of The Young Bucks alongside his brother Matt Jackson, Nick Jackson has been a cornerstone of AEW’s tag team division. As a multi-time AEW World Tag Team Champion, Nick’s high-flying offense and innovative maneuvers have made The Young Bucks one of the most influential tag teams in wrestling. They are also integral members of The Elite faction, driving major storylines in AEW.

Nick Wayne
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Rising mid-card competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Wayne’s World (Springboard Cutter), Frog Splash, Moonsault DDT.
Brief description: Nick Wayne debuted in AEW in 2023 after signing with the company as one of its youngest recruits. Known for his agility and advanced skills at a young age, Wayne has quickly impressed fans and established himself as a rising star, competing in matches against some of AEW's top talents.

Nicole Matthews
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Vancouver Maneuver (Modified Neckbreaker), Spinning Back Elbow, Camel Clutch.
Brief description: Nicole Matthews made a special appearance in AEW during the 2023 Canadian episodes of Dynamite. As a veteran of the independent wrestling scene, she showcased her experience and technical prowess in a competitive match that highlighted her skills.

Nightmare Collective
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (short-lived faction).
Position on the card: Faction with mid-card competitors.
Wrestling style: Power and psychological.
Signature moves: Mel’s Big Boot, Awesome Kong’s Implant Buster, Brandi’s Stiletto Shot (comedic interference).
Brief description: The Nightmare Collective, led by Brandi Rhodes, included Mel, Awesome Kong, and briefly Luther. The faction focused on psychological and supernatural themes but was disbanded after a short run due to mixed reception. Their segments featured heavy character work and served as a developmental storyline for Brandi Rhodes and others involved.

Nightmare Family
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Faction featuring mid-card to main event competitors.
Wrestling style: Mixed styles including technical, striking, and power-based offense.
Signature moves: Cody Rhodes’ Cross Rhodes, Dustin Rhodes’ Final Reckoning, Lee Johnson’s Frog Splash.
Brief description: The Nightmare Family, led by Cody Rhodes, included members like Dustin Rhodes, QT Marshall, and Lee Johnson. It was a faction dedicated to camaraderie and mentorship, often competing in tag and multi-man matches. The group’s storylines explored loyalty and betrayal, particularly with QT Marshall’s departure to form The Factory.

Nightmare Sisters (Brandi Rhodes & Allie)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Snapmare Driver (Allie), Stiletto Shot (Brandi).
Brief description: The Nightmare Sisters were an unlikely pairing of Brandi Rhodes and Allie, formed during AEW’s Women’s Tag Team Cup Tournament: The Deadly Draw. The duo’s storyline focused on their mismatched personalities, which they used to comedic and competitive effect in their short-lived tag team run.

Nyla Rose
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Beast Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Guillotine Leg Drop, Spear.
Brief description: A cornerstone of AEW’s women’s division, Nyla Rose was the first-ever transgender wrestler to win a major U.S. championship when she captured the AEW Women’s World Championship in 2020. Known as "The Native Beast," Rose has been a dominant force in AEW, engaging in high-profile feuds with top stars like Hikaru Shida, Jade Cargill, and Britt Baker.


Orange Cassidy
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic and technical elements.
Signature moves: Orange Punch (Superman Punch), Beach Break (Fireman’s Carry Driver), Sloth Kicks.
Brief description: Orange Cassidy has become one of AEW’s most beloved and unique stars. Known for his laid-back demeanor and comedic approach, Cassidy blends his character work with exceptional in-ring ability. He was the inaugural AEW International Champion (formerly All-Atlantic Champion) and has consistently delivered standout matches and feuds, solidifying his place as a fan favorite.

Ortiz
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (with Santana), Falcon Arrow, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Ortiz, as part of Proud & Powerful with Santana, has been a key figure in AEW’s tag team division and faction-based storylines. A former member of the Inner Circle, Ortiz has competed in high-profile feuds and matches, showcasing his charisma and hard-hitting style. Recently, he has also transitioned to singles competition.

Outcasts (Saraya, Toni Storm, Ruby Soho)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Faction and main event competitors in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Storm Zero (Toni Storm), No Future Kick (Ruby Soho), PTO (Saraya).
Brief description: The Outcasts formed in 2023 as a rebellious faction of former WWE stars, aiming to take over AEW’s women’s division. Their feud with AEW homegrown talents like Britt Baker and Jamie Hayter has been a focal point of Dynamite and Rampage, delivering intense promos and physical rivalries.

PAC
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Black Arrow (Corkscrew Shooting Star Press), Brutalizer (Crossface Submission), Superkick.
Brief description: PAC has been a dominant force in AEW since its inception, competing in high-profile matches and being a key member of the Death Triangle faction alongside Rey Fénix and Penta El Zero Miedo. PAC was the inaugural AEW All-Atlantic Champion, showcasing his versatility and intensity in matches that blend athleticism with ferocity.

Paige VanZant
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: MMA-based striking and grappling.
Signature moves: Roundhouse Kick, Armbar, Ground-and-Pound.
Brief description: Former UFC fighter Paige VanZant debuted in AEW as part of American Top Team, led by Dan Lambert. She competed in a mixed-tag match at Double or Nothing 2022, teaming with Ethan Page and Scorpio Sky against Sammy Guevara, Tay Melo, and Frankie Kazarian. Her MMA background brought legitimacy and excitement to her AEW appearances.

Parker Boudreaux
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Chokeslam, Running Shoulder Block.
Brief description: Parker Boudreaux debuted in AEW as part of the Mogul Affiliates faction led by Swerve Strickland. Known for his imposing size and strength, Boudreaux has competed in tag team and faction-based matches, showcasing his potential as a powerhouse in AEW’s mid-card scene.

Pat Buck
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (sporadic appearances, primarily backstage).
Position on the card: Producer and occasional on-screen talent.
Wrestling style: N/A (primarily non-wrestling role).
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: Pat Buck joined AEW in a backstage role as a producer in 2022, contributing to match development and overall programming quality. While primarily working behind the scenes, Buck has occasionally appeared on-screen in support of talent or as part of AEW storylines.

Penta El Zero Miedo (Pentagon Jr., Penta Oscuro)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event tag team competitor and mid-card singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with striking and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Fear Factor (Package Piledriver), Double Foot Stomp, Slingblade.
Brief description: Penta El Zero Miedo, also known as Pentagon Jr. and Penta Oscuro, is one-half of the Lucha Brothers alongside Rey Fénix. A staple of AEW’s tag team division, the Lucha Brothers captured the AEW World Tag Team Championships in 2021. Penta has also excelled in singles competition, showcasing his intense character work and hard-hitting style, particularly under the "Penta Oscuro" persona.

Peter Avalon
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and comedic character.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Marti-Knees (Running Double Knees), Full Nelson Slam, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Peter Avalon has been a comedic fixture in AEW, known for his roles as "The Librarian" and later as part of The Wingmen faction. While primarily used in enhancement roles, Avalon’s over-the-top antics and entertaining promos have made him a memorable character in AEW programming.

Pineapple Pete
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical.
Signature moves: Diving Crossbody, Superkick, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: Known for his colorful personality and nickname given by Chris Jericho, Pineapple Pete (real name Suge D) appeared on AEW Dynamite and Dark during AEW’s early pandemic-era programming. His feud with Jericho, while lighthearted, earned him significant attention and showcased his charisma and in-ring ability.

The Pinnacle
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (faction appearances).
Position on the card: Main event faction.
Wrestling style: Striking, technical, and power-based.
Signature moves: FTR’s Big Rig, Wardlow’s Powerbomb Symphony, MJF’s Salt of the Earth (Fujiwara Armbar).
Brief description: The Pinnacle, led by MJF and featuring Wardlow, FTR, Shawn Spears, and Tully Blanchard, was one of AEW’s dominant factions. Their high-profile feud with Chris Jericho’s Inner Circle included memorable matches like Stadium Stampede and Blood & Guts. The faction disbanded following internal betrayals and the departure of key members into solo ventures.

Powerhouse Hobbs
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Torture Rack Slam, Powerslam.
Brief description: Powerhouse Hobbs transitioned from enhancement talent to a key figure in AEW, aligning with Team Taz early in his career. Known for his raw strength and dominance, Hobbs has become a prominent mid-card competitor, delivering standout performances in singles matches and multi-man bouts. He captured the TNT Championship in 2023, solidifying his role as a rising star in AEW.

Preston Vance (10)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Full Nelson Lock, Spinebuster, Spear.
Brief description: Preston Vance rose to prominence as "10," a masked member of The Dark Order. Known for his imposing physique and raw power, he became a fan favorite in faction-based storylines. In 2022, Vance unmasked and aligned with Rush in La Facción Ingobernable, adopting a more aggressive persona and pursuing his singles career.

Priscilla Kelly (Gigi Dolin)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with psychological elements.
Signature moves: Bridging Fisherman’s Suplex, Wristlock DDT, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Priscilla Kelly appeared during AEW’s early days, participating in the Casino Battle Royale at All Out 2019. Known for her unique style and charisma, Kelly showcased her talent in limited appearances before pursuing other opportunities outside of AEW.

Private Party (Isiah Kassidy & Marq Quen)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative.
Signature moves: Silly String (Assisted Springboard Cutter), Gin and Juice (Springboard Cutter/Frankensteiner Combo), Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: Private Party debuted in AEW with a major upset win over The Young Bucks during the AEW Tag Team Title Tournament in 2019. Known for their athleticism and creative offense, they have been a prominent part of AEW’s tag team division and factions like Matt Hardy’s Hardy Family Office and The Firm.

Proud-N-Powerful (Santana & Ortiz)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors and faction members.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo), Cutter, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Proud-N-Powerful, consisting of Santana and Ortiz, were key players in AEW’s tag team division and faction wars as members of the Inner Circle. Known for their intensity and seamless teamwork, the duo engaged in feuds with The Elite, FTR, and The Pinnacle, delivering memorable matches like Stadium Stampede and Blood & Guts.

QT Marshall
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Technical with power-based elements.
Signature moves: QT Cutter, Diamond Cutter, Spinebuster.
Brief description: QT Marshall has been a staple of AEW, transitioning from a member of The Nightmare Family to leading The Factory. Known for his solid in-ring work and heel persona, QT has played a pivotal role in developing AEW’s younger talents through AEW Dark and faction-based storylines.

QTV (QT Marshall’s Media Team)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Faction featuring comedic and mid-card competitors.
Wrestling style: N/A (focus on character-driven segments).
Signature moves: N/A (primarily a storytelling device).
Brief description: QTV serves as QT Marshall’s media-focused faction, blending comedic promos with storyline progression. The group has featured Marshall’s humorous takes on AEW events while supporting his in-ring feuds, particularly around the TNT Championship.

Rache Chanel
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Split-Legged Dropkick, Snapmare, Hair Flip Slam.
Brief description: Rache Chanel appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing her unique blend of comedy and athleticism. Her fashionable persona and energetic performances brought a lighthearted touch to AEW’s women’s division during her tenure.

Reba (Rebel)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Manager and occasional competitor.
Wrestling style: Comedic and technical.
Signature moves: Snap Suplex, Hair Toss, Running Knee.
Brief description: Reba, commonly known as Rebel, has been a central figure in AEW as the comedic and loyal assistant to Dr. Britt Baker, D.M.D. While primarily appearing in a managerial role, Reba has competed in tag team and multi-woman matches, often adding humor to her performances. Her role as Baker’s sidekick has made her a memorable part of AEW programming.

Red Velvet
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Just Desserts (Running Boot), Moonsault, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Red Velvet has been a consistent presence in AEW’s women’s division, transitioning from enhancement talent to a featured competitor. Known for her athleticism and fiery personality, she has competed in high-profile matches, including teaming with Cody Rhodes against Shaquille O’Neal and Jade Cargill. Velvet was also a member of The Baddies faction alongside Jade Cargill, adding depth to her character.

reDRagon (Kyle O’Reilly & Bobby Fish)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors and faction members.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Chasing the Dragon (Roundhouse Kick/Brainbuster Combo), High-Low (Sweep Kick/Clothesline Combo), Guillotine Choke (O’Reilly).
Brief description: reDRagon, a renowned tag team from their time in ROH and NXT, brought their polished teamwork and hard-hitting style to AEW. They aligned with Adam Cole in The Undisputed Elite, competing in high-profile matches against top AEW tag teams. Their seamless chemistry and in-ring storytelling made them standout competitors during their AEW tenure.

Reka Tehaka
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Headbutt, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: Reka Tehaka appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing her physicality and Samoan heritage-inspired offense. While primarily utilized in enhancement roles, her presence and intensity stood out in her matches against AEW’s rising stars.

Ren Narita
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with technical and submission elements.
Signature moves: Bridging Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Boston Crab, Overhead Belly-to-Belly Throw.
Brief description: Representing New Japan Pro Wrestling, Ren Narita appeared in AEW through the Forbidden Door partnership. Known for his disciplined strong style, Narita competed in matches on AEW Dark and pay-per-view events, showcasing his hard-hitting approach and grappling expertise.

Renegade Twins (Charlette & Robyn Renegade)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and teamwork emphasis.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Double Superkick, Assisted Neckbreaker.
Brief description: The Renegade Twins have appeared on AEW Dark and Rampage, competing as a tag team and showcasing their chemistry. Known for their physicality and teamwork, they’ve been used to help elevate AEW’s women’s division, providing competitive matches against established stars.

Rey Fenix
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event tag team competitor and mid-card singles competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with technical elements.
Signature moves: Black Fire Driver, Springboard Cutter, Rolling Frog Splash.
Brief description: As one-half of the Lucha Brothers with Penta El Zero Miedo, Rey Fenix is a cornerstone of AEW’s tag team division. Known for his incredible agility and innovative moves, Fenix has been part of numerous show-stealing matches, including the Lucha Brothers’ AEW World Tag Team Championship win at All Out 2021. Fenix has also competed in singles action, delivering memorable performances in AEW’s mid-card scene.

Ricky Starks
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking with high-energy charisma.
Signature moves: Roshambo (Elevated Cutter), Spear, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Ricky Starks debuted in AEW during the TNT Championship Open Challenge, quickly becoming one of the company’s most charismatic stars. As a former FTW Champion and member of Team Taz, Starks delivered standout performances in both singles and faction-based storylines. Transitioning into a singles role, he has risen as a fan favorite and delivered memorable feuds with stars like MJF and Powerhouse Hobbs.

Riho
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with quick counters.
Signature moves: Double Foot Stomp, Northern Lights Suplex, Tiger Feint Kick.
Brief description: Riho was AEW’s first Women’s World Champion, winning the title in 2019 and defending it in critically acclaimed matches against stars like Nyla Rose and Kris Statlander. Known for her underdog spirit and in-ring agility, Riho has consistently delivered high-quality matches, making her a cornerstone of AEW’s women’s division.

Rob Van Dam (RVD)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with hardcore elements.
Signature moves: Five-Star Frog Splash, Van Daminator (Chair-Assisted Kick), Rolling Thunder.
Brief description: The legendary Rob Van Dam made his AEW debut in 2023, facing Jack Perry in a match for the FTW Championship. Known for his innovative offense and laid-back charisma, RVD brought his signature moves and energy to the AEW audience, adding to his already storied career.

Robert Anthony
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-based.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Running Elbow Strike, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Robert Anthony appeared on AEW Dark in 2020, competing against rising stars and established talents. While primarily used in enhancement roles, his experience and in-ring skills contributed to AEW’s efforts to feature independent talent during its early programming.

Robyn Renegade
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Running Knee Strike, Double Suplex (with Charlette Renegade).
Brief description: Robyn Renegade, one-half of the Renegade Twins, has appeared on AEW Dark and Rampage. Known for her physicality and tag team chemistry with her sister Charlette, she has competed against top talent in AEW’s women’s division, gaining experience and showcasing her potential.

Rocky Romero
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor and tag team member.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Forever Clothesline, Cross Armbreaker, Shiranui.
Brief description: A veteran of NJPW, Rocky Romero has appeared in AEW as part of Roppongi Vice alongside Trent Beretta. Known for his technical expertise and charisma, Romero has participated in AEW’s tag team and multi-man matches, showcasing his versatility in cross-promotional appearances.

Roderick Strong
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission and striking focus.
Signature moves: End of Heartache (Lifting Double-Knee Backbreaker), Stronghold (Boston Crab), Sick Kick.
Brief description: A recent addition to AEW, Roderick Strong debuted in 2023 and quickly aligned with Adam Cole, rekindling their history as Undisputed Era teammates. Known for his unmatched technical skill and intensity, Strong has participated in high-profile matches and faction storylines, solidifying his place in AEW.

Roppongi Vice (Trent Beretta & Rocky Romero)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Strong Zero (Double Foot Stomp/Driver Combo), Assisted Tornado DDT, Double Suplex.
Brief description: A tag team from NJPW’s junior heavyweight division, Roppongi Vice reunited in AEW for special appearances. They’ve competed in high-energy tag team matches on AEW programming, showcasing their seamless chemistry and ability to connect with the crowd.

Royce Isaacs
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Spinebuster, Assisted Cutter (with Jorel Nelson).
Brief description: Royce Isaacs, often appearing as part of the West Coast Wrecking Crew alongside Jorel Nelson, has competed in AEW’s tag team division through their alignment with NJPW Strong. Known for his strength and polished teamwork, Isaacs has brought intensity and physicality to AEW’s tag team matches.

Ruby Soho
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Destination Unknown (Blade Runner), No Future Kick, Poison Rana.
Brief description: Ruby Soho debuted in AEW at All Out 2021 as the surprise Joker in the Women’s Casino Battle Royale, which she won. Since then, she has become a key player in the women’s division, aligning with The Outcasts faction alongside Toni Storm and Saraya. Known for her resilience and crowd connection, Ruby continues to deliver standout performances in singles and faction-based matches.

Rush
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor and faction leader.
Wrestling style: Striking and brawling with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Bull’s Horns (Running Dropkick), Snap Suplex, German Suplex.
Brief description: Rush debuted in AEW as the leader of La Facción Ingobernable, bringing his brash charisma and hard-hitting style to the promotion. Competing in singles and faction matches, Rush has quickly established himself as a dominant force in AEW, engaging in high-profile rivalries and showcasing his lucha-inspired brawling.

Ryan Nemeth
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and comedic character.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and showmanship.
Signature moves: Nemeth Effect (DDT), Sleeper Hold, Superkick.
Brief description: Ryan Nemeth, also known as "The Hollywood Hunk," has appeared on AEW programming primarily as a comedic character and enhancement talent. Often featured on AEW Dark, Nemeth has brought charisma and entertainment to his performances while occasionally aligning with factions like The Wingmen.

Ryo Mizunami
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Lariat, Uranage Slam, Guillotine Leg Drop.
Brief description: Ryo Mizunami, a standout from Japan, competed in AEW’s Women’s World Title Eliminator Tournament, winning the tournament to challenge Hikaru Shida at Revolution 2021. Known for her unique charisma and powerful offense, Mizunami’s appearances showcased her as a crowd favorite and a major force in AEW’s women’s division.

Ryzin
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking with theatrical elements.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Spinebuster, Running Big Boot.
Brief description: Ryzin appeared on AEW Dark, bringing a gothic and theatrical presence to his matches. While primarily utilized in enhancement roles, his character work added a unique flavor to AEW’s independent-talent-focused programming.

Sadie Gibbs
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Moonsault, Enzuigiri, Tilt-a-Whirl Backbreaker.
Brief description: Sadie Gibbs appeared in AEW’s early programming, including the Women’s Casino Battle Royale at All Out 2019. Known for her athleticism and dynamic offense, Gibbs showed potential in her limited AEW tenure before parting ways with the company.

Sammy Guevara
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking with technical elements.
Signature moves: GTH (Fireman’s Carry Knee Strike), 630 Senton, Spanish Fly.
Brief description: A founding member of AEW, Sammy Guevara has been a key player in the company’s history. As a member of The Inner Circle and later The Jericho Appreciation Society, he has been involved in major feuds and storylines. Guevara is a multi-time TNT Champion, known for his breathtaking aerial maneuvers and charismatic personality.

Samoa Joe
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor and ROH Television Champion.
Wrestling style: Power-based with submission and striking elements.
Signature moves: Muscle Buster, Coquina Clutch, Uranage Slam.
Brief description: Samoa Joe debuted in AEW during the ROH Supercard of Honor in 2022, transitioning into AEW programming as a dominant force. As ROH Television Champion, he has delivered intense matches and memorable feuds, blending his intimidating presence with world-class in-ring skills.

Samuray del Sol (Kalisto)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre.
Signature moves: Salida del Sol (Sliced Bread #2), Tornado DDT, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Samuray del Sol made a one-off appearance in AEW in 2021, teaming with Aero Star in a tag match against FTR for the AAA Tag Team Championships. Known for his innovative lucha libre style, his match was well-received, showcasing his athleticism and crowd-pleasing offense.

Sandra Moone
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical.
Signature moves: Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: Sandra Moone appeared on AEW Dark, competing against rising stars in the women’s division. While primarily used in enhancement roles, she showcased her potential and solid in-ring skills during her brief appearances.

Santana
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitor.
Wrestling style: Striking and brawling with technical elements.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (with Ortiz), Cutter, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Santana is one-half of Proud & Powerful alongside Ortiz, a staple of AEW’s tag team division and faction warfare. As members of The Inner Circle, Santana and Ortiz were involved in major feuds and matches, including Stadium Stampede and Blood & Guts. Santana has also competed in singles matches, showcasing his versatility and fiery in-ring style.

Santana Garrett
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Handspring Elbow, Bridging Suplex, Shining Star Press (Moonsault).
Brief description: Santana Garrett appeared on AEW Dark in 2021, bringing her polished style and charisma to the ring. A veteran of the independent scene, Garrett showcased her skills in competitive matches against AEW’s rising women’s stars.

Saraya
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical with submission elements.
Signature moves: PTO (Scorpion Crosslock), Knight Light (Fisherman’s Suplex Driver), Superkick.
Brief description: Saraya, formerly known as Paige in WWE, made her AEW debut in 2022 to great fanfare. As a member of The Outcasts faction alongside Toni Storm and Ruby Soho, she has been involved in high-profile feuds and matches, showcasing her resilience and charisma as a key figure in AEW's women’s division.

Satnam Singh
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–Present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enforcer and special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on size and strength.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Big Boot, Double Handed Choke Bomb.
Brief description: Satnam Singh, a former NBA draft pick, debuted in AEW as a part of Jay Lethal’s faction alongside Sonjay Dutt. With his towering size and presence, Singh serves as an enforcer in faction-based storylines, adding an element of intimidation and physicality to AEW’s roster.

Scorpio Sky
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: TKO (Spinning Cutter), Dragon Sleeper, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: A founding member of AEW, Scorpio Sky has achieved significant success, including becoming the first AEW World Tag Team Champion with SCU (SoCal Uncensored). Sky later transitioned into singles competition, capturing the TNT Championship twice. His athleticism and versatility have made him a key player in AEW’s mid-card scene.

Satoshi Kojima
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with striking and technical elements.
Signature moves: Cozy Lariat, Koji Cutter, Brainbuster.
Brief description: Representing NJPW, Satoshi Kojima appeared at AEW’s All Out 2021, facing Jon Moxley in a hard-hitting match. A legend in Japanese wrestling, Kojima brought his signature strong style and experience to AEW, delivering a memorable performance on a major stage.

SCU (SoCal Uncensored: Christopher Daniels, Frankie Kazarian, & Scorpio Sky)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2021 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and faction competitors.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: SCU Later (Powerbomb/Lungblower Combo), Best Moonsault Ever (Kazarian), TKO (Sky).
Brief description: SCU was one of the first factions in AEW, with Daniels, Kazarian, and Sky serving as foundational members of the roster. Scorpio Sky and Kazarian became the inaugural AEW World Tag Team Champions after defeating the Lucha Brothers in 2019. SCU was instrumental in establishing AEW’s tag team division, delivering consistent performances before the group disbanded in 2021.

Sean Maluta
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flying with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Superkick, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Sean Maluta appeared on AEW Dark in 2020, showcasing his Samoan-inspired offense and quick-paced style. While primarily utilized in enhancement roles, his matches reflected his skill and experience from the independent scene.

Serena Deeb
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission-based offense.
Signature moves: Serenity Lock (Modified Single-Leg Boston Crab), Detox (Double Arm Facebuster), Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Serena Deeb joined AEW in 2020 and quickly established herself as one of the most technically skilled wrestlers in the women’s division. A former NWA Women’s World Champion, Deeb has delivered standout matches against top stars like Thunder Rosa and Hikaru Shida. Known as "The Professor of Professional Wrestling," she’s admired for her in-ring psychology and technical precision.

Serpentico
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–Present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent and tag team competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying with lucha libre and comedic elements.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Diving Double Foot Stomp, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Serpentico, often paired with Luther as Chaos Project, has been a consistent presence in AEW. Known for his dynamic aerial maneuvers and comedic timing, Serpentico primarily competes on AEW Dark and Rampage, where his matches often combine athleticism with entertainment.

Shalonce Royal
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Striking and comedic with a unique vocal gimmick.
Signature moves: Running Dropkick, Neckbreaker, Crossbody.
Brief description: Shalonce Royal appeared on AEW Dark, using her operatic singing gimmick to entertain audiences before and during her matches. While primarily utilized in enhancement roles, her charisma and distinctive character made her performances stand out.

Shane Taylor
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Greetings from 216 (Package Piledriver), Powerbomb, Lariat.
Brief description: Shane Taylor, a former ROH Television Champion, made his AEW debut at Final Battle 2022 as part of the AEW/ROH crossover. Known for his hard-hitting style and imposing presence, Taylor showcased his talent in faction-based matches, including a high-profile tag team bout alongside JD Griffey against Keith Lee and Swerve Strickland.

Shane Taylor Promotions
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Faction competitors.
Wrestling style: Power-based and brawling with teamwork emphasis.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Double Spinebuster, Lariat Combos.
Brief description: Shane Taylor Promotions, led by Shane Taylor, appeared in AEW through its ROH crossover events. The faction’s emphasis on dominance and teamwork was displayed during multi-man matches, highlighting their cohesive in-ring presence and reputation as a force in ROH’s tag team and faction divisions.

Shanna
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card competitor in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Dropkick, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Shanna, a Portuguese wrestler, appeared in AEW’s early programming, bringing her vibrant personality and energetic in-ring style to the women’s division. She competed on Dynamite and AEW Dark, earning praise for her performances before her departure in 2021.

Shaq (Shaquille O’Neal)
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (special appearance).
Position on the card: Celebrity special attraction competitor.
Wrestling style: Power-based.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Chokeslam.
Brief description: NBA legend Shaquille O’Neal made his AEW debut in a mixed-tag match on Dynamite, teaming with Jade Cargill against Cody Rhodes and Red Velvet. Shaq showcased his surprising physicality and presence, delivering a memorable performance that included putting Cody through a table in one of AEW’s most entertaining celebrity matches.

Shawn Dean
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances, later more regular).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent to mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical with elements of high-flying.
Signature moves: Military Salute Splash, TKO, DDT variations.
Brief description: Shawn Dean debuted in AEW as enhancement talent, often utilized to elevate rising stars. His in-ring persona is grounded in his military background, earning him the nickname "The Captain." Over time, he gained a stronger foothold, participating in AEW Dark and Rampage episodes. Dean also contributed backstage, emphasizing AEW's connection to military veterans.

Shawn Spears
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical.
Signature moves: C4 (Death Valley Driver), Sharpshooter, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Shawn Spears, known for his "Chairman" persona, made an impactful AEW debut in 2019 by attacking Cody Rhodes with a steel chair. Often aligning with Tully Blanchard as part of The Pinnacle, Spears has participated in major feuds and matches, including the Blood and Guts match. His versatility has seen him transition between a serious heel persona and a more comedic role in later appearances.

Shawna Reed
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and grounded.
Signature moves: Swinging Neckbreaker, Snap Suplex, Crucifix Bomb.
Brief description: Shawna Reed made limited appearances on AEW Dark, primarily as enhancement talent. Her unique look and gothic-inspired persona added depth to her brief AEW tenure, where she showcased her ability to engage with diverse opponents.

Shazza McKenzie
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical.
Signature moves: Split-Legged Stunner, Running Bulldog, Springboard Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Shazza McKenzie, an Australian indie standout, made sporadic appearances in AEW, including matches on AEW Dark. While her AEW tenure was brief, she leveraged her opportunities to showcase her technical proficiency and charisma.

Shoko Nakajima
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with unique character elements.
Signature moves: 619, Northern Lights Suplex, Diving Senton.
Brief description: Shoko Nakajima, known as the "Big Kaiju," made her AEW debut during the 2019 Fight for the Fallen event and competed in tag team matches. Representing Tokyo Joshi Pro Wrestling, her presence highlighted AEW's emphasis on international talent and inter-promotional relationships.

Shota Umino
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with technical elements.
Signature moves: Death Rider, German Suplex, Snap DDT.
Brief description: Shota Umino, a standout from New Japan Pro Wrestling (NJPW), appeared at AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door 2022. As a protege of Jon Moxley, Umino's appearance symbolized the collaboration between AEW and NJPW, giving fans a glimpse of his potential as a future star in both promotions.

Skye Blue
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic to regular appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent to mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flyer and technical.
Signature moves: Superkick, Crossbody, Snapmare Driver.
Brief description: Skye Blue debuted on AEW Dark in 2021 and gradually became a fan favorite due to her resilience and engaging performances. Over time, she secured more opportunities on AEW television, showcasing her skills in singles and tag team matches.

Slim J
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with a hybrid technical approach.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Split-Legged Moonsault, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Slim J joined AEW as part of the Trustbusters faction, where his unique style and personality helped create memorable moments. Competing primarily in tag team and multi-man matches, he became a recognizable part of AEW's roster.

Sonjay Dutt
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (managerial and occasional in-ring role).
Position on the card: Managerial role and occasional enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with technical flair.
Signature moves: Camel Clutch, Standing Moonsault, Springboard Leg Drop.
Brief description: A seasoned veteran, Sonjay Dutt transitioned to a managerial role in AEW, frequently appearing alongside Jay Lethal and Satnam Singh. While primarily involved in promos and managing, Dutt occasionally steps into the ring, bringing his decades of experience to AEW's storytelling.

Sonny Kiss
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and flamboyant with elements of high-flying and striking.
Signature moves: Split-Legged Moonsault, 450 Splash, Handspring Elbow.
Brief description: Sonny Kiss was part of the inaugural AEW roster and quickly became known for a unique blend of charisma and athleticism. Often competing on AEW Dark and Dynamite, Kiss participated in singles and tag team matches. Later, Kiss aligned with the Trustbusters faction, showcasing a more heelish persona before leaving AEW in 2023.

Spanish Announce Project
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying and unorthodox.
Signature moves: Tandem Topé Suicida, Double Springboard Arm Drag, Assisted Moonsault.
Brief description: The Spanish Announce Project, a comedic duo with high-energy antics, made appearances on AEW Dark. Their unique brand of humor and acrobatics brought levity to AEW's roster, with sporadic involvement in tag team matches.

Stephen Wolf
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with technical precision.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, 450 Splash, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Stephen Wolf made appearances on AEW Dark in 2022, showcasing his agility and high-energy style. Although his time in AEW was brief, he left an impression through competitive matches against rising stars.

Steve Migs
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (one-off appearance).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Grounded and brawler-based.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Short-Arm Clothesline, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: Steve Migs, a radio personality and part-time wrestler, made a single appearance on AEW Dark in 2022. His inclusion highlighted AEW's openness to featuring talent from diverse backgrounds for unique match

Sting
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to special attraction.
Wrestling style: Iconic brawler with methodical pacing.
Signature moves: Scorpion Death Drop, Scorpion Deathlock, Stinger Splash.
Brief description: The legendary Sting debuted in AEW at Winter Is Coming in 2020, marking his first long-term role in a major promotion in years. Teaming with Darby Allin, Sting frequently participated in cinematic matches and tag team bouts, displaying remarkable in-ring presence despite his age. His involvement in AEW represents a significant draw for fans of wrestling’s golden eras, while serving to elevate younger talents.

Stokely Hathaway
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Manager and on-screen personality.
Wrestling style: N/A (managerial role).
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: Stokely Hathaway debuted at AEW Double or Nothing 2022, aligning with Jade Cargill and later forming The Firm, a faction consisting of Ethan Page, Big Bill, and others. Known for his sharp wit and impeccable promo skills, Hathaway has become one of AEW's premier managers, blending comedic timing with strategic scheming to enhance storylines and build tension.

STRONGHEARTS
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of high-flying and striking, influenced by Japanese strong style.
Signature moves: Assisted Piledriver, Tandem 450 Splash, Double Superkick.
Brief description: STRONGHEARTS, a faction led by CIMA, appeared in AEW during its early events like Double or Nothing and Fyter Fest in 2019. Representing Oriental Wrestling Entertainment (OWE), their participation highlighted AEW's global partnerships and provided fans with fast-paced, hard-hitting action in tag and multi-man matches.

Stu Grayson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2022, 2023–present (sporadic to regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Nightfall, 450 Splash, Uranage Slam.
Brief description: As a founding member of The Dark Order alongside Evil Uno, Stu Grayson played a pivotal role in the faction's rise. Known for his dynamic in-ring abilities and chemistry with Uno, Grayson was a consistent presence in AEW's tag team division. After a brief hiatus, he returned in 2023, reigniting fan excitement with standout performances.

Suge D
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Snap DDT, Fisherman Suplex, Step-Up Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Suge D, also known as Pineapple Pete in AEW, gained popularity during his interactions with Chris Jericho in 2020. Initially appearing on AEW Dark, his feud with Jericho, born from humorous commentary, turned him into a cult favorite despite being primarily enhancement talent.

Sunny Daze
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–2020 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Brawler with unorthodox elements.
Signature moves: Leg Drop, Fireman’s Carry Slam, Corner Splash.
Brief description: Sunny Daze appeared on AEW Dark and undercard matches during AEW's early years, showcasing a colorful and eccentric persona. Although his appearances were limited, he added character variety to AEW's developing roster.

SuperBad Squad
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Aggressive and technical with a touch of humor.
Signature moves: Assisted Flatliner, Superkick, German Suplex Combination.
Brief description: Comprised of Kip Sabian and Penelope Ford (with occasional involvement by Miro), the SuperBad Squad represented AEW's colorful mid-card tag division. Known for their chemistry and blend of in-ring skill and entertainment value, they were featured prominently on AEW Dark and Dynamite, often engaging in comedic or chaotic matches.

SuperKliq
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: High-flying, technical, and hard-hitting.
Signature moves: Triple Superkick, Panama Sunrise, Assisted Tombstone Piledriver.
Brief description: SuperKliq is a faction consisting of Adam Cole and The Young Bucks. Dominating AEW's trios and faction-based storylines, they competed in high-profile matches, including bouts against The Dark Order and Jurassic Express. Known for their over-the-top charisma and heel tactics, the SuperKliq stood out in AEW's deeply competitive trios division.

Swerve In Our Glory
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and main event.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of agility and power.
Signature moves: Double Foot Stomp/Powerbomb Combo, Running Corner Splash, Assisted Moonsault.
Brief description: The tag team of Swerve Strickland and Keith Lee, Swerve In Our Glory became one of AEW's most dynamic duos. Their reign as AEW World Tag Team Champions showcased their versatility and chemistry. Their eventual breakup led to a heated feud, cementing their individual stars in AEW's upper card.

Swerve Strickland
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying hybrid.
Signature moves: Swerve Stomp, House Call, JML Driver.
Brief description: Swerve Strickland debuted in AEW in 2022 and quickly became a standout performer. Known for his athleticism and charisma, Strickland excelled in both singles competition and as part of Swerve In Our Glory. His work in AEW has solidified his reputation as a versatile competitor capable of excelling in any storyline.

Sydal Brothers
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with technical precision.
Signature moves: Meteora, Standing Moonsault, Assisted DDT.
Brief description: Matt and Mike Sydal, collectively known as the Sydal Brothers, frequently appeared on AEW Dark and in tag team matches on Dynamite. Renowned for their aerial prowess, the Sydals have been fan favorites, providing exciting performances and putting over younger talent in AEW's tag team division.

Tay Conti
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and women’s division contender.
Wrestling style: Judo-based with striking and submissions.
Signature moves: DDTay (Modified DDT), Tay-KO (Hammerlock DDT), Flying Cross Armbar.
Brief description: Tay Conti joined AEW in 2020 and quickly became a notable presence in the women’s division. Showcasing her judo background and improving steadily in-ring, she competed in high-profile matches, including a shot at the AEW Women’s World Championship. Her partnership with Anna Jay as TayJay further expanded her role in tag team and storyline dynamics.

Tay Melo
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Judo and striking.
Signature moves: DDTay, Tay-KO, Modified Cross Armbreaker.
Brief description: After her name change from Tay Conti to Tay Melo in 2022, she continued her rise in AEW. As part of the Jericho Appreciation Society, Melo embraced her heel persona, frequently teaming with Anna Jay and participating in heated rivalries with opponents in the women's division.

Taya Valkyrie
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and title contender.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with lucha libre influences.
Signature moves: Road to Valhalla (Glam Slam), Spear, Double Knees in the Corner.
Brief description: Taya Valkyrie debuted in AEW in 2023, quickly establishing herself as a dominant force in the women’s division. Her feud with Jade Cargill over the TBS Championship highlighted her powerful and versatile style. A veteran of international promotions, Taya brought star power and a wealth of experience to AEW.

TayJay
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2023 (sporadic tag team appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of judo, technical wrestling, and striking.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Assisted Cross Armbreaker, Elevated DDT.
Brief description: Tay Conti and Anna Jay formed TayJay, a fan-favorite tag team that showcased their chemistry both in and out of the ring. While primarily competing in tag matches on AEW Dark and Dynamite, the duo occasionally crossed into main show storylines, solidifying their place in the women’s tag scene.

eam Taz
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Various combinations of Suplexes, Spinebusters, and high-impact power moves.
Brief description: Led by Taz, Team Taz included powerhouse wrestlers like Brian Cage, Ricky Starks, Powerhouse Hobbs, and Hook. The faction frequently appeared in tag team and singles matches, portraying a dominant and aggressive presence. Key rivalries included feuds with Darby Allin, Sting, and CM Punk. The group disbanded in 2022, with its members pursuing individual success.

Ten
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical elements.
Signature moves: Full Nelson, Spinebuster, Pump Kick.
Brief description: Ten (Preston Vance) is a prominent member of The Dark Order, often featured in tag team and faction-based storylines. Known for his impressive physique and intensity, Ten has participated in high-profile matches, including multi-man tag bouts and AEW Dark showcases. In late 2022, he transitioned into a more villainous role, distancing himself from The Dark Order.

Tesha Price
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Snap DDT, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Tesha Price appeared primarily on AEW Dark, competing against a variety of rising stars in the women’s division. While her role was primarily enhancement talent, she demonstrated strong athleticism and energy, adding value to AEW's developmental programming.

Thunder Rosa
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event and women’s division standout.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Fire Thunder Driver, Peruvian Necktie, Diving Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Thunder Rosa made her AEW debut in 2020, quickly rising to prominence with her intense matches and charisma. She is best known for her legendary Lights Out match against Britt Baker, which cemented her as a top-tier competitor. Thunder Rosa captured the AEW Women’s World Championship in 2022, showcasing her determination and versatility as one of AEW's premier stars.

ThunderStorm
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic tag team appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team division and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Blend of power, striking, and technical skills.
Signature moves: Assisted Dropkick, Double Suplex, Tandem Backbreaker.
Brief description: ThunderStorm was a tag team comprising Thunder Rosa and Toni Storm, combining their individual strengths to dominate AEW’s women’s tag scene. Though their partnership was short-lived, they left a strong impression with their seamless teamwork and fiery energy in matches against prominent rivals.

Tiger Ruas
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of Brazilian jiu-jitsu and striking.
Signature moves: Triangle Choke, Leg Sweep, High Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Tiger Ruas made a handful of appearances on AEW Dark in 2021, showcasing his martial arts-inspired style. While primarily enhancement talent, his performances reflected his versatility and unique skill set.

TNT
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Power-based and brawling.
Signature moves: Tandem Spinebuster, Assisted Powerbomb, Running Lariat Combo.
Brief description: The tag team TNT, consisting of Terrell and Terrence Hughes (sons of WWE Hall of Famer D-Von Dudley), appeared on AEW Dark in 2021. They showcased potential as a young tag team while honing their craft in competitive matches against established AEW teams.

Toa Liona
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with Samoan influences.
Signature moves: Samoan Drop, Spear, Lariat.
Brief description: Toa Liona made sporadic appearances on AEW Dark, showcasing his raw power and agility. While primarily enhancement talent during his AEW tenure, Liona demonstrated potential for growth in the tag team and heavyweight divisions.

Tom Lawlor
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with MMA influence.
Signature moves: Rear Naked Choke, Exploder Suplex, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Tom Lawlor competed at the AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door 2022 event, representing NJPW Strong. His MMA background and hard-hitting style stood out in his guest appearance, emphasizing AEW’s strong ties with NJPW.

Tomohiro Ishii
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Guest competitor and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Strong style with hard-hitting strikes.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Sliding Lariat, Vertical Drop Brainbuster.
Brief description: A NJPW stalwart, Tomohiro Ishii has appeared in AEW during cross-promotional events, including AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door. Known for his tenacity and brutal striking ability, Ishii delivered standout performances, including bouts against high-profile AEW talent, solidifying his reputation as a warrior in the ring.

Toni Storm
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event and women’s division standout.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting.
Signature moves: Storm Zero (Piledriver), Hip Attack, Cloverleaf Submission.
Brief description: Toni Storm debuted in AEW in 2022 and quickly rose to the top of the women’s division, capturing the AEW Women’s World Championship. Known for her versatility and ability to adapt to any opponent, Storm has become a pillar of AEW's women's roster, contributing to some of the promotion's most compelling matches and feuds.

Tony Donati
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based.
Signature moves: Armbar, Northern Lights Suplex, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Tony Donati appeared on AEW Dark, primarily serving as enhancement talent. He competed against various established stars, helping to elevate their momentum while demonstrating his solid in-ring fundamentals.

Tony Nese
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: Running Nese (Knee Strike in the Corner), Springboard Moonsault, German Suplex.
Brief description: Tony Nese joined AEW in late 2021, bringing his well-rounded skills and athleticism to the roster. Often appearing on AEW Dark, Rampage, and Dynamite, Nese has worked both in singles and tag matches, including a partnership with Josh Woods. Known as the "Premier Athlete," he continues to be a reliable presence in AEW's competitive mid-card scene.

Too Fast Too Fuego
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and comedic act.
Wrestling style: High-flying with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Tandem Superkick, Double Springboard Moonsault, Assisted Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A tag team composed of Fuego Del Sol and a masked Cody Rhodes (as Fuego II), Too Fast Too Fuego provided lighthearted entertainment during their brief tenure in AEW. They appeared primarily on AEW Dark and Rampage, offering fans an enjoyable mix of humor and high-flying action.

Top Flight
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying with innovative tandem offense.
Signature moves: Nosedive (Springboard Moonsault), Assisted Dropkick, Tandem Spanish Fly.
Brief description: Top Flight, consisting of brothers Darius and Dante Martin, quickly established themselves as one of AEW's most exciting young tag teams. Known for their incredible aerial maneuvers and seamless chemistry, the Martins have competed against top teams like The Young Bucks, FTR, and The Lucha Bros. Despite injury setbacks, they remain a prominent fixture in AEW's tag team division.

Tootie Lynn
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (one-off appearance).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile with striking and submission elements.
Signature moves: Roundhouse Kick, Step-Up Enzuigiri, Armbar Submission.
Brief description: Tootie Lynn appeared during AEW's inaugural St. Louis event as part of a Casino Battle Royale. While her AEW tenure was brief, she represented local talent and left an impression with her dynamic style.

Trent Beretta
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and mid-card.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of high-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Crunchy (Half-Nelson Piledriver), Tornado DDT, Strong Zero (Tag Team Finisher).
Brief description: Trent Beretta is a cornerstone of the AEW tag team division as one-half of Best Friends alongside Chuck Taylor. Known for his incredible chemistry with Taylor and comedic yet heartfelt storytelling, Trent has been part of memorable matches and storylines, including his alliance with Orange Cassidy. His performances consistently highlight his versatility and fan-friendly appeal.

Trent Seven
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: British strong style with striking and grappling elements.
Signature moves: Seven Stars Lariat, Dragon Suplex, Burning Hammer.
Brief description: Trent Seven appeared in AEW in 2022, competing as a guest star during events such as Rampage. His hard-hitting style and charisma made him a notable addition to AEW's roster during his brief tenure, further emphasizing AEW's willingness to collaborate with international talent.

Trish Adora
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and grappling-focused.
Signature moves: Lariat Tubman, Butterfly Suplex, Crossbody.
Brief description: Trish Adora made appearances on AEW Dark in 2022, where she showcased her technical skill and unique presence in the ring. A standout in the independent scene, Adora's brief AEW tenure highlighted her ability to hold her own against AEW's rising stars.

Trustbusters
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and trios division.
Wrestling style: Blend of technical, high-flying, and brawling styles.
Signature moves: Assisted Cutter, Double Team Suplex, Combination Strikes.
Brief description: Led by Ari Daivari, the Trustbusters faction also includes Slim J, Parker Boudreaux, and occasionally Sonny Kiss. The group debuted in 2022, providing a mix of comedic and competitive elements. Primarily featured on AEW Dark and Rampage, the Trustbusters brought a unique energy to AEW's trios and mid-card divisions.

Tully Blanchard
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Manager and on-screen personality.
Wrestling style: N/A (managerial role).
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: As a member of the legendary Four Horsemen, Tully Blanchard brought his expertise and charisma to AEW as a manager for Shawn Spears and later for FTR. Known for his sharp promos and strategic interference, Blanchard played a pivotal role in elevating his protégés' profiles. His tenure also saw moments of in-ring nostalgia, including a six-man tag match where he teamed with FTR.

Turbo Floyd
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Brawler with a vintage style.
Signature moves: Running Powerslam, Spinebuster, Lariat.
Brief description: Turbo Floyd appeared on AEW Dark as part of The Outrunners, a throwback-style tag team. Their over-the-top charisma and 1980s-inspired presentation added variety and fun to AEW's tag team landscape.

Undisputed Elite
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical, striking, and high-flying.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Total Elimination (Tag Combo), Assisted Panama Sunrise.
Brief description: The Undisputed Elite was formed by Adam Cole, Kyle O'Reilly, Bobby Fish, and occasionally The Young Bucks, uniting two powerful factions from their pasts. The group dominated AEW's tag and trios divisions with memorable feuds against teams like Jurassic Express and The Dark Order. Their dissolution came after tensions with The Young Bucks escalated, leading to new rivalries.

United Empire
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Guest competitors and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical and strong style with high-flying elements.
Signature moves: OsCutter (Will Ospreay), Imperial Drop (Tag Combo), Hidden Blade (Will Ospreay).
Brief description: Representing NJPW, United Empire members Will Ospreay, Kyle Fletcher, Mark Davis, and others appeared during AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door and other crossover events. Their involvement emphasized AEW's collaboration with NJPW and showcased their dominance in high-profile tag team and trios matches, including standout performances against AEW’s elite teams.

Varsity Athletes
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Power and technical with an athletic focus.
Signature moves: Double-Team Suplex, Assisted Slam, Tandem Spinebuster.
Brief description: The Varsity Athletes, a tag team led by "Smart" Mark Sterling, consists of Tony Nese and Josh Woods. They emphasize their physical fitness and technical wrestling ability, often appearing on AEW Dark and Rampage. The team’s brash attitude and Sterling’s managerial antics make them a notable presence in AEW's tag division.

Varsity Blonds
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and tag team division.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team with high-flying and power elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Crossbody, Dropkick-Powerbomb Combo, Elevated DDT.
Brief description: The Varsity Blonds, comprised of Brian Pillman Jr. and Griff Garrison, were a fan-favorite tag team known for their classic style and underdog spirit. Managed by Julia Hart for a time, the team had significant feuds, including with The House of Black, before eventually disbanding in 2023 as Pillman and Garrison pursued solo careers.

Vary Morales
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with fast-paced, high-flying moves.
Signature moves: Topé Suicida, Springboard Crossbody, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Vary Morales made several appearances on AEW Dark, where his lucha libre background was on full display. While primarily utilized as enhancement talent, Morales delivered energetic performances that showcased his athleticism and skill.

VENY
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking and lucha libre influences.
Signature moves: Moonsault, German Suplex, Cartwheel Kick.
Brief description: VENY appeared in AEW during the 2021 Women’s World Championship Eliminator Tournament, representing the Japanese bracket. Known for their grace and hard-hitting style, VENY left a strong impression with their performance, bringing international diversity to AEW's women’s division.

Vertvixen
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical with striking elements.
Signature moves: Spinning Heel Kick, Snap Suplex, Roundhouse Kick.
Brief description: Vertvixen appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing her agility and technical skills against a variety of opponents. While primarily enhancement talent, she demonstrated potential and contributed to AEW’s growing women’s division.

Vickie Guerrero
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2023 (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Manager and on-screen personality.
Wrestling style: N/A (managerial role).
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: Vickie Guerrero joined AEW as the manager of Nyla Rose, using her legendary charisma and heel persona to elevate her client. Known for her signature “Excuse Me!” catchphrase, Guerrero’s role added star power and heat to storylines in AEW’s women’s division. She also participated in various promos and segments that enhanced her on-screen presence.

Vicky Dreamboat
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical.
Signature moves: Flying Crossbody, Dropkick, Sunset Flip.
Brief description: Vicky Dreamboat appeared on AEW Dark, showcasing her athleticism in matches against rising stars in the women’s division. While her AEW tenure was brief, she displayed potential and contributed to AEW’s development-focused programming.

Vipress
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-focused.
Signature moves: Double Knee Strike, Suplex, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Vipress appeared primarily on AEW Dark, competing against rising stars in the women’s division. Her distinct look and solid in-ring work made her a memorable addition to AEW’s developmental programming, contributing to showcasing up-and-coming talent.

Vinny Pacifico
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with technical elements.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Enzuigiri, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Vinny Pacifico appeared on AEW Dark, competing in matches against established AEW talent. While primarily used as enhancement talent, he demonstrated agility and determination, leaving an impression during his brief AEW tenure.

Volador Jr.
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre with high-flying and technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Canadian Destroyer, Topé Suicida, Moonsault.
Brief description: Volador Jr., a prominent figure in CMLL, made a guest appearance at AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door in 2022. His participation showcased AEW's strong partnerships with international promotions and brought a high-energy lucha libre style to the event.

W. Morrissey
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Chokeslam, East River Crossing.
Brief description: W. Morrissey debuted in AEW as part of The Firm, a faction led by Stokely Hathaway. Known for his imposing size and strength, Morrissey quickly established himself as a dominant enforcer within the faction, participating in major matches and feuds against top AEW stars.

Wardlow
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event and upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Powerbomb Symphony, F10, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Wardlow debuted as the muscle for MJF before branching out as a standalone star. His breakout moment came when he turned on MJF, leading to a highly anticipated match at AEW Double or Nothing 2022. A former TNT Champion, Wardlow has become a cornerstone of AEW’s heavyweight division with his explosive power and crowd-pleasing performances.

Warhorse
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020 (one-off appearance).
Position on the card: Special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-energy brawler.
Signature moves: Diving Elbow Drop, German Suplex, Double Knee Strike.
Brief description: Independent wrestling standout Warhorse appeared on AEW Dynamite in 2020, challenging Cody Rhodes for the TNT Championship. His charismatic personality and intense in-ring style made him a memorable guest competitor, even with his limited AEW tenure.

WarJoe
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic tag team appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with striking.
Signature moves: Powerbomb/Samoan Drop Combo, Assisted Senton, Tandem Lariats.
Brief description: WarJoe, a powerhouse tag team consisting of Wardlow and Samoa Joe, brought an explosive dynamic to AEW's tag division. Their short-lived alliance saw them dominate opponents with raw strength and aggression, leaving a lasting impression despite their brief time as a team.

Warren Johnson
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical.
Signature moves: Springboard Dropkick, Running Bulldog, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Warren Johnson made appearances on AEW Dark, competing against rising stars. Known for his athleticism and potential, he added depth to AEW’s developmental programming.

Waves and Curls
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: High-energy with a focus on crowd engagement.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Crossbody, Tandem Splash.
Brief description: Waves and Curls, a charismatic tag team, made appearances on AEW Dark, showcasing their fun-loving persona and chemistry. While primarily enhancement talent, their unique energy and connection with fans made them stand out.

West Coast Wrecking Crew
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical elements.
Signature moves: Tandem Spinebuster, Assisted Powerbomb, Lariat Combo.
Brief description: Royce Isaacs and Jorel Nelson, collectively known as the West Coast Wrecking Crew, appeared on AEW programming as part of NJPW Strong’s crossover efforts. Known for their hard-hitting style, the team showcased their dominance in tag matches during AEW’s collaborative events.

Wheeler Yuta
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and faction member.
Wrestling style: Technical with strong striking.
Signature moves: Seatbelt Pin, German Suplex, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Wheeler Yuta initially appeared as part of AEW’s independent talent showcase on Dark before joining the Best Friends faction. In 2022, he transitioned to a more serious role as a member of the Blackpool Combat Club, aligning with William Regal, Jon Moxley, and Bryan Danielson. Yuta has since become a standout in technical and hard-hitting matches, earning the respect of both fans and peers.

Will Hobbs
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2020–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Upper mid-card.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with explosive moves.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Torture Rack Slam, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Powerhouse Hobbs joined AEW as an enhancement talent before quickly rising through the ranks. A key member of Team Taz, Hobbs displayed his immense strength and agility in standout matches. After leaving Team Taz, Hobbs further solidified his solo career with compelling storylines and dominant performances, becoming a key player in AEW’s heavyweight division.

Will Ospreay
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Guest competitor and special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flyer with strong style elements.
Signature moves: OsCutter, Hidden Blade, Storm Breaker.
Brief description: Will Ospreay made his AEW debut during the build-up to AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door, representing the United Empire. Known for his unmatched athleticism and creativity in the ring, Ospreay competed in high-profile matches against AEW’s top stars, including a memorable trios match with Aussie Open against The Elite. His performances further cemented his status as one of the best wrestlers in the world.

Willie Mack
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile powerhouse.
Signature moves: Stunner, Samoan Drop, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Willie Mack appeared on AEW programming in 2023, competing in entertaining matches on AEW Dark. Known for his unique combination of size and agility, Mack delivered standout performances against AEW’s rising talent, leaving a strong impression despite limited appearances.

Willow Nightingale
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based with high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Babe with the Powerbomb, Pounce, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Willow Nightingale joined AEW as a fan-favorite competitor, bringing infectious charisma and strength to the women’s division. Frequently appearing on AEW Dark and later Dynamite, Willow’s popularity soared through memorable matches and storylines. Her resilience and crowd connection have made her a key player in AEW’s women’s roster.

Wingmen
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–2023 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and comedic act.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Neckbreaker, Double Dropkick, Tandem Suplex.
Brief description: The Wingmen, consisting of Ryan Nemeth, Peter Avalon, Cezar Bononi, and JD Drake, served as a comedic faction in AEW. Known for their outlandish personalities and humorous promos, they appeared on AEW Dark and Rampage, entertaining fans with their antics while contributing to AEW’s diverse tag and trios divisions.

WorkHorsemen
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Tag team and enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and technical hybrid.
Signature moves: Assisted Piledriver, Double Lariat, Brainbuster Combination.
Brief description: JD Drake and Anthony Henry form the WorkHorsemen, a hard-hitting tag team that has competed on AEW Dark and Rampage. Known for their grit and physicality, they have been featured in matches against AEW’s top teams, showcasing their potential and earning respect from fans and peers alike.

YOH
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, 5-Star Clutch, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: YOH, a standout from NJPW and a member of Roppongi 3K, competed at AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door in 2022. His high-energy and technically sound style added excitement to the event, further strengthening AEW’s partnership with NJPW.

Young Bucks
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (regular appearances).
Position on the card: Main event and tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying with innovative tandem offense.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver, BTE Trigger, More Bang for Your Buck.
Brief description: The Young Bucks (Matt and Nick Jackson) are among the founding members of AEW and have been pivotal in shaping its tag team division. Known for their revolutionary style and influence, they have held the AEW World Tag Team Championship multiple times and participated in historic matches, including their critically acclaimed rivalry with The Lucha Bros. The Bucks are integral to AEW’s success, both in and out of the ring.

Yuji Nagata
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2021 (guest appearance).
Position on the card: Guest competitor.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on grappling and striking.
Signature moves: Nagata Lock, Exploder Suplex, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Japanese legend Yuji Nagata made a special appearance in AEW in 2021, challenging Jon Moxley for the IWGP United States Championship on Dynamite. His performance showcased his veteran prowess and highlighted AEW’s strong ties with NJPW.

Yuka Sakazaki
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2019–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card and women’s division contender.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a mix of comedy and technical skill.
Signature moves: Magical Girl Splash, Magical Girl Driver, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Yuka Sakazaki has been a recurring competitor in AEW, often representing Tokyo Joshi Pro Wrestling. Her whimsical persona and in-ring prowess have made her a fan favorite. She has competed in both singles and tag matches, including appearances in AEW's Women’s World Championship Eliminator Tournament, showcasing her versatility.

Zack Clayton
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent to mid-card.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Spinebuster, Elevated DDT.
Brief description: Zack Clayton made appearances on AEW programming, including Dynamite and Rampage, as an up-and-coming talent. Initially competing as enhancement talent, Clayton transitioned into more prominent matches, gradually carving out a role as a rising competitor in AEW’s mid-card.

Zack Sabre Jr.
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022–present (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Guest competitor and special attraction.
Wrestling style: Technical with submission expertise.
Signature moves: Octopus Hold, European Clutch, Penalty Kick.
Brief description: Zack Sabre Jr., a technical wrestling master, made his AEW debut during the AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door event. Known for his submission-heavy style and unparalleled grappling skill, he competed in high-profile matches, showcasing his ability to adapt to AEW’s dynamic roster while maintaining his NJPW legacy.

Zack Mason
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerslam, Lariat.
Brief description: Zack Mason appeared on AEW Dark, competing as part of a tag team with Warren Johnson. The duo demonstrated potential and provided competitive performances against established AEW teams.

Zicky Dice
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with brawling and technical elements.
Signature moves: Snake Rattle and Roll (Neckbreaker), Suplex, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Zicky Dice appeared on AEW Dark, bringing his charismatic and flamboyant personality to the ring. Known for his eccentric style, Dice added entertainment value while competing against AEW’s rising stars.

Zoe Sager
Time in All Elite Wrestling (AEW): 2022 (one-off appearance).
Position on the card: Enhancement talent.
Wrestling style: Agile with technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Armbar, Snap Suplex, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Zoe Sager made a brief appearance on AEW programming, showcasing her athletic ability and potential. While primarily enhancement talent, she demonstrated her capabilities against established competitors in the women’s division.

---------------------------------

Key Eras of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)  

---

       Golden Era    
AEW’s   Golden Era   can be identified as   2021 to mid-2023  , a period marked by its rise to global prominence and creative peaks in storytelling, in-ring action, and fan engagement. This era represented AEW’s fulfillment of its mission to provide a genuine alternative to WWE while cultivating its unique identity.

---

  What Made It Successful?    
1.   Critical Acclaim for Wrestling Quality  : AEW delivered matches with unparalleled athleticism and creative freedom, setting new standards for in-ring excellence.  
2.   Fan-Driven Booking  : Wrestlers like “Hangman” Adam Page, Jon Moxley, and The Young Bucks were presented authentically, resonating deeply with fans.  
3.   Inclusive Roster  : Representation of women, international stars, and LGBTQ+ talent reinforced AEW’s commitment to diversity.  
4.   Major Signings  : The arrival of CM Punk, Bryan Danielson, Adam Cole, and other marquee names elevated AEW’s star power and drew global attention.  
5.   Innovative Storytelling  : Long-term storylines, including Hangman Page’s championship chase, established AEW as a master of emotional, layered narratives.

---

  Top Wrestlers    
1.   Kenny Omega  : As AEW World Champion, Omega’s reign (2020–2021) featured show-stealing matches with Jon Moxley, Hangman Page, and others.  
2.   “Hangman” Adam Page  : The emotional culmination of his journey to become AEW World Champion at   Full Gear 2021   cemented him as the face of AEW’s Golden Era.  
3.   The Young Bucks  : Dominating the tag team division with their innovative offense and storytelling, they elevated tag team wrestling to new heights.  
4.   Jon Moxley  : A cornerstone of AEW, Moxley’s work as a fighting champion and his leadership during the pandemic were critical to AEW’s success.  
5.   Britt Baker, D.M.D.  : The face of AEW’s women’s division, Baker’s reign as AEW Women’s Champion, highlighted by her feud with Thunder Rosa, solidified her status as a top star.  
6.   CM Punk  : His return to wrestling at   Rampage: The First Dance   in 2021 was a cultural moment, reigniting mainstream interest in AEW.  

---

  Key Matches    
1.   Hangman Page vs. Kenny Omega (Full Gear 2021)  : A masterclass in long-term storytelling, culminating in Hangman Page’s triumph as AEW World Champion.  
2.   The Young Bucks vs. Lucha Bros (Steel Cage Match, All Out 2021)  : Widely regarded as one of the best tag team matches of all time, this bout elevated AEW’s tag division.  
3.   CM Punk vs. MJF (Dog Collar Match, Revolution 2022)  : A brutal, emotionally charged match that epitomized AEW’s storytelling excellence.  
4.   Thunder Rosa vs. Britt Baker (Lights Out Match, St. Patrick’s Day Slam 2021)  : A groundbreaking moment for AEW’s women’s division.  
5.   Stadium Stampede Matches (Double or Nothing 2020 & 2021)  : These cinematic brawls showcased AEW’s creativity during the pandemic.  

---

  Storylines    
-   The Elite Saga  : A central narrative involving Kenny Omega, The Young Bucks, and Hangman Page explored themes of friendship, betrayal, and redemption.  
-   CM Punk vs. MJF  : Their feud delivered some of the most memorable promos and matches in recent wrestling history.  
-   The Rise of Darby Allin  : With Sting as his mentor, Darby’s underdog stories resonated deeply with fans.  
-   The Inner Circle vs. The Pinnacle  : Faction warfare led to unforgettable matches like   Blood and Guts  .  

---

       Transition Periods    
AEW has experienced key shifts in its identity and leadership, each marked by opportunities and challenges:  

1.   Pandemic Adaptations (2020–2021)  : AEW demonstrated resilience during the COVID-19 pandemic, innovating with crowd simulations at Daily’s Place and adapting storylines to maintain momentum.  
2.   The CM Punk Controversy (2022–2023)  : While CM Punk’s arrival was a game-changer, his backstage conflict with The Elite following   All Out 2022   led to a divisive suspension and his eventual departure in 2023, creating challenges for AEW’s locker room unity.  
3.   Expansion of Programming  : The launch of   AEW Rampage   (2021) and later   AEW Collision   (2023) showcased AEW’s growth but also tested its ability to sustain multiple weekly shows.  

---

       Modern Era    
AEW’s modern era (2023–present) reflects both its evolution and ambitions as a global powerhouse.  

---

  Current State    
1.   Global Expansion  : AEW’s successful UK debut with   All In London 2023   at Wembley Stadium drew over 80,000 fans, signaling its ability to thrive on an international stage.  
2.   Diverse Roster  : The integration of stars like Adam Copeland (formerly Edge), international talents like Will Ospreay, and rising homegrown talents continues to bolster its appeal.  
3.   Creative Refinement  : Storylines such as MJF and Adam Cole’s partnership (“Better Than You Bay Bay”) have captured fan interest, combining humor, drama, and in-ring excellence.  

---

  Recent Developments    
1.   Title Innovations  : AEW has introduced new championships, like the   AEW International Championship  , elevating stars such as Orange Cassidy.  
2.   Focus on Young Talent  : Wrestlers like Ricky Starks, Jamie Hayter, and Toni Storm are stepping into leadership roles, showcasing AEW’s commitment to building future stars.  
3.   Cross-Promotional Efforts  : Collaborations with NJPW (e.g.,   Forbidden Door  ) and ROH have strengthened AEW’s reputation as a hub for global wrestling excellence.  

---

      Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s Golden Era was defined by compelling storytelling, groundbreaking matches, and the emergence of stars who resonate deeply with fans.  
2. Transition periods, particularly during the pandemic and the fallout of internal conflicts, tested AEW’s resilience and adaptability.  
3. In its modern era, AEW is solidifying its position as a global wrestling powerhouse by blending veteran talent with emerging stars and expanding its footprint internationally.  


------------------------

      Wrestling Style and Identity of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s signature in-ring style combines   technical precision  ,   high-flying innovation  , and   hard-hitting intensity  , creating a hybrid approach that appeals to a global audience.  
2. Unique match types like the   Casino Ladder Match   and creative storytelling formats such as the   Stadium Stampede   distinguish AEW as an innovator in modern wrestling.  
3. AEW embraces long-term storytelling with layered character development, balancing emotional narratives with athleticism-driven rivalries.  
4. Rooted in American wrestling traditions, AEW also draws from diverse influences, reflecting global wrestling cultures while shaping a progressive identity in the United States.  

---

      In-Ring Style    
AEW is celebrated for its   hybrid wrestling style  , blending influences from across the globe, including:  

1.   Strong Style  : Borrowed from Japanese wrestling, this style emphasizes realistic strikes, submissions, and suplexes, epitomized by wrestlers like   Jon Moxley   and   Bryan Danielson  .  
2.   Lucha Libre  : AEW integrates Mexican lucha libre’s fast-paced, high-flying action, often showcased by stars like   Rey Fenix  ,   Bandido  , and   Pentagon Jr.  .  
3.   Technical Mastery  : Wrestlers like   Kenny Omega  ,   Adam Cole  , and   Dax Harwood   showcase technical wrestling, blending mat-based grappling with intricate sequences.  
4.   Hard-Hitting Brawling  : AEW incorporates brawling elements into its in-ring storytelling, particularly in faction wars, exemplified by the   Blackpool Combat Club   and matches like   Blood and Guts  .  

AEW’s roster diversity enables matchups that reflect a variety of wrestling philosophies, creating something for every fan while advancing wrestling artistry.  

---

      Match Types    
AEW has developed unique match types and formats that blend tradition with innovation:  

1.   Casino Ladder Match  : A multi-competitor ladder match with a twist—wrestlers enter at timed intervals, combining Royal Rumble-style pacing with high-risk action.  
   - Notable Example:   Casino Ladder Match at All Out 2021  , won by Adam Page.  
2.   Stadium Stampede  : A cinematic, arena-wide match featuring comedic moments, dramatic storytelling, and creative use of environments.  
   - Notable Example:   Inner Circle vs. The Elite   at Double or Nothing 2020.  
3.   Blood and Guts  : AEW’s take on the classic WarGames match, involving two rings enclosed by a steel cage.  
   - Notable Example:   The Pinnacle vs. Inner Circle  , Dynamite 2021.  
4.   Lights Out Matches  : Unsanctioned matches that emphasize brutality and storytelling, often concluding intense rivalries.  
   - Notable Example:   Britt Baker vs. Thunder Rosa   at St. Patrick’s Day Slam 2021.  
5.   Trios Matches  : With a focus on six-man tag team action, AEW created the   Trios Championships   to highlight this division, exemplified by Death Triangle and The Elite.  

These match types reflect AEW’s commitment to innovation and fan engagement while paying homage to wrestling traditions.  

---

      Storytelling Approach    
AEW’s storytelling philosophy revolves around   long-term narratives  , character-driven arcs, and a balance of realism and kayfabe.  

1.   Long-Term Storytelling  : AEW builds rivalries and storylines over months or even years, rewarding attentive fans with intricate callbacks and emotional payoffs.  
   -   Hangman Page’s Journey  : From self-doubt and failures in 2019 to finally defeating Kenny Omega for the AEW World Championship at   Full Gear 2021  , this multi-year arc epitomized AEW’s patient, layered storytelling.  
2.   Character Complexity  : AEW presents nuanced characters who evolve organically, blurring the lines between hero and villain.  
   - Example:   MJF  , a heel who occasionally reveals layers of vulnerability, as seen in his partnership with Adam Cole in 2023.  
3.   Factions and Alliances  : AEW uses factions like   The Inner Circle  ,   The Elite  , and   Blackpool Combat Club   to weave interconnected stories, creating an ecosystem of rivalries and alliances.  
4.   Emotionally Charged Promos  : Wrestlers are given creative freedom in their promos, leading to memorable moments that enhance feuds.  
   - Example:   Cody Rhodes’ fiery promo against Chris Jericho   before Full Gear 2019.  

AEW’s storytelling approach reflects its respect for fans’ intelligence and its belief in the art of professional wrestling as a form of long-term narrative engagement.  

---

      Cultural Identity    
AEW is rooted in American wrestling traditions but transcends cultural boundaries through its inclusivity, innovation, and global representation.  

1.   Reflection of U.S. Culture  :  
   - AEW embodies the spirit of independence, as its creation was a direct response to dissatisfaction with corporate wrestling. Its willingness to challenge conventions mirrors the entrepreneurial ethos of American culture.  
   - Wrestlers like   Darby Allin  , who represents the underdog, and factions like   The Acclaimed  , who blend humor with rebellion, reflect contemporary societal themes.  

2.   Global Influence  :  
   - AEW incorporates international wrestling styles and stars, from lucha libre (Rey Fenix) to Japanese strong style (Kenny Omega). Collaborations with NJPW and partnerships with global stars like Will Ospreay further amplify this reach.  

3.   Cultural Shifts in Wrestling  :  
   - By spotlighting women’s wrestling, LGBTQ+ representation (e.g., Nyla Rose, Sonny Kiss), and diverse voices, AEW is actively shaping a more inclusive and progressive culture within professional wrestling.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    
1.   Continued Innovation  : AEW should build on its success by expanding unique match formats and engaging in further cross-promotional efforts.  
2.   Global Expansion  : With successes like   All In London  , AEW has the potential to secure a dominant global presence by hosting events in untapped markets like South America and India.  
3.   Enhancing Storytelling Depth  : As AEW matures, refining its mid-card storylines and balancing its growing roster will ensure sustained fan engagement.  

AEW’s wrestling style and identity combine technical brilliance, narrative innovation, and cultural inclusivity, creating a platform that honors the past while shaping the future of wrestling. 



------------------------

      Championships and Tournaments of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s championship structure balances prestige, representation, and opportunities for diverse storytelling.  
2. Its tournaments, such as the   Owen Hart Foundation Tournament  , integrate tradition with AEW’s progressive vision.  
3. Notable champions like Kenny Omega and Jon Moxley have set high standards for championship reigns, cementing the legacy of AEW’s titles.  
4. AEW’s championships are more than accolades; they represent the company’s evolution, fan-centric approach, and commitment to excellence.  

---

      Major Titles    
AEW features a well-rounded championship lineup, each catering to different aspects of its diverse roster:  

1.   AEW World Championship    
   -   Introduced  : 2019  
   -   Significance  : The pinnacle of AEW, symbolizing excellence in professional wrestling.  
   -   Notable Reigns  :  
     -   Chris Jericho   (Inaugural Champion, 182 days): Established the title’s prestige with marquee defenses.  
     -   Kenny Omega   (346 days): His reign solidified AEW as a global force, including defenses across AEW, Impact Wrestling, and AAA.  
     -   Jon Moxley   (Two-time champion): Known for his hard-hitting defenses during the pandemic and beyond.  

2.   AEW Women’s World Championship    
   -   Introduced  : 2019  
   -   Significance  : A platform for showcasing the best in women’s wrestling.  
   -   Notable Reigns  :  
     -   Hikaru Shida   (372 days): Her dominant reign became the backbone of the women’s division during the pandemic.  
     -   Britt Baker, D.M.D.  : Elevated the title’s status with memorable rivalries and charismatic character work.  

3.   AEW World Tag Team Championship    
   -   Introduced  : 2019  
   -   Significance  : Celebrates AEW’s deep and innovative tag team roster.  
   -   Notable Reigns  :  
     -   The Young Bucks  : Renowned for their high-octane matches and influential storytelling.  
     -   FTR  : Brought classic tag team psychology and international prestige to the division.  

4.   TNT Championship    
   -   Introduced  : 2020  
   -   Significance  : Focuses on rising stars and mid-card storytelling.  
   -   Notable Reigns  :  
     -   Cody Rhodes   (Three-time champion): His open challenges showcased fresh talent and made the title a fan favorite.  
     -   Darby Allin  : Embodied the underdog spirit, defending the title with grit and heart.  

5.   TBS Championship    
   -   Introduced  : 2022  
   -   Significance  : A secondary women’s title highlighting depth in the division.  
   -   Notable Reign  :  
     -   Jade Cargill   (First champion, 508 days): Dominated the division, showcasing her star power and athleticism.  

6.   AEW International Championship   (formerly AEW All-Atlantic Championship)  
   -   Introduced  : 2022  
   -   Significance  : Represents AEW’s global ambitions.  
   -   Notable Reign  :  
     -   Orange Cassidy  : Elevated the title with an incredible run of 31 defenses, combining comedy with elite wrestling skill.  

7.   AEW World Trios Championship    
   -   Introduced  : 2022  
   -   Significance  : Showcases AEW’s emphasis on faction-based storytelling and teamwork.  
   -   Notable Reigns  :  
     -   Death Triangle   (First champions): Set the tone for thrilling, fast-paced trios action.  
     -   The Elite  : Brought star power and innovation to the division.  

---

      Tournaments    
AEW hosts annual tournaments and special events that elevate its roster and pay homage to wrestling traditions:  

1.   Owen Hart Foundation Tournament    
   -   Established  : 2022, in collaboration with the Owen Hart Foundation.  
   -   Significance  : Honors Owen Hart’s legacy by spotlighting technical wrestling and sportsmanship.  
   -   Notable Winners  :  
     -   Adam Cole   (2022): His win reflected his mastery of storytelling and in-ring prowess.  

2.   Casino Ladder Match    
   -   Format  : Wrestlers enter at timed intervals, with the objective of retrieving a casino chip hanging above the ring.  
   -   Significance  : Adds unpredictability and a unique spectacle to AEW’s calendar.  

3.   AEW Dynamite Diamond Ring Battle Royale    
   -   Established  : 2019  
   -   Significance  : Combines traditional battle royale elements with the added prize of the Dynamite Diamond Ring, an accolade often used to further storylines (notably by MJF).  

4.   AEW World Title Eliminator Tournament    
   -   Established  : 2020  
   -   Significance  : Determines a challenger for the AEW World Championship, showcasing rising stars and title contenders.  

5.   Tag Team Tournaments    
   - Events like the   Blind Eliminator Tag Team Tournament   explore new dynamics, fostering storytelling opportunities and partnerships (e.g., MJF and Adam Cole’s unexpected team).  

---

      Notable Champions    
Certain wrestlers have defined AEW’s championships through their reigns:  

1.   Kenny Omega  : As AEW World Champion, Omega’s reign represented the peak of AEW’s Golden Era.  
2.   Hikaru Shida  : Elevated the women’s division during challenging times, becoming a symbol of resilience.  
3.   Jon Moxley  : His two reigns as AEW World Champion showcased his versatility as a wrestler and leader.  
4.   Jade Cargill  : Dominated the TBS Championship, setting a record-breaking standard.  
5.   Orange Cassidy  : Redefined the mid-card title landscape with his record-setting International Championship reign.  

---

      Legacy of Titles    
AEW’s championship structure reflects its commitment to blending tradition with innovation:  

1.   Prestige and Representation  : AEW titles are crafted to reflect excellence across divisions while ensuring inclusivity, such as through the TBS Championship for women and the International Championship for global representation.  
2.   Story-Driven Importance  : Championships often serve as focal points for major storylines, such as MJF’s pursuit of the AEW World Championship and Britt Baker’s feud with Thunder Rosa.  
3.   Fan Engagement  : Open challenges and unique title defenses (e.g., Cody Rhodes’ TNT Championship reign) have created memorable moments that resonate with AEW’s passionate fanbase.  
4.   Global Recognition  : The involvement of international talent and cross-promotional defenses (e.g., AAA and NJPW partnerships) has bolstered AEW’s reputation as a global wrestling hub.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    
1.   Expand Tournament Prestige  : Building more annual tournaments (e.g., tag-focused or trios-specific) can further spotlight AEW’s roster depth.  
2.   Title Evolution  : As AEW continues to grow, introducing regional or developmental titles could create pathways for emerging talent.  
3.   Global Defenses  : Leveraging AEW’s international partnerships to defend titles on major stages worldwide can enhance their significance.  

By maintaining its balance of tradition and innovation, AEW’s championships and tournaments remain integral to its identity and a key factor in its growth as a global wrestling leader.

-----------------------

      Iconic Wrestlers of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s roster is a mix of   legends  ,   innovators  ,   international stars  , and   underrated talents  , each contributing to the promotion’s unique identity and success.  
2. Iconic wrestlers like Jon Moxley and Chris Jericho laid the foundation for AEW’s credibility, while innovators such as Kenny Omega redefined in-ring artistry.  
3. International stars, including PAC and Hikaru Shida, have brought global styles and prestige, expanding AEW’s appeal worldwide.  
4. Underrated talents, like Eddie Kingston and Serena Deeb, have been pivotal in shaping AEW’s storytelling and match quality despite often being overlooked.  

---

      Legends    
AEW’s success is rooted in the contributions of legendary wrestlers who brought credibility, star power, and leadership to the promotion:  

1.   Chris Jericho    
   - As the   inaugural AEW World Champion  , Jericho legitimized the promotion’s top title.  
   - His faction leadership in   The Inner Circle   and later the   Jericho Appreciation Society   provided compelling storylines.  
   - Iconic Matches:   Chris Jericho vs. Hangman Page (All Out 2019)  ,   Chris Jericho vs. Jon Moxley (Revolution 2020)  .  

2.   Jon Moxley    
   - A cornerstone of AEW, Moxley’s gritty style and leadership during the COVID-19 pandemic solidified his place as an AEW legend.  
   - Notable Feuds:   Kenny Omega  ,   MJF  , and   CM Punk  .  
   - Iconic Matches:   Jon Moxley vs. Kenny Omega (Full Gear 2019)  ,   Jon Moxley vs. CM Punk (All Out 2022)  .  

3.   Sting    
   - The wrestling icon brought decades of legacy to AEW, mentoring   Darby Allin   and competing in cinematic and in-ring matches.  
   - Key Moment:   Sting’s return to in-ring action at Revolution 2021  , partnering with Darby Allin in a cinematic street fight.  

4.   Cody Rhodes    
   - A founding EVP, Cody’s early work, including the   TNT Championship  , positioned AEW as a promotion where emotion-driven storytelling could thrive.  
   - Iconic Matches:   Cody Rhodes vs. Dustin Rhodes (Double or Nothing 2019)  ,   Cody Rhodes vs. Brodie Lee (Dog Collar Match, Dynamite 2020)  .  

---

      Innovators    
AEW thrives on groundbreaking wrestlers who have introduced fresh styles and techniques:  

1.   Kenny Omega    
   - Known for his epic storytelling, Omega’s   “Best Bout Machine”   persona has redefined modern wrestling.  
   - Innovations: Long-form storytelling with intricate match pacing, exemplified by his AEW World Championship reign.  
   - Iconic Matches:   Kenny Omega vs. Hangman Page (Full Gear 2021)  ,   The Young Bucks and Kenny Omega vs. Death Triangle (Trios Match, Revolution 2023)  .  

2.   The Young Bucks (Matt and Nick Jackson)    
   - Pioneers in tag team wrestling, the Bucks popularized high-speed, high-risk styles and layered storytelling in tag matches.  
   - Iconic Matches:   Young Bucks vs. Lucha Bros (All Out 2021 Steel Cage Match)  .  

3.   Darby Allin    
   - Innovator of the underdog narrative, using reckless, high-risk moves to build emotional investment.  
   - Notable Moments:   Coffin Drop finish against Ethan Page (Fyter Fest 2021)  .  

4.   Orange Cassidy    
   - Blended comedy and elite-level wrestling, making him a unique draw for casual and hardcore fans alike.  
   - Key Matches: His   AEW International Championship   defenses elevated the mid-card division.  

---

      International Stars    
AEW’s roster is enriched by international talent that introduces diverse wrestling styles and global appeal:  

1.   PAC    
   - Style: A mix of technical wrestling and aerial maneuvers, bringing intensity to the ring.  
   - Impact: A founding member of   Death Triangle  , PAC has been integral to trios matches and international exposure.  
   - Iconic Matches:   PAC vs. Kenny Omega (Iron Man Match, Dynamite 2020)  .  

2.   Hikaru Shida    
   - The longest-reigning AEW Women’s World Champion, Shida brought a Japanese strong-style influence to AEW’s women’s division.  
   - Key Matches:   Shida vs. Nyla Rose (Double or Nothing 2020)  ,   Shida vs. Britt Baker (Dynamite 2021)  .  

3.   Rey Fenix    
   - Known for his lucha libre artistry, Fenix has delivered awe-inspiring performances in singles and tag team divisions.  
   - Iconic Matches:   Lucha Bros vs. Young Bucks (All Out 2021 Steel Cage Match)  .  

4.   Will Ospreay    
   - While not officially signed to AEW, Ospreay’s appearances have added global prestige to AEW’s brand.  
   - Key Matches:   Will Ospreay vs. Kenny Omega (Forbidden Door 2023)  .  

---

      Underrated Talents    
Several AEW wrestlers have quietly contributed to the promotion’s success without always receiving the recognition they deserve:  

1.   Eddie Kingston    
   - A master of emotional promos, Kingston’s authenticity has made him a fan favorite.  
   - Key Feuds:   Jon Moxley  ,   Chris Jericho  , and his rivalry with   Claudio Castagnoli   in AEW and ROH.  

2.   Serena Deeb    
   - Dubbed the “Professor of Professional Wrestling,” Deeb’s technical prowess elevated AEW’s women’s division.  
   - Key Matches:   Serena Deeb vs. Thunder Rosa (Double or Nothing 2022)  .  

3.   Ricky Starks    
   - Known for his charisma and in-ring versatility, Starks has consistently impressed in mid-card and main-event settings.  
   - Notable Matches:   Ricky Starks vs. MJF (Winter is Coming 2022)  .  

4.   Scorpio Sky    
   - AEW’s first   TNT Champion  , Sky’s smooth wrestling style and early contributions as part of   SCU   were vital in AEW’s formative years.  
   - Key Matches:   Scorpio Sky vs. Cody Rhodes (Dynamite 2020)  .  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    
1.   Highlighting Underrated Stars  : AEW should invest in consistent storytelling for talents like Eddie Kingston and Serena Deeb to maximize their potential.  
2.   Continued Global Reach  : By featuring international stars like PAC and Ospreay in marquee events, AEW can solidify its global identity.  
3.   Showcasing Innovation  : Wrestlers like Darby Allin and Orange Cassidy exemplify AEW’s appeal to younger audiences and should remain at the forefront of programming.  

By blending the contributions of legends, innovators, international talent, and underrated performers, AEW has crafted a roster that reflects its progressive ethos and commitment to wrestling excellence.




--------------------------

      Major Rivalries and Storylines in All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s rivalries are a mix of emotionally charged   wrestler vs. wrestler feuds  , high-stakes   faction wars  , and innovative   cross-promotional battles  .  
2. AEW excels at   long-term storytelling  , crafting narratives that reward fans with meaningful payoffs over months or even years.  
3. Rivalries like   MJF vs. CM Punk  ,   The Elite vs. The Blackpool Combat Club  , and cross-promotional battles with NJPW have defined AEW’s identity as a fan-driven, globally connected promotion.  

---

      Wrestler vs. Wrestler Feuds    
AEW’s most famous individual rivalries are rooted in compelling characters, intense promos, and high-stakes matches:  

1.   MJF vs. CM Punk    
   -   Build  : This feud was built on psychological warfare, with MJF mocking CM Punk’s legacy and CM Punk exposing MJF’s insecurities.  
   -   Key Matches  :  
     -   Dog Collar Match   (Revolution 2022): A brutal, emotionally charged encounter that culminated in Punk’s victory.  
   -   Memorable Moments  : MJF’s “fan letter” promo to Punk, followed by his betrayal, became a viral moment of layered storytelling.  

2.   Hangman Adam Page vs. Kenny Omega    
   -   Build  : Spanning years, this rivalry explored themes of friendship, betrayal, and redemption. Hangman Page’s struggles with self-doubt contrasted with Omega’s cold ambition.  
   -   Key Matches  :  
     -   AEW World Championship Match   (Full Gear 2021): Hangman defeated Omega in a career-defining moment.  
   -   Significance  : This feud exemplified AEW’s mastery of long-term storytelling, weaving through The Elite’s factional dynamics.  

3.   Chris Jericho vs. Jon Moxley    
   -   Build  : Jericho, as AEW’s inaugural champion, invited Moxley to join   The Inner Circle  , leading to Moxley’s dramatic rejection.  
   -   Key Matches  :  
     -   AEW World Championship Match   (Revolution 2020): Moxley dethroned Jericho in a pivotal moment for AEW.  
   -   Impact  : Moxley’s victory solidified him as AEW’s top star while positioning Jericho as an enduring antagonist.  

---

      Faction Wars    
AEW has embraced faction-based storytelling, creating multi-layered rivalries that engage entire rosters:  

1.   The Elite vs. The Blackpool Combat Club (BCC)    
   -   Build  : A clash between The Elite’s dynamic style and BCC’s gritty, hard-hitting ethos.  
   -   Key Matches  :  
     -   Blood and Guts Match   (Dynamite 2023): A chaotic, high-stakes battle in AEW’s signature faction war format.  
   -   Significance  : This rivalry brought intense drama, aligning fans with The Elite’s unity and showcasing BCC’s brutality.  

2.   The Inner Circle vs. The Pinnacle    
   -   Build  : The Pinnacle, led by MJF, formed as a rival faction to dethrone Jericho’s Inner Circle.  
   -   Key Matches  :  
     -   Blood and Guts Match   (2021): A violent, bloody showdown that defined the animosity between the factions.  
     -   Stadium Stampede Match   (Double or Nothing 2021): A blend of cinematic and traditional wrestling.  
   -   Significance  : This feud elevated both factions, showcasing AEW’s creativity in blending humor, drama, and violence.  

3.   House of Black vs. Death Triangle    
   -   Build  : A supernatural feud filled with mind games and breathtaking in-ring action.  
   -   Key Matches  :  
     -   Trios Matches  : The rivalry culminated in contests for the AEW World Trios Championship.  
   -   Impact  : This feud spotlighted AEW’s diverse styles, from lucha libre to dark, character-driven storytelling.  

---

      Cross-Promotional Feuds    
AEW’s collaborations with other promotions have resulted in high-profile cross-promotional feuds that captured global attention:  

1.   AEW vs. NJPW (Forbidden Door)    
   -   Key Rivalry  :   Kenny Omega vs. Will Ospreay    
     -   Matches  : Their battles at   Forbidden Door 2023   and NJPW Wrestle Kingdom showcased world-class technical wrestling.  
   -   Significance  : This feud elevated AEW’s status in Japan while bringing NJPW stars to a broader audience.  

2.   AEW vs. Impact Wrestling    
   -   Key Rivalry  :   Kenny Omega vs. Rich Swann    
     -   Match  : Omega defeated Swann to win the Impact World Championship, cementing AEW’s dominance in cross-promotional storytelling.  
   -   Impact  : This partnership created a dynamic narrative that bridged two promotions and emphasized Omega’s global supremacy.  

3.   AEW and ROH Integration    
   -   Key Rivalry  :   FTR vs. The Briscoes    
     -   Matches  : Their trilogy for the ROH World Tag Team Championship included critically acclaimed bouts, such as the   Double Dog Collar Match (Final Battle 2022)  .  
   -   Impact  : This feud highlighted AEW’s respect for ROH’s legacy while creating unforgettable moments.  

---

      Long-Term Storytelling    
AEW’s ability to craft multi-year narratives has become a hallmark of its success:  

1.   The Elite Saga (2019–Present)    
   -   Narrative  : The evolving relationships between Kenny Omega, The Young Bucks, and Hangman Page have anchored AEW’s storytelling since its inception.  
   -   Key Moments  :  
     - Hangman’s emotional triumph over Omega (Full Gear 2021).  
     - The Elite’s return to face Death Triangle (2022).  
   -   Significance  : This saga reflects AEW’s commitment to layered character arcs and rewarding loyal viewers.  

2.   MJF’s Rise (2019–Present)    
   -   Narrative  : From his days as Cody Rhodes’ protégé to becoming AEW World Champion, MJF’s character evolution has been a slow burn.  
   -   Key Moments  :  
     - Betraying Cody Rhodes.  
     - His emotional promos and clashes with CM Punk.  
   -   Impact  : MJF’s long-term journey demonstrates AEW’s skill in developing stars over time.  

3.   Darby Allin’s Journey    
   -   Narrative  : As an underdog mentored by Sting, Darby’s rise has been a consistent thread in AEW programming.  
   -   Key Matches  : His TNT Championship reign featured intense defenses against top competitors like Miro and Samoa Joe.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    
1.   Maintain Faction Depth  : AEW’s strength in faction wars can be further expanded with new alliances or reviving classic factions like The Dark Order.  
2.   Strengthen Cross-Promotional Partnerships  : Continuing collaborations with NJPW and expanding into other markets (e.g., CMLL in Mexico or NOAH in Japan) could broaden AEW’s global reach.  
3.   Continue Long-Term Storytelling  : Stories like The Elite saga and MJF’s rise should inspire more arcs that blend realism with wrestling’s theatrical nature.  

By blending iconic rivalries, faction dynamics, and cross-promotional innovation, AEW has positioned itself as a leader in wrestling storytelling. 


-------------------------

AEW’s Influence on the Wrestling Industry
Key Takeaways
AEW has revolutionized the industry with innovations in match types, storytelling formats, and its fan-centric presentation.
By fostering partnerships with international promotions and diversifying its roster, AEW has made a profound global impact, broadening wrestling’s appeal.
AEW’s legacy lies in its ability to challenge the monopoly of WWE, reinvigorate competition, and offer creative freedom to wrestlers.
The promotion’s emphasis on storytelling, diversity, and collaboration has inspired modern wrestling organizations, setting a new benchmark for how wrestling promotions operate.
Innovations
AEW has introduced numerous unique contributions to professional wrestling that distinguish it from its competitors:

Match Types

Stadium Stampede: A cinematic, arena-wide match that blends humor, drama, and action.
Example: The Elite vs. The Inner Circle (Double or Nothing 2020).
Blood and Guts: AEW’s modern version of the WarGames match, featuring brutal, faction-driven storytelling.
Example: The Pinnacle vs. The Inner Circle (Dynamite 2021).
Casino Ladder Match: A variation of the ladder match with staggered wrestler entrances, creating a mix of Royal Rumble suspense and traditional ladder match chaos.
Presentation and Storytelling

Long-Term Storytelling: AEW prioritizes narratives that unfold over months or even years, rewarding attentive fans.
Example: Hangman Page’s multi-year journey to the AEW World Championship.
Creative Freedom: Wrestlers are given significant autonomy in crafting their promos and characters, leading to organic fan connections.
Example: MJF’s emotionally charged promos and nuanced character work.
Fan Engagement

AEW actively listens to its fanbase, incorporating feedback into storylines and programming decisions.
Its open-challenge format, pioneered by Cody Rhodes for the TNT Championship, allowed fans to see new talents and unexpected matchups.
Diversity and Inclusivity

AEW has embraced diversity, with groundbreaking representation of women, international wrestlers, and LGBTQ+ performers.
Example: Nyla Rose, the first transgender woman to win a major wrestling championship (AEW Women’s World Championship).
Global Impact
AEW’s influence extends far beyond its U.S. roots, fostering global connections and elevating international wrestling:

Cross-Promotional Collaboration

AEW has worked with major promotions worldwide, including NJPW, Impact Wrestling, AAA, and ROH.
Example: AEW x NJPW Forbidden Door, an annual crossover event featuring dream matches like Kenny Omega vs. Will Ospreay.
Spotlighting International Talent

AEW regularly features wrestlers from diverse wrestling cultures, including Japan, Mexico, and the UK.
Example: Stars like PAC (UK), Hikaru Shida (Japan), and Pentagon Jr. (Mexico) have brought their unique styles to AEW.
Expanding Wrestling’s Global Reach

All In London 2023 at Wembley Stadium drew over 80,000 fans, showcasing AEW’s ability to thrive internationally and engage global audiences.
Legacy
AEW’s lasting impact on the wrestling industry is defined by its disruption of the status quo and its contributions to the art form:

Reinvigorating Competition

AEW’s success forced WWE to innovate, including the rebranding of NXT and a renewed focus on long-term storytelling.
The “Wednesday Night Wars” between AEW Dynamite and WWE NXT marked the return of weekly competition, reminiscent of the 1990s wrestling boom.
Empowering Wrestlers

AEW’s emphasis on creative freedom has provided wrestlers with an alternative to the rigid structures of WWE.
High-profile departures from WWE to AEW (e.g., Jon Moxley, Bryan Danielson, Adam Cole) demonstrated that top talent valued artistic autonomy over corporate control.
Reviving Tag Team and Trios Wrestling

AEW elevated tag team wrestling to main-event status, with iconic bouts featuring The Young Bucks, Lucha Bros, and FTR.
The introduction of the AEW World Trios Championship showcased multi-man matches as a core part of AEW’s identity.
Influence on Modern Promotions
AEW has inspired and reshaped how wrestling organizations approach the sport:

Creative Freedom as a Standard

AEW’s approach to letting wrestlers dictate their characters and promos has influenced other promotions, including smaller independent circuits.
WWE, under Triple H’s creative leadership, has also adopted more character-driven and fan-centric storytelling.
Collaborative Ecosystem

AEW has shown the benefits of cross-promotion, paving the way for other organizations to collaborate.
Example: Impact Wrestling has continued working with NJPW, partially inspired by its success with AEW.
Event Production and Presentation

AEW’s cinematic match formats (e.g., Stadium Stampede) and the inclusion of fan-friendly elements like themed shows (Winter is Coming, Beach Break) have encouraged modern promotions to think beyond traditional formats.
Raising Standards for Women’s Wrestling

AEW’s Women’s World Championship matches, as well as high-profile feuds like Britt Baker vs. Thunder Rosa, have pushed other promotions to elevate their women’s divisions.
Actionable Insights and Conclusion
Expand Global Events: AEW should capitalize on its success with All In London by hosting events in emerging markets like India, South America, and Australia.
Nurture Young Talent: Continuing to spotlight up-and-coming stars, like Wheeler Yuta and Jamie Hayter, will ensure AEW’s legacy as a platform for future icons.
Enhance Diversity: AEW should maintain its commitment to inclusivity by further developing its women’s division and continuing to feature talent from underrepresented regions.
AEW has not only challenged the norms of professional wrestling but also inspired the industry to evolve creatively, collaboratively, and inclusively. Its legacy will undoubtedly shape wrestling’s future for years to come. 


--------------------

      Challenges and Controversies in All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW has navigated   financial pressures   related to rapid growth, roster expansion, and high-profile signings, balancing long-term investment with sustainability.  
2.   Roster changes  , including departures, retirements, and injuries, have periodically tested the company’s stability and booking plans.  
3.   Backstage controversies  , such as conflicts involving CM Punk and The Elite, highlighted challenges in maintaining locker room cohesion.  
4. AEW’s emergence as a competitor to WWE sparked intense competition, leading to innovations but also creating pressure to sustain momentum.  

---

      Financial Struggles    

While AEW has not faced bankruptcy or severe financial crises, its rapid growth and ambitious goals have brought unique financial challenges:  

1.   High Startup Costs    
   -   Initial Investment  : AEW’s launch in 2019 required significant capital, including production costs, arena rentals, and signing top-tier talent. Backed by Shahid Khan’s financial resources, AEW avoided immediate financial concerns but faced pressure to deliver consistent revenue growth.  

2.   Roster Expansion    
   - AEW’s acquisition of high-profile wrestlers like   CM Punk  ,   Bryan Danielson  , and   Adam Cole   brought prestige but also raised payroll expenses.  
   - Maintaining an expansive roster while balancing TV time and fan expectations created logistical and financial strain.  

3.   Pandemic Impact    
   -   COVID-19 Era (2020–2021)  : Live events, a critical revenue stream, were disrupted during the pandemic. AEW adapted by hosting shows at Daily’s Place with limited or no live audiences, resulting in reduced ticket sales and increased reliance on pay-per-view revenue and television rights.  

---

      Roster Changes    

AEW’s dynamic roster has been a strength but also a source of challenges, especially when key wrestlers departed, retired, or faced injuries:  

1.   Departures and Releases    
   -   Cody Rhodes  : A founding EVP and one of AEW’s key stars, Rhodes’ departure in early 2022 to return to WWE was a significant loss. His exit raised questions about AEW’s ability to retain top-tier talent long-term.  
   -   Joey Janela and others  : Several early signees who contributed to AEW’s foundation, like Janela, left the company as its focus shifted to high-profile acquisitions.  

2.   Injuries    
   -   CM Punk  : Sidelined multiple times due to injuries, Punk’s absences disrupted major storylines and derailed his momentum as AEW World Champion.  
   -   Kris Statlander  : A promising talent in the women’s division, Statlander’s recurring injuries limited her ability to establish long-term consistency.  

3.   Retirements    
   - While AEW hasn’t faced major retirement waves, legends like   Sting   are nearing the end of their careers, signaling the need for succession planning and a focus on younger talent.  

---

      Backstage Issues    

AEW has experienced high-profile backstage controversies that impacted its public image and locker room cohesion:  

1.   CM Punk vs. The Elite    
   -   All Out 2022 Incident  : Following a heated post-show media scrum, a backstage altercation occurred between CM Punk, Kenny Omega, and The Young Bucks.  
   -   Impact  : This led to suspensions for all involved, stripping Punk of the AEW World Championship and The Elite of the Trios Championships. The incident highlighted challenges in managing egos within a high-profile locker room.  

2.   Sammy Guevara Feuds    
   - Guevara was involved in multiple backstage disputes, including one with Eddie Kingston (reportedly leading to a suspension for Kingston) and another with Andrade El Idolo.  
   -   Impact  : These incidents raised concerns about AEW’s locker room discipline and conflict resolution processes.  

3.   Creative Tensions    
   - Reports of tension between talent and management occasionally surfaced, including concerns over inconsistent storytelling and overcrowding on the roster.  

---

      Competition    

As a young promotion, AEW has faced immense pressure to compete with WWE, the global leader in professional wrestling:  

1.   Wednesday Night Wars    
   - AEW Dynamite debuted on TNT in October 2019, directly competing with WWE NXT in a modern version of the “Monday Night Wars.”  
   -   Outcome  : AEW consistently outperformed NXT in ratings, leading WWE to move NXT to a different night in 2021. This victory solidified AEW’s status as WWE’s primary competitor.  

2.   High-Profile Signings    
   - AEW’s acquisition of stars like Jon Moxley and Bryan Danielson countered WWE’s dominance, signaling that AEW could provide a viable alternative for top talent.  
   - WWE responded by introducing   high-budget events  , such as WrestleMania-level production for premium live shows, to maintain its competitive edge.  

3.   Innovation Under Pressure    
   - AEW introduced groundbreaking concepts, including   Forbidden Door  , a cross-promotional event with NJPW, to differentiate itself and attract fans seeking fresh content.  

4.   Cross-Promotion Rivalries    
   - AEW also faced indirect competition from NJPW, Impact Wrestling, and indie promotions for talent and global fanbases. However, its collaborative approach mitigated tension and fostered mutual growth.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    

1.   Enhance Locker Room Unity    
   - AEW should focus on conflict resolution strategies, such as appointing a neutral backstage mediator, to address disputes proactively and maintain a cohesive locker room culture.  

2.   Sustain Financial Growth    
   - Diversifying revenue streams through international expansion (e.g., more events like   All In London  ) and merchandising can alleviate pressure from roster expenses.  

3.   Focus on Retention    
   - Creating long-term opportunities for talent, including creative roles or mentoring programs, can help AEW retain key stars while developing younger wrestlers.  

4.   Continue Innovating Under Competition    
   - To stay ahead, AEW should lean into its strengths, such as long-term storytelling, diverse match types, and cross-promotional collaborations, while avoiding over-saturation of events.  

Despite challenges and controversies, AEW has proven its resilience as a trailblazer in professional wrestling, reshaping the industry and reinvigorating competition. 



-----------------------

      Fanbase and Community of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s   fan culture   is built on passion, inclusivity, and an interactive relationship with the promotion, making its fanbase a core pillar of its identity.  
2. The company excels at   fan engagement   through live events, social media, and interactive content that prioritizes fan voices and feedback.  
3. AEW’s   global reach   has grown rapidly, with international events like   All In London 2023   and collaborations with global promotions expanding its fanbase.  
4.   Memorable fan moments  , such as CM Punk’s return or live crowd reactions to Hangman Page’s championship win, underscore the deep emotional connection between AEW and its audience.  

---

      Fan Culture    

AEW’s fanbase is characterized by its   dedication, inclusivity, and grassroots origins  , making it one of the most engaged communities in wrestling today:  

1.   Passionate and Knowledgeable    
   - AEW fans are highly invested in the product, often knowledgeable about independent wrestling, international promotions, and long-term storylines.  
   - This engagement creates a loyal and vocal community that values wrestling’s artistic and athletic aspects.  

2.   Inclusivity    
   - AEW fans appreciate the promotion’s focus on diversity, supporting wrestlers of different backgrounds, identities, and styles.  
   -   Example  : Fans have celebrated stars like Nyla Rose, Orange Cassidy, and Jade Cargill for breaking stereotypes and redefining roles in wrestling.  

3.   Traditions and Rituals    
   - AEW crowds have developed unique chants and traditions, such as chanting   “This is Awesome!”   or   “Fight Forever”   during standout matches.  
   - Fans often sing along to wrestler entrances, most notably Chris Jericho’s   “Judas”  , turning it into an iconic part of AEW shows.  

---

      Fan Engagement    

AEW has built a strong relationship with its audience by fostering interactivity and valuing fan input:  

1.   Live Events    
   - AEW’s live shows prioritize crowd interaction, with high-energy environments that make fans feel integral to the experience.  
   -   Example  : Events like   Double or Nothing   and   All Out   include fan-friendly elements like meet-and-greets and themed matches.  

2.   Social Media and Digital Content    
   - AEW uses platforms like Twitter, Instagram, and YouTube to engage with fans, often responding directly to feedback and questions.  
   - The   Being the Elite   YouTube series, created by The Young Bucks, provides behind-the-scenes insights and humor, fostering a deeper connection with fans.  

3.   Fan-Centric Booking    
   - AEW incorporates fan reactions into its booking decisions, often pushing organically popular wrestlers like   Eddie Kingston  ,   Orange Cassidy  , or   The Acclaimed   into prominent storylines.  

4.   Open Challenges    
   - Initiatives like Cody Rhodes’   TNT Championship Open Challenge   allowed fans to see surprise debuts and independent stars compete, further blurring the line between AEW and its audience.  

---

      Global Reach    

AEW’s efforts to expand internationally have significantly increased its global fanbase:  

1.   All In London 2023    
   - AEW’s debut in the UK at Wembley Stadium drew over 80,000 fans, marking a milestone for its international expansion.  
   - This event demonstrated AEW’s ability to thrive in new markets, with plans for future global events likely to follow.  

2.   Collaborations with Global Promotions    
   - Partnerships with   NJPW  ,   AAA  , and other international organizations have introduced AEW to fans worldwide.  
     -   Example  : The   Forbidden Door   pay-per-view featured dream matches that appealed to fans of both AEW and NJPW.  

3.   International Roster    
   - AEW features wrestlers from around the globe, such as PAC (UK), Hikaru Shida (Japan), and Pentagon Jr. (Mexico), ensuring representation for diverse audiences.  

4.   Streaming and Accessibility    
   - AEW’s partnership with platforms like FITE TV and its global pay-per-view distribution allow fans from countries without live events to stay connected to the product.  

---

      Memorable Fan Moments    

AEW’s focus on creating emotional and interactive moments has led to several iconic fan-driven experiences:  

1.   CM Punk’s Return (Rampage: The First Dance, 2021)    
   - The deafening crowd reaction in Chicago when CM Punk made his long-awaited wrestling return became an unforgettable moment. Fans chanted   “CM Punk!”   even before the show began, showcasing their anticipation.  

2.   “Judas” Sing-Alongs    
   - Chris Jericho’s entrance theme became a tradition, with fans singing the lyrics to   “Judas”   in unison during his entrances, creating electric atmospheres at live events.  

3.   Hangman Page’s AEW World Championship Win (Full Gear 2021)    
   - The eruption of cheers when Hangman Page pinned Kenny Omega to win the AEW World Championship underscored fans’ emotional investment in his multi-year storyline.  

4.   The Acclaimed’s “Scissor Me Daddy Ass”    
   - The Acclaimed’s humorous catchphrase and their audience interactions during entrances made them one of AEW’s most beloved acts, with fans bringing custom signs and chanting in support.  

5.   Crowd Reactions to Matches    
   - Matches like   Young Bucks vs. Lucha Bros (All Out 2021 Steel Cage Match)   or Thunder Rosa vs. Britt Baker (Lights Out Match) saw fans chanting   “This is Awesome”   and standing ovations, reflecting their deep appreciation for the in-ring product.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    

1.   Expand International Tours    
   - Following the success of   All In London  , AEW should explore hosting events in other markets, such as Canada, Mexico, and Australia, to further grow its global footprint.  

2.   Leverage Digital Content    
   - AEW can enhance fan engagement by producing more behind-the-scenes content or wrestler-led vlogs that connect with fans beyond the ring.  

3.   Strengthen Fan Interaction at Live Events    
   - Enhancing fan experiences through pre-show meet-and-greets, post-match Q&A sessions, or interactive voting for match stipulations can deepen audience involvement.  

4.   Sustain Emotional Storytelling    
   - AEW should continue building long-term narratives that resonate with fans, ensuring emotional payoffs like Hangman Page’s title win or MJF’s rise to prominence.  

AEW’s vibrant fan culture, global ambition, and ability to create iconic moments make it a standout promotion in modern wrestling. Its focus on inclusivity, engagement, and emotional storytelling cements its place as a leader in cultivating community within the wrestling world. 



-----------------------

      Media and Presentation of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s   television and streaming partnerships  , particularly with TNT and TBS, have positioned it as a mainstream wrestling brand while leveraging platforms like FITE TV for global access.  
2. Its   production style  , marked by cinematic match formats, dynamic camera work, and vibrant lighting, creates a polished yet distinctive presentation.  
3.   Merchandising and branding   have played a key role in AEW’s revenue growth, with innovative strategies like fan-focused designs and partnerships with major retailers.  
4. Documentaries, vlogs, and behind-the-scenes media like   “Being the Elite”   provide a deeper connection to AEW’s wrestlers and history.  

---

      Television and Streaming    

1.   Broadcast Partnerships    
   - AEW debuted on   TNT   in October 2019 with   AEW Dynamite  , marking a return of mainstream wrestling to Turner networks since WCW’s demise in 2001.  
   - In 2022, AEW expanded its footprint by moving Dynamite and launching   AEW Rampage   on   TBS  , solidifying a strong partnership with Warner Bros. Discovery.  
   - AEW later introduced   AEW Collision  , a Saturday night show, further diversifying its weekly offerings.  

2.   Streaming Platforms    
   - AEW partnered with   FITE TV   to provide live streaming for international audiences, ensuring accessibility in regions without cable deals.  
   - Pay-per-views (PPVs) like   Double or Nothing   and   All Out   are distributed via traditional PPV providers and streaming services, giving fans multiple ways to watch.  

3.   Global Accessibility    
   - AEW’s deals with networks like   ITV   (UK) and platforms like   New Japan World   (for NJPW-related content) expanded its reach to global markets.  
   - Streaming exclusives like   AEW Dark   and   AEW Dark: Elevation   on YouTube have allowed AEW to showcase rising talent and engage with a broader fanbase.  

---

      Production Style    

AEW’s production values reflect a blend of modern polish and wrestling tradition, creating a unique viewing experience:  

1.   Cinematic Match Formats    
   - AEW pioneered cinematic storytelling with matches like the   Stadium Stampede  , blending pre-recorded segments with live action for creative narratives.  

2.   Dynamic Camera Work    
   - AEW employs innovative camera techniques to enhance the energy of matches. Examples include close-up shots during key maneuvers and crowd reactions that amplify emotional moments.  

3.   Lighting and Set Design    
   - Vibrant lighting setups and thematic stage designs (e.g.,   Winter is Coming  ,   Beach Break  ) give AEW’s events a distinct visual identity.  
   - The   Double or Nothing poker chip stage design   and the Wembley Stadium setup for   All In 2023   are standout examples of AEW’s creativity in production.  

4.   Commentary Team    
   - AEW’s commentary team, featuring industry veterans like   Jim Ross  ,   Excalibur  , and   Tony Schiavone  , balances expert analysis with engaging storytelling.  
   - The addition of wrestlers like   Taz   and   Chris Jericho   as guest commentators adds personality and humor to broadcasts.  

---

      Merchandising    

AEW’s approach to merchandise and branding has been a significant revenue driver:  

1.   Wrestler-Driven Designs    
   - AEW empowers wrestlers to create unique merchandise that reflects their characters, resulting in a diverse range of products.  
     -   Example  : The popularity of   “Scissor Me Daddy Ass”   merchandise for The Acclaimed became a cultural phenomenon.  

2.   Collaborations with Retailers    
   - AEW partnered with major retailers like   Hot Topic   and   Pro Wrestling Tees  , ensuring widespread availability of its merchandise.  
   - Exclusive drops and limited-edition items (e.g., event-specific shirts) have created urgency and excitement among fans.  

3.   Action Figures and Collectibles    
   - AEW’s partnership with   Jazwares   has resulted in a successful line of action figures, including highly detailed versions of stars like Kenny Omega and Jon Moxley.  
   - Special editions, such as PPV-inspired attires, appeal to collectors and casual fans alike.  

4.   Branded Events and Partnerships    
   - AEW has expanded its branding through collaborations, such as themed promotions with   TNT’s Shark Week   or Warner Bros. IP integrations like   House of the Dragon  .  

---

      Documentaries and Books    

AEW has embraced media beyond weekly shows, providing fans with deeper insights into the promotion and its wrestlers:  

1.   Being the Elite (YouTube)    
   - This wrestler-driven vlog series by The Young Bucks offers behind-the-scenes looks at AEW’s roster, blending comedy, storytelling, and real-life moments.  
   -   Impact  : BTE has cultivated fan engagement, introducing characters like   “Hangman” Adam Page’s anxious cowboy persona   to a broader audience.  

2.   Road To Series    
   - AEW produces mini-documentaries on its YouTube channel, focusing on the build-up to major events.  
     -   Example  : The   Road to Revolution   series highlighted the personal stakes of key matches, such as Kenny Omega vs. Hangman Page.  

3.   Feature Documentaries    
   - AEW has partnered with media companies to produce feature-length documentaries about key moments and stars.  
     -   Example  : Documentaries on Cody Rhodes’ career and the founding of AEW have provided fans with a deeper understanding of its history.  

4.   Books and Memoirs    
   - While AEW itself hasn’t published official histories yet, wrestlers like   Chris Jericho   and   Jon Moxley   have released autobiographies that detail their AEW journeys.  
     -   Example  : Jon Moxley’s memoir provides insights into his transition from WWE to AEW, offering a unique perspective on the company’s early days.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    

1.   Expand Streaming Platforms    
   - AEW can enhance accessibility by launching its own streaming service or partnering with a major platform (e.g., HBO Max) to archive past events, PPVs, and exclusive content.  

2.   Enhance Production Consistency    
   - Investing in innovative production techniques, such as augmented reality or drone camera work, can keep AEW’s presentation fresh and competitive.  

3.   Diversify Merchandising    
   - Expanding into new merchandise categories, such as video games (beyond   AEW Fight Forever  ) or virtual collectibles, can attract younger audiences.  

4.   Leverage Documentaries and Books    
   - Creating a comprehensive documentary or official history book on AEW’s rise could strengthen its legacy and deepen fan engagement.  

AEW’s media and presentation strategies have established it as a forward-thinking wrestling promotion. Its ability to blend tradition with innovation ensures its long-term relevance in an evolving entertainment landscape. 



---------------------------

      Women’s Wrestling in All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s approach to   women’s wrestling   emphasizes athleticism, diversity, and the gradual elevation of the division as a key component of its programming.  
2. Influential wrestlers like   Hikaru Shida  ,   Britt Baker  , and   Nyla Rose   have established themselves as cornerstones of the division.  
3. Memorable matches, such as   Britt Baker vs. Thunder Rosa (Lights Out Match)  , have set new standards for storytelling and intensity in women’s wrestling.  
4. AEW’s women’s division has evolved from underutilization to prominence, with expanding opportunities, international representation, and a growing focus on long-term narratives.  

---

      Role of Women’s Wrestling    

1.   Initial Challenges    
   - At its inception, AEW faced criticism for the limited representation of women’s wrestling in its programming. Early shows often featured only one women’s match per event, leading to fan concerns about underutilization.  

2.   Commitment to Growth    
   - Over time, AEW has shown a commitment to strengthening its women’s division by:  
     - Signing talented performers from diverse backgrounds.  
     - Introducing new championships, such as the   TBS Championship  , to provide additional opportunities for female wrestlers.  
     - Partnering with   Joshi wrestlers   (from Japan) to bring international styles and talent to the division.  

3.   Diversity and Representation    
   - AEW emphasizes inclusivity, with trailblazers like   Nyla Rose  , the first openly transgender wrestler to win a major championship, and   Jade Cargill  , whose dominant reign showcased representation in mainstream wrestling.  

---

      Iconic Female Wrestlers    

1.   Hikaru Shida    
   -   Achievements  :  
     - Longest-reigning   AEW Women’s World Champion   (372 days).  
   -   Significance  : Shida brought a blend of technical precision and hard-hitting Joshi style to AEW, elevating the division with standout matches.  

2.   Britt Baker, D.M.D.    
   -   Achievements  :  
     - One of the most popular champions, known for her charisma, promo skills, and in-ring storytelling.  
   -   Iconic Moment  : Her blood-soaked performance in the   Lights Out Match   against Thunder Rosa solidified her as a top star.  

3.   Nyla Rose    
   -   Achievements  :  
     - Second AEW Women’s World Champion and a pioneer for LGBTQ+ representation in wrestling.  
   -   Significance  : Her combination of power and versatility made her a dominant force in the division.  

4.   Jade Cargill    
   -   Achievements  :  
     - First   TBS Champion  , with an undefeated streak lasting 508 days.  
   -   Impact  : Jade’s star power and crossover appeal positioned her as a mainstream figure in wrestling and entertainment.  

5.   Thunder Rosa    
   -   Achievements  :  
     - AEW Women’s World Champion and a driving force behind some of the division’s most emotionally charged rivalries.  
   -   Iconic Moment  : Her victory over Britt Baker in a   Steel Cage Match   for the title cemented her legacy.  

---

      Key Matches and Storylines    

1.   Britt Baker vs. Thunder Rosa (Lights Out Match, St. Patrick’s Day Slam 2021)    
   -   Significance  : This unsanctioned match, filled with blood and intense storytelling, was a turning point for AEW’s women’s division. It showcased the potential for women’s wrestling to headline events with the same intensity as men’s matches.  

2.   Hikaru Shida vs. Nyla Rose (Double or Nothing 2020)    
   -   Significance  : Shida’s victory in a hard-hitting match solidified her as a credible champion and introduced Joshi wrestling to a broader AEW audience.  

3.   Jade Cargill’s Undefeated Reign    
   -   Notable Match  : Her   TBS Championship victory   in the inaugural tournament final against Ruby Soho showcased her as a dominant star.  

4.   Riho vs. Nyla Rose (AEW Dynamite, 2019)    
   -   Significance  : As the first-ever AEW Women’s World Championship match, this bout set the tone for the division’s emphasis on contrasting styles and diverse representation.  

5.   Serena Deeb vs. Thunder Rosa (Double or Nothing 2022)    
   -   Significance  : Deeb’s technical prowess and Rosa’s fiery persona clashed in a match that highlighted AEW’s ability to present nuanced storytelling.  

---

      Evolution of Women’s Wrestling    

1.   Integration of Joshi Talent    
   - AEW brought Japanese wrestlers like   Riho  ,   Yuka Sakazaki  , and   Emi Sakura   into the fold, introducing Joshi wrestling’s speed and precision to Western audiences.  
   - Collaborations with promotions like   Tokyo Joshi Pro Wrestling (TJPW)   have expanded AEW’s international presence.  

2.   Introduction of the TBS Championship    
   - The creation of a secondary women’s title provided more opportunities for the division to grow, highlighting emerging stars like   Kris Statlander   and   Jade Cargill  .  

3.   Main Event Spotlights    
   - Women’s matches have increasingly headlined AEW events, such as the   Steel Cage Match   between Thunder Rosa and Britt Baker, signaling a shift in prioritization.  

4.   Diversity in Styles and Personas    
   - AEW’s women’s roster now reflects a wide array of wrestling styles, from the technical mastery of Serena Deeb to the powerhouse dominance of Nyla Rose and the flamboyant charisma of Jade Cargill.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    

1.   Expand Opportunities    
   - AEW should increase the frequency of women’s matches on weekly shows and consider launching a women-centric tournament or special event to elevate the division further.  

2.   Leverage International Talent    
   - Continued partnerships with Japanese promotions and expanding recruitment from regions like Europe and South America can enrich the division’s diversity.  

3.   Invest in Storytelling    
   - Long-term narratives like   Britt Baker vs. Thunder Rosa   should be the standard, with more emphasis on building multi-dimensional rivalries.  

4.   Enhance Branding    
   - AEW can capitalize on its women’s division by creating merchandise, documentaries, or exclusive content spotlighting iconic moments and wrestlers.  

AEW’s women’s division has made significant strides, transforming from an underdeveloped aspect of the promotion to a dynamic and evolving centerpiece. Its commitment to diversity, high-quality matches, and international talent ensures its continued growth and impact on the wrestling industry. 



---------------------------

      Current State and Future Prospects of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW’s   current roster   balances established stars like MJF and Jon Moxley with rising talents such as Ricky Starks and Jamie Hayter, ensuring both immediate impact and long-term growth.  
2.   Recent achievements  , such as the record-breaking   All In London 2023   and successful cross-promotional events like   Forbidden Door  , solidify AEW’s global presence.  
3. AEW faces challenges including   roster management  ,   maintaining locker room cohesion  , and navigating   competition from WWE  .  
4. The promotion’s   future direction   lies in expanding its international footprint, refining its storytelling, and fostering homegrown talent to secure its legacy.  

---

      Current Roster    

AEW’s roster features a blend of top-tier veterans, emerging stars, and international talent, creating a dynamic and diverse landscape:  

1.   Top Stars    
   -   MJF  : The reigning AEW World Champion, MJF is a master of promos and storytelling, blending arrogance and vulnerability to captivate audiences.  
   -   Jon Moxley  : A cornerstone of AEW, Moxley’s hard-hitting style and leadership make him a constant presence in main event scenes.  
   -   Kenny Omega  : Known as “The Best Bout Machine,” Omega continues to deliver world-class matches while balancing singles and trios competition.  
   -   The Elite (Young Bucks & Hangman Page)  : The Elite remains central to AEW’s identity, driving both faction rivalries and individual storylines.  
   -   Toni Storm  : A standout in the women’s division, Storm’s unique “timeless” persona and championship reigns have redefined her AEW legacy.  

2.   Rising Talents    
   -   Ricky Starks  : Charismatic and versatile, Starks is emerging as a future main eventer through his performances and promo ability.  
   -   Jamie Hayter  : A fan favorite in the women’s division, Hayter’s blend of strength and technical prowess has made her a breakout star.  
   -   Wheeler Yuta  : As a member of the Blackpool Combat Club, Yuta represents AEW’s focus on developing young talent in high-profile settings.  
   -   Darby Allin  : Known for his reckless style and underdog narrative, Allin continues to grow as a central figure, especially with Sting as his mentor.  

3.   International Talent    
   -   Will Ospreay  : Frequently appearing in cross-promotional matches, Ospreay elevates AEW’s global appeal.  
   -   Rey Fenix & Penta El Zero Miedo  : As tag team and singles competitors, these lucha libre stars bring a unique dynamic to AEW’s roster.  

---

      Recent Achievements    

1.   All In London 2023    
   - AEW’s debut at Wembley Stadium drew over   80,000 fans  , breaking attendance records and showcasing its ability to thrive on the international stage.  
   -   Significance  : Cemented AEW as a global brand capable of producing marquee events outside the U.S.  

2.   Forbidden Door II    
   - AEW’s collaboration with NJPW delivered critically acclaimed matches like   Kenny Omega vs. Will Ospreay  , reinforcing AEW’s reputation for high-quality wrestling.  

3.   Expanding Weekly Programming    
   - The introduction of   AEW Collision   provided another platform for talent, allowing deeper storytelling and increased visibility for underutilized wrestlers.  

4.   Women’s Division Growth    
   - With stars like Toni Storm, Jamie Hayter, and Kris Statlander leading the charge, AEW’s women’s division has seen increased prominence and fan engagement.  

5.   Title Reigns and Defenses    
   -   Orange Cassidy’s AEW International Championship reign   became a highlight, with Cassidy defending the title 31 times, solidifying its importance.  

---

      Challenges    

1.   Roster Management    
   - AEW’s growing roster creates challenges in balancing screen time, ensuring consistent storylines, and avoiding talent feeling underutilized.  
   - Example: High-profile signings like Adam Cole and Andrade El Idolo occasionally struggle to find regular, impactful storylines.  

2.   Locker Room Cohesion    
   - Backstage controversies, such as the   CM Punk and The Elite feud  , have underscored the difficulty of managing egos in a competitive locker room.  
   -   Solution Needed  : Greater emphasis on conflict resolution and leadership to foster unity.  

3.   Competition with WWE    
   - WWE’s resurgence under Triple H’s creative leadership has intensified competition, particularly as WWE continues to expand globally.  
   - AEW must innovate to maintain its distinct identity and avoid direct comparisons.  

4.   Balancing Weekly Programming    
   - The addition of   Collision   has increased AEW’s output, but managing consistent quality across three weekly shows (  Dynamite  ,   Rampage  , and   Collision  ) presents logistical challenges.  

---

      Future Direction    

AEW’s potential for growth hinges on key strategic areas:  

1.   International Expansion    
   - Following the success of   All In London  , AEW should explore events in new markets such as   Australia  ,   India  , and   South America  .  
   -   Partnerships   with local promotions could facilitate entry into these regions while broadening its talent pool.  

2.   Developing Homegrown Stars    
   - Continued investment in emerging talents like   Ricky Starks  ,   Jade Cargill  , and   Wheeler Yuta   will ensure a sustainable future.  
   - Establishing a developmental system or formal relationship with indie promotions could nurture future stars.  

3.   Enhancing the Women’s Division    
   - Increasing the frequency of women’s matches on weekly programming and creating more main event opportunities will further elevate the division.  
   - Introducing women-centric events or tournaments could drive fan engagement.  

4.   Innovative Storytelling and Match Types    
   - Expanding on creative formats like   Stadium Stampede   or introducing new cross-promotional concepts could differentiate AEW from competitors.  
   - Continued emphasis on long-term storytelling, as seen in Hangman Page’s championship journey, will keep fans emotionally invested.  

5.   Digital and Streaming Presence    
   - AEW could expand its content library by creating an   on-demand streaming service  , allowing fans to access archived shows, exclusive documentaries, and behind-the-scenes content.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    

1.   Enhance Brand Identity    
   - AEW must solidify its identity as a fan-first promotion, balancing high-quality matches with emotional storytelling to distinguish itself from WWE.  

2.   Foster Stability and Unity    
   - Addressing backstage issues and ensuring clear leadership will be crucial for maintaining locker room harmony and productivity.  

3.   Capitalize on Global Momentum    
   - With its growing international fanbase, AEW should prioritize global tours and collaborations to solidify its status as a global wrestling powerhouse.  

4.   Focus on Diversity    
   - Expanding representation across divisions and investing in women’s wrestling will demonstrate AEW’s commitment to inclusivity and innovation.  

AEW’s current state reflects a promotion that has grown into a global competitor while facing challenges typical of rapid expansion. By focusing on sustainability, talent development, and innovation, AEW is well-positioned to shape the future of professional wrestling. 


---------------------------


      Legacy and Historical Significance of All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Key Takeaways    
1. AEW has significantly influenced   pop culture and mainstream media  , bridging the gap between professional wrestling and other entertainment industries.  
2. Historically, AEW’s rise has reshaped the wrestling landscape, reigniting competition, fostering creative freedom, and challenging WWE’s dominance.  
3. The promotion’s successes and challenges provide valuable   lessons on innovation, roster management, and fan engagement   for the broader industry.  
4. AEW’s   enduring appeal   lies in its commitment to diversity, long-term storytelling, and fostering an authentic connection with fans.  

---

      Cultural Impact    

1.   Mainstream Recognition    
   - AEW has established itself as a pop culture phenomenon by:  
     - Attracting celebrities like   Shaquille O’Neal  ,   Snoop Dogg  , and   Rosario Dawson   to participate in its programming.  
     - Partnering with Warner Bros. Discovery for cross-promotional campaigns, such as   Shark Week   tie-ins and themed episodes like   House of the Dragon Dynamite  .  
   - Wrestlers like   Chris Jericho   and   MJF   have transcended wrestling, appearing on mainstream platforms such as podcasts, talk shows, and even reality TV.  

2.   Crossover Appeal    
   - Stars like   Jade Cargill  , who combines wrestling success with fitness modeling and acting, and collaborations with international promotions have positioned AEW as a versatile, globally appealing brand.  

3.   Fan-Driven Pop Culture    
   -   The Acclaimed’s “Scissor Me Daddy Ass”   catchphrase became a viral sensation, showcasing AEW’s ability to create organically popular trends.  
   - Songs like Chris Jericho’s   “Judas”   have become synonymous with AEW, often performed live by fans at events, further embedding wrestling into mainstream culture.  

---

      Historical Significance    

1.   Reviving Competition    
   - AEW’s debut in 2019 marked the first serious challenge to WWE’s dominance since the closure of WCW in 2001.  
   - The “Wednesday Night Wars” against   WWE NXT   reignited a sense of rivalry in professional wrestling, reminiscent of the 1990s   Monday Night Wars  .  
   - AEW’s ability to attract high-profile talent like   Jon Moxley  ,   CM Punk  , and   Bryan Danielson   proved it could be a viable alternative for top-tier wrestlers.  

2.   Fostering Creative Freedom    
   - By empowering wrestlers to have significant input into their promos, characters, and storylines, AEW has provided a refreshing counterpoint to WWE’s heavily scripted style.  
   - Long-term narratives, such as Hangman Page’s championship journey, have redefined how wrestling stories are told.  

3.   International Collaboration    
   - AEW’s partnerships with   NJPW  ,   AAA  , and   Impact Wrestling   represent a new era of cross-promotional cooperation, breaking barriers that historically kept companies insular.  
   - Events like   Forbidden Door   have elevated AEW’s historical significance as a unifier in the wrestling industry.  

---

      Lessons Learned    

1.   Successes    
   -   Fan-Centric Approach  : AEW’s ability to listen to its audience and adapt to their desires has been instrumental in its growth.  
     -   Example  : The rise of Orange Cassidy and The Acclaimed stemmed from genuine fan support.  
   -   Diversity and Representation  : AEW’s inclusive roster, featuring stars like Nyla Rose, Hikaru Shida, and Jade Cargill, has set a precedent for modern wrestling.  

2.   Failures and Challenges    
   -   Roster Management  : AEW’s large roster sometimes leads to underutilization of talent, causing fans to question the consistency of booking.  
     - Lesson: Focused storytelling and streamlined rosters ensure every wrestler has meaningful opportunities.  
   -   Backstage Conflicts  : Incidents like the CM Punk–Elite altercation highlighted the need for better conflict resolution and leadership.  
     - Lesson: Stronger backstage management and a cohesive locker room are critical for long-term success.  

3.   Innovative Storytelling    
   - AEW’s emphasis on   long-term storytelling   has proven that patience and depth create emotional payoffs that resonate with fans, exemplified by Hangman Page’s journey and MJF’s rise.  

---

      Enduring Appeal    

1.   Diverse Offerings    
   - AEW appeals to various fan demographics by blending technical wrestling, high-flying action, and hard-hitting brawls.  
   - With divisions like tag team wrestling (The Young Bucks, FTR) and trios competition, AEW caters to fans seeking variety.  

2.   Fan Engagement    
   - AEW’s authenticity and willingness to interact with fans, both online and at live events, create a sense of community.  
   -   Example  : Open challenge formats, social media interactions, and events like   All Access   strengthen fan loyalty.  

3.   Commitment to Innovation    
   - By constantly experimenting with match formats (e.g.,   Stadium Stampede  ,   Casino Ladder Matches  ) and embracing cross-promotional opportunities, AEW remains fresh and exciting.  

4.   Global Reach    
   - AEW’s international presence, bolstered by events like   All In London   and partnerships with NJPW, has ensured its appeal transcends borders.  
   - Stars like PAC, Will Ospreay, and Hikaru Shida connect AEW to fans worldwide.  

---

      Actionable Insights and Conclusion    

1.   Expand Global Events    
   - Building on the success of   All In London  , AEW should explore hosting flagship events in emerging markets like India, Australia, and Latin America.  

2.   Strengthen Internal Leadership    
   - Developing a cohesive leadership structure for backstage management can address conflicts and ensure long-term stability.  

3.   Preserve Long-Term Storytelling    
   - AEW should continue crafting emotionally rich narratives while balancing opportunities for new talent and established stars.  

4.   Leverage Media Opportunities    
   - By producing documentaries, books, or a streaming service featuring archival content, AEW can solidify its legacy while engaging new audiences.  

AEW’s legacy is one of innovation, inclusivity, and resilience. Its historical significance lies in its ability to challenge the status quo, reshape wrestling storytelling, and connect with fans in meaningful ways. The promotion’s commitment to diversity, creativity, and global expansion ensures that its influence on professional wrestling will endure for decades to come. 


----------------------

      Conclusion: All Elite Wrestling (AEW)    

---

       Summary    

All Elite Wrestling (AEW) has emerged as a transformative force in professional wrestling, blending innovation with tradition to create a dynamic and inclusive promotion.  

-   Achievements  :  
  - AEW reintroduced competition to a WWE-dominated landscape, revitalizing the industry with marquee events like   All In London   and the   Forbidden Door   series.  
  - It has cultivated a diverse roster, including stars like   MJF  ,   Jon Moxley  ,   Kenny Omega  , and   Jade Cargill  , while nurturing rising talents such as   Ricky Starks   and   Jamie Hayter  .  
  - The promotion has achieved critical acclaim for matches such as   Kenny Omega vs. Hangman Page (Full Gear 2021)   and   Britt Baker vs. Thunder Rosa (Lights Out Match, 2021)  .  
  - AEW’s collaborative approach with global promotions like NJPW and AAA has unified wrestling audiences across borders, setting a new standard for cross-promotional storytelling.  

-   Legacy  :  
  - AEW’s focus on creative freedom, fan engagement, and long-term storytelling has cemented its place as a progressive alternative in wrestling.  
  - Its emphasis on inclusivity and diversity has redefined representation in the sport, elevating voices and styles often overlooked in mainstream wrestling.  

---

       Final Thoughts    

AEW’s impact on wrestling is both profound and enduring. In a short span of time, it has reinvigorated the industry, proving that professional wrestling can be both athletic and emotionally compelling. AEW champions wrestling as an art form, offering a platform for wrestlers to innovate, connect, and thrive.  

Its bold approach to storytelling, coupled with its commitment to fan-first programming, ensures that AEW will continue shaping the future of wrestling. Whether by delivering dream matches, fostering homegrown stars, or forging international alliances, AEW’s ability to adapt and innovate will keep it a cornerstone of the wrestling world.  

In wrestling history, AEW stands as a testament to what is possible when passion, creativity, and community come together.  

---

       Call to Action    

If you’re a wrestling fan—or even just wrestling-curious—AEW offers something for everyone.  

1.   Watch Must-See Matches  :  
   -   Kenny Omega vs. Hangman Page (Full Gear 2021)    
   -   The Young Bucks vs. Lucha Bros (All Out 2021 Steel Cage Match)    
   -   CM Punk vs. MJF (Dog Collar Match, Revolution 2022)    

2.   Explore Iconic Events  :  
   -   Double or Nothing  : AEW’s debut event, a landmark in wrestling history.  
   -   Forbidden Door  : A celebration of global wrestling talent and cross-promotional excellence.  
   -   All In London 2023  : A record-breaking event that showcased AEW’s global reach.  

3.   Dive Into AEW’s Characters and Stories  :  
   - Follow the journey of   Hangman Page  ,   MJF  , or   Britt Baker   for masterclasses in character evolution and storytelling.  
   - Discover the vibrancy of AEW’s tag team and trios divisions with acts like   The Elite  ,   FTR  , and   Death Triangle  .  

4.   Engage with AEW’s Community  :  
   - Join live crowds for electric moments, follow AEW on social media for updates, or immerse yourself in vlogs like   Being the Elite   for a behind-the-scenes look.  

---

      Closing Thought    

AEW is more than just a wrestling promotion; it’s a movement. By celebrating the art of wrestling and elevating its performers and fans alike, AEW has proven that the spirit of competition, innovation, and inclusivity is alive and well. Now is the perfect time to explore the promotion that’s reshaping the future of wrestling—one unforgettable moment at a time.  




